Authors
Matt Prigge
Number of Reviews
48

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Writer: Steve Zallian (based on the book by Jonathan Harr)
Starring: John Travolta, Robert Duvall, William H. Macy, Tony Shalhoub, 
Zeljko Ivanek, John Lithgow, Kathleen Quinlan, James Gandolfini, David 
Thornton, Bruce Norris, Dan Hedaya, Peter Jacobsen, Sydney Pollack, 
Stephen Fry, Edward Herrman
Oh god how many John Grisham lawyer films we have been munundated with! 
In a perfect world, "A Civil Action" would be a breath of fresh air. 
It's cynical about lawyers in a way that Grisham isn't. It's romantic in 
the exact opposite way a Grisham book/film isn't. And, the capper, it 
has no distinct ending, and the law in Hollywood films is that above all 
else, you must have an ending. Even if it's based on a true story, a 
true story which hasn't yet ended, you must supply an ending, a false 
one, but an ending nevertheless. Hell, "A Civil Action" is even more sly 
and more witty than any of the Grisham works put together (and that 
includes "The Firm," the only novel of his that will ever be regarded as 
a classic). Yet it's also oddly and slightly unsatisfying. Weird. This 
is, in fact, a Steve Zallian film, not just the work of a hack, and 
Zallian is the director of the much-admired "Search for Bobby Fischer" 
(didn't see it) and writer of none other than "Schindler's List." In 
short, I like this guy, and am a sucker for the way he tells his 
stories. After all, apart from the obvious it's-a-Holocaust-film and 
it's-a-Spielberg-film, isn't "Schindler's List" just a damn brilliant 
film, not so much a Holocaust film as it is a wonderful character study.
"A Civil Action" is the same way: it's narrative is split between being 
a lawyer film and being a character study. And it's here that the film 
seems to go a bit wrong. The main complaint of this film is that while, 
yes, it's an engrossing lawyerly tale, it has no real ending, and that's 
not necessarily the problem with the film. It's that it's just kind of 
unsatisfying. If this were a great film, it would feel complete, and 
still end basically the same way. But this film just seems to end, and I 
don't want to be stupid and suggest an alternate ending should be tacked 
on: imagine, if you will, being one of those the film is about, looking 
forward to this film, and then discovered the truth has been through a 
surrealistic and unpleasant Hollywood filter, just so the many won't 
bitch about what is, essentially, genuine.
But the fact that it just ends is not, in all actuality, what is wrong 
with it. It's rather that Zallian has chosen, in the last half hour, to 
adandon the traditional lawyer story, and chose the other part of his 
story, the one about the lawyer, one Jan Schlictman (John Travolta), 
who's shown in the opening and throughout most of the movie as a 
heartless but brilliant lawyer, brilliant because he's manipulative and 
he always wins. It wishes to make it all about Jan in the end, but the 
truth is, his change, although nicely done, is not full. We see him 
suffering from a personal crisis, and Travolta does do a pretty good job 
in depicting his change of heart, but in the end, we don't fully believe 
it. And I think that the problem is when he has made his decision, the 
film choses an odd angle to go at, a noble one, but one that gives the 
film's conclusion that of incompleteness. In the opening of the film, we 
see him doing his old schtick, manipulating courts, winning cases 
effortlessly, and then discussing on a heard radio interview how great 
he is at his job and how much he cares for his cases. In short, he's 
full of bullshit and we know it.
In the film, he takes a case that is hardly desired: a town where 
several of the children have died mysteriously of lukemia and the source 
of the illness seems to be from a local factory that may or may not have 
been dumping waste into the river. Point one, it's not of the usual 
criteria (Jan points out, wickedly, that dead or wounded children aren't 
nearly as sympathetic as those struck down in the midst of their 
success). Point two, it has been through several lawyers. After turning 
them down, Jan changes his mind (a muddled scene - he stops his car on a 
bridge, looks out...is he feeling a sense of overachievement?), and he 
and his team of lawyers (Tony Shalhoub, Zeljko Ivanek, and accountant 
William H. Macy) head out to the town to do battle with the town's 
company. They spend millions of dollars examining the land, test the 
water, what have you (this is where Stephen Fry, a possible Oscar 
nominee for his brilliant performance in "Wilde," pops up thanklessly), 
and in the meantime question the parents of the dead children, and then, 
unsuccessfully, the workers at the plant. They also find themselves 
clashing with a brilliant lawyer for the company, the eccentric Jerome 
Facher, played by Robert Duvall (more on him later on). As we progress, 
we get so involved in the way the story is being told, which is 
engulfing everything around it, including the individual and brief 
stories of some of the townspeople (one of the best is a bit with James 
Gandolfini as an employee of the plant living across the street from 
Kathleen Quinland, who lost her child, who begins to have a personal 
crisis).
Things begin to go downhill for the lawyers in the second half, as they 
are up against impossible odds: the judge (John Lithgow) is not only a 
strickler, but a pal of Facher; the employees of the plant are either 
afraid or to loyal to testify; no concrete evidence is being found, 
depsite the money spent to find it; and they are quickly running out of 
money. As Macy mortgages everything he can, including their homes and 
their office, he slowly loses his sanity (his meatiest role since, oh, 
"Fargo"), and we the audience begin to feel a real loss of hope for our 
protagonist. In fact, the last half hour is such a change from the rest 
of the film and so unresolved that it has been widely panned as not 
being up to par (Owen Gleiberman, especially, criticized the film for 
not being overly-dramatic...I suppose like a Grisham novel). This 
wouldn't be so if the change in Jan had not been handled the way it is: 
instead of having a change of heart and automatically being perceived as 
good, he's seen as being still full of bullshit. Because he doesn't take 
stock in the cares of his partners, and causes them all to lose their 
money and noteriaty in the lawyer field because he wants to help the 
people of the town, he is instead seen as being of good nature but not 
sure how to bring that out. The final half tries to redeem this, as must 
have been the point of making this in Zallian's mind, but what follows 
is a series of scenes where we merely see him making personal stands for 
his beliefs, and though he has changed considerably from the opening 
moments when he's seen speeding back and forth from the town that wishes 
to employ him (and thusly receiving two speeding tickets), we still feel 
that the big change in his life is that he's not rich and esteemed 
anymore (the film's final title card is witty but in all actuality 
shallow).
The fault is not that there is no closure to the court case (it's still 
going on, you know), but that its personal story feels like it needs 
either another chapter or another angle in the final one it has. We need 
to feel like the character has really made a big change in his life, and 
that the story is how a story of strife like the one of the town could 
inspire such a whopping change in his personal life. It only feels like 
half of that. Maybe even less. And it's not Travolta, who does a great 
job here (though never to be a truly memorable performance of his), but 
rather Zallian, whose final chapter needs a rewrite. Up to then, though, 
it's an engrossing drama, one of the best of the year in fact, and one 
of the best lawyer films, period. The reason is because it recognizes 
that a court trial is not about those being defended or prosecuted, but 
rather it's about the lawyers, the knights who battle eachother. We 
learn that the company is almost positively to blame for the deaths in 
the town, but the reason it can't be blamed is because it has the best 
prosecution you can find.
And Duvall's Facher is such a brilliant character and he does such a 
magnificent job at portraying that man that it's almost easy to overlook 
how subtley great he is. Facher is seen as an elderly man, a goofy 
eccentric, carrying a broken brown bag with stickers on it, eating 
lunches out of paper bags, and making a point to take time out of his 
day to listen to the radio, and scold anyone who interupts him. But look 
deeper and you see a master at work: his evil and manipulative nature 
are hidden under the eccentricities that others don upon him, and it's 
difficult as hell to clearly generalize him in any way. That's why I 
liked this film: it's hard to put a pointer on. You can never see 
exactly where this film will land, and even when the credits roll, you 
still aren't sure what to make of it. Call it The Zallian Effect. Same 
thing happened with "Schindler's List" (not that I'm comparing Oskar 
Schindler to Jan Schlictman). Each film is so greatly crafted that you 
can't help but get involved in its broad storytelling, interesting 
characters, and, most peculiarly, the wit that comes along with it. If 
only it felt totally complete (like, say, "Schindler's List," though at 
this point it may be unfair to make comparisons between the two), it 
might have been one of the best films of the year, and along with that, 
a full breath of fresh air.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Kurt & Courtney (1998)
Starring: Nick Broomfield, Hank Harrison, Tom Grant, El Duce, Rozz 
Rezabak, Kurt Cobain, Courtney Love
Nick Broomfield seems to be in a minority when it comes to the amount of 
general interest in the subject of his newest documentary. I don't, of 
course, mean to imply that no one gives a shit about Kurt Cobain and/or 
Courtney Love and their subsequent relationship that ended in his 
suicide. I've always wondered exactly why Kurt killed himself, not being 
satisfied with the mere explanation that he hated fame. No one kills 
themself for one main reason; there are many many reasons why such 
things occur, and when this film unearths some of the possibilities of 
the reasons he killed himself, it's nothing short of interesting. For 
instance, I was fascinated when I heard from his aunt about her 
speculations on his death: that Courtney and him each wanted something 
else, that she was too controlling over him, and that she may have used 
him. It all sounds eerily like "A Star is Born" to me, and I know I'm 
not the first to point that out (thank you, Roger Ebert). And I'm not 
exactly ruling out a possible conspiracy - it's just that by now, any 
speculation about a possible murder sound goofy and too late in the 
forming. Once I too was obsessed with conspiracy theories, most notably 
revolving around one particular case inspired by the viewing of one 
particular movie many years ago that ended up shaping my initial descent 
into paranoia of all kinds (and thank you, Oliver Stone). But it's when 
this film decides at the crossroads, whether it should go to be about 
the two of them and their relationship or about possible murder theories 
implicating Courtney heavily to go for the latter that I soon tuned out.
And I grew more distated as the film plowed on from theory to theory, 
and trying to prove them. Broomfield, who not only made the Spalding 
Gray film "Monster in a Box" (great flick, mostly due to Gray, of 
course), but also a little documentary I watched in film class called 
"Soldier Girls" which is unbelivably interesting, abandons some of the 
wit and the observation with which he showed in those two films, and it 
becomes not really about Kurt and Courtney but about Nick Broomfield 
trying desperately to find anything smutty and/or controversial about 
Kurt and Courtney. Like a Michael Moore without screen presence or 
actual real wit, Broomfield travels the country meeting with people who 
knew them or were associated with them (and in one case, is one of 
them), in hopes of finding anything at all about them. He shoots 
interviews so that he's there in the frame, or at least in reaction 
shots during interviews. He shoots inside the car as he's traveling from 
place to place. And he comments continuously on the soundtrack about 
what's going on, what he thinks about his discoveries, and what he would 
have done with the film if Courtney Love hadn't found out he was making 
the film and pressured those who funded him (but I really wish he didn't 
have to explain that every ten minutes).
It's perhaps wrong that Love prevented him from exploring all the 
possibilities the subject allows, not only for ethical reasons, but 
really because the film hurts from it. Without a whole lot of funding, 
Broomfield is only allowed to explore certain things, and it turns out 
he only has the budget to talk to the cesspool of witnesses, those who 
no one would touch because they're implausible in any key testimony. 
Love's father, who wrote two books about Kurt's death and how it may 
have been a murder maybe by Courtney herself, voices his horrible 
dislike for Courtney, and in one interview shows that much of his 
ranting stems from deep emotional and psychological pain aimed at his 
daughter. Tom Grant, the detective hired by Love to find the missing 
Cobain in the last days of his life, voices how he thinks he may have 
been a coverup device, and whose sole proof of this is that Kurt was so 
high on heroin that he couldn't have held a gun (this is disproven 
shortly after, shockingly enough by Broomfield himself). An ex-lover of 
Courtney displays many of her quirks and mannerisms when it comes to 
fame, broadening our picture of her, then yells into the camera a long, 
priceless string of insults aimed at her. Weirdest of all, we see an 
underground punk rocker named El Duce, a man who looks like my 
perception of Satan, who says that he was hired by Love to kill Cobain 
but didn't do it (though he has since started haunting my dreams, it's 
nice to hear that he was later on killed when he stumbled into the path 
of a train). We meet groupies who knew them, journalists who were 
threatened by them, and best of all, Kurt's aunt who's the sanest and 
most plausible witness the film can offer.
Not only does "Kurt and Courtney" get nowhere on the murder rap, it too 
harshly aims scrutiny in the direction of Courtney, making a vicious but 
one-dimensional attack at her character. The bad thing about this is: 
Nick Broomfield fucking hates Courtney Love. Bad thing for a documentary 
director, since the one surefire thing that should encompass every 
documentary is that the director has an open mind. Broomfield is willing 
to explore his subject and opens the evidence he unearths to scrutiny 
(the detective thing, once again), but underneath the entire film is the 
subtext that Courtney Love is a bitch, and the entire film doesn't play 
like an unearthing of their relationship but as a way to demonstrate in 
what ways she is a horrible individual. The problem with taking a stance 
like this is that it makes it easier for audiences to take sides with 
the filmmaker, and while people may buy into Broomfield's vision of Love 
as a coldhearted, manipulative bitch, we can also see how 
one-dimensional his argument is. On one hand, Love has threatened 
journalists and made them scared for their lives...but on the other 
hand, the journalists were trying to unearth painful secrets to her, and 
to make her look horrible. When Broomfield himself gets up at a free 
speech ceremony, where Love has received an award, and makes a speech 
showing what a hypocrite she is, it's either easy to sympathize with him 
for not being able to tell his story completely, or with Love for being 
trashed so much by Broomfield. In fact, we could either symapthize with 
Broomfield for having his funds cut off (and thus buy into his beliefs), 
or we could sympathize with Love for trying to thwart the making of this 
film because if we put ourselves in her position, we wouldn't want some 
jerk journalist trying to spread bad shit about us either, would we? I 
always think a documentary should engage us and make us question an 
issue, but it should never make us question its own belief system.
That said, "Kurt and Courtney" is at the very least intriguing. Some of 
the issues it digs up, mostly on the relationship between the eponomys 
couple, are when the film is truly great. Other moments, when it's 
foolishly trying to prove a part of a conspiracy theory or when it's 
trying to destroy Courtney Love, or when it's lack of a budget kicks in 
(there's something about that bit where he tries to sneak into a Hole 
rehearsal with a video camera only to have the battery die when the door 
is opened that's eerily reminiscent of "This is Spinal Tap"), are when 
it's at the very least a "uh huh, whatever" experience. But when it's 
uncovering interesting aspects of the respective personalities of Kurt 
and/or Courtney and their fascinating relationship, I could almost 
ignore the frustrating usage of yellow journalism and annoying presence 
by pompous ass Nick Broomfield. Well, at least temporarily.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
Starring: Christina Ricci, Paul Rudd, Courtney Love, Ben Affleck, Gaby 
Hoffman, Casey Affleck, Jay Mohr, Kate Hudson, Martha Plimpton, Brian 
McCardie, Angela Featherstone, Nicole Parker, David Chapelle, Janeane 
Garafolo, Guillermo Diaz, Elvis Costello
So I guess this kind of film has rubbed off onto the indie crowd as 
well, eh? Though they've always been made, the kind of retro-John Hughes 
kind of film only came back into popularity amongst everyone else a 
couple years ago, I suppose thanks to "Scream," the first film to really 
bring back that whole 80s feel, albeit with a sharp, self-conscious 
twist that made it admittingly enjoyable (too bad, I guess, that the 
sequel blew). Then came the traditional Hughes-ian films, like the 
dreadful "Can't Hardly Wait" of the previous summer (currently 
collecting dust on my top 10 worst list of the year), and now this whole 
trend has come to us courtesy of a ginormous cast of actors who work 
nearly exclusively in the independent film circuit, and whose range of 
actual acting talent spans the spectrum of "annoying" (Casey Affleck, as 
from my experience of him in "Good Will Hunting") to "pretty damn great 
(Christina Ricci, obviously). It's too bad that the only thing that 
differentiates this film from another film like it is that instead of 
godawful actors taking the helm (oh, Jennifer Love Hewitt...), it's 
these guys making asses of themselves.
If nothing, "200 Cigarettes" proves that even if you put a mighty cast 
of Indie actors in one movie together, Altman-esqueness or not, you're 
still going to come up with a relatively shallow, mostly unwitty, albeit 
minorly-energetic movie. It's like if "Nashville" had been set during a 
certain time to only sell records, was populated by characateurs, and 
had the depth of insight as a petri dish. The characters in this film 
are flat, under-developed, and worst of all, smug and hip - this film 
contains about 20 characters, but all of three, maybe four, are evenly 
remotely interesting, mostly thanks to the actors who inhabit them with 
their own self-created aspects. Not a very good omen when you're trying 
to make a film that's overly an hour and a half.
The film, though basically plotless, follows a large group of people, 
usually in small groups, trying to get to a certain party. There's two 
Long Island teens (Ricci and her pal, Gaby Hoffman, unrecognizable to me 
until the final reel) up in the city sans their parents' knowledge, but 
unaware where the party's supposed to take place who run into some young 
punk fans (Casey Affleck and Guillermo Diaz) who at first frighten them 
then win them over, sorta (as a side note, I hereby officially deem the 
Long Island accent the single most annoying accent on the face of the 
planet earth). There's a birthday-plagued, morose guy (Paul Rudd) who 
was just dumped by his performance artist girlfriend (Janeane Garafolo), 
on the town with his best bud (Courtney Love), who offers herself as a 
birthday present to him to cheer him up. There's a clumsy, young deb 
(Kate Hudson, daughter to Goldie Hawn) who's out with the guy who robbed 
her of her virginity the night before (Jay Mohr). There's a bartender 
(Ben Affleck), who's being constantly eyeballed but never followed 
through with. There's two girls (Nicole Parker and Angela Featherstone) 
who are going to the party with the one's Scot boyfriend (Brian 
McCardie), who is then dumped beforehand. And there's the Scot's ex 
(Martha Plimpton), the girl who's throwing the party. This is all tied 
together by a joyful cabbie (Dave Chapelle), who ends up giving at least 
most of them a ride during the film, and dispenses a bit of advice free 
of charge.
It's all incredibly fake, and not only does every single plot thread 
seem like it'd fit in comfortably with a sitcom on NBC, it also feels 
incredibly cliched and reminiscent of something else that wasn't much 
fun the first time around. And of the entire cast, several of them very 
good actors, only three make any kind of impression: Rudd, who merely 
shows that he's one of the more charismatic and likable actors around 
once again; Love, who shows that she can do fluff as well as more 
dramatic stuff; and Hudson, the biggest surprise of the movie, who gives 
if not a minor-star-making performance, at least a memorable one. She 
posesses something that's not unlike her own mother's early charm: she's 
flustered, cute, and unpredicatable, and whenever she was on screen, I 
was always interested in seeing what bizarre nuance she'd come up with 
next, and was for the most part pleased. Everyone else, though, is just 
so-so, even Ricci, usually the only good thing amongst a pile of crap 
(see, or rather don't see, "Pecker"), though both Afflecks turn in at 
least aimable performances (Casey, in fact, was much more digestable 
here than in "Hunting" - a couple more roles, and he could be even above 
average someday). But everyone else slips into dullsville, sacked with 
lame roles that require them to spout bad dialogue and go through cheap, 
petty emotions, and, well, smoke cigarettes (haven't seen smoking this 
fake since Faye Dunaway in "Bonnie and Clyde").
And I could very well go on from here, blasting every part of it, 
destroying everything that this film stands for, point out that the sole 
reason this takes place in the 80s is for a cheap, retro feel, and make 
hyperbolic statements like "'200 Cigarettes' represents the dreg of our 
country's filmmaking capacity and the low end of the indie field"...but 
I shan't, because, truth be told, I nearly liked this film. The opening 
almost killed it immediately, and its introduction to our cast of 
characters was hardly at all proimising. But after awhile, as slight as 
the film as a whole was, it grew on me, and even if I wasn't flat-out 
enjoying it, I was at least occasionally grimacing and even chuckling 
here and there at things I just knew I shouldn't dare chuckle at. Even 
with terrible dialogue and bad subplots throughout that weren't tres 
involving, it has an energy that makes up for a bit of the crapness of 
the whole, even if it only makes up for about half of it. The 
performances were genuinely likable by all, if not too memorable, and I 
was shocked to see that I soon started caring about the whole Rudd/Love 
subplot, and that I was soon looking forward to it coming up again via 
the plot rotation.
But there's still more to not like than to like here, and all I can say 
is that though it's not annoying like "Can't Hardly Wait" or other 
Hughes-ian films, it's not exactly a wonderful, even totally likable 
flick. Not more than week after seeing it, I'm surprised that I can 
remember so much about it. Luckily, it's mostly the stuff that I did 
like about it (Love, Rudd, Hudson, for instance), 'cause otherwise it'd 
be a pretty much all scathing review. As such, it's nearly a guilty 
pleasure, and my subsequent rating seems balls-out generous for a movie 
I nearly despised if it hadn't become so progressively likable.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
Director: Betty Thomas
Writers: Nat Mauldin and Larry Levin (based on the novel by Hugh
Lofting)
Starring: Eddie Murphy, Ossie Davis, Kristen Wilson, Oliver Platt,
Richard Schiff, Jeffrey Tambor, Kyla Pratt, Ramon-Simone, Peter Boyle,
Norm MacDonald, Chris Rock, Albert Brooks, Reni Santoni, John Leguizamo,
Julie Kavner, Gary Shandling, Ellen DeGeneres, Brian Doyle-Murphy, Jenna
Elfman, Gilbert Gottfried, Paul Reubens, Jonathan Lipnicki
I just can't believe there was actually a bit of controversy surrounding
this film.  Though aimed specifically at children (and those of childish
minds), this film was awarded a "PG-13" rating for basically toilet
humor, and it still grossed well over one hundred million.  But upon its
release, many critics were almost brutal in their dislike for the film.
Nathaniel R. Atcheson, for instance, completely flew off the handle and
said that this film made him want to vomit.  "Feces are never funny," he
proclaimed, as he completely dismissed toilet humor as an adequate
artform,  especially not as entertainment for kids.  Roger Ebert rebuked
that (though not directly).  In his review, he claimed that toilet humor
is not at all a bad thing, and in fact is part of the grounds for
developing a sense of humor.  I agree.  There are no rules to comedy,
and in fact anything can work as humor - that's the point of it:
laughing at the shit life drops on us, so to speak.  In fact, if I had
not been taught at a very young age to laugh at flatuation, I would have
never survived the way Elementary School and Junior High chose to
torment me because of the pronunication of my last name (and they didn't
even know what a "prig" was).
Ebert awarded the film a 3-star recommendation because of this.  I won't
even come close to taking it that far.  Yes, I agree that toilet humor
is a valid type of comedy, as I agree that anything and everything can
be a valid type of comedy.  But that doesn't mean this new adaptation of
"Dr. Dolittle" is actually funny, just because it was attacked for its
application of toilet humor.  In fact, I think I may have grimaced once,
if not twice, during the entire length of this film.  The problem, I
fear, is not in its tone or all that other bullshit it's been attacked
for, but rather in its actual jokes.  There's one thing wrong with them:
they're not funny.  You've heard a bad joke, right?  Not the kind that
offends you or anything, but instead the kind that isn't even worth
acknowledgement because it's just so unhilarious.  Well, think of an
entire 90 minutes of jokes exactly like that, and you have the newly
enhanced "Dr. Dolittle," which has nothing to do with the original Rex
Harrison musical classic except that for namesake and its very basic
skin-and-bones gimmick (that a man can hear animals talk).
The fact that this is a loose remake is not a problem, though: I don't
care what they do with a remake, even if they decided to remake "Citizen
Kane" starring Carrot Top; as long as they just made it work.  This one
doesn't, and it's not even in the plotting.  This one deals with a John
Dolittle (Eddie Murphy) who, as a kid, could hear animals talk, notably
his dog/best friend (voiced by Ellen Degeneres), but lost the ability
when his father (Ossie Davis) took the dog away.  He's grown up to be a
successful doctor, with a pretty wife (Kristen Wilson), and two nice
daughters (Kyla Pratt and "The Cosby Show"'s Ramon-Simone), and has
since forgotten all about his childhood ability.  One day, for no real
reason, animals start talking to him, first by a dog named Lucky (voiced
by Norm MacDonald), who is almost hit by him when driving, and then by
numerous others.
This begins to tax on his sanity, and when no one believes him, and he's
making unbelievably awkward decisions to accomodate his ability (such as
helping all the animals like the world's greatest veteranarian so
they'll just leave him alone - yeah, that's your cure, John), he winds
up in a nuthouse.  Meanwhile, his hospital staff is merging with another
one (in the form of Peter Boyle) and his two head assistants are divided
into the conservative nice guy (underrated character actor Richard
Schiff) and greedy-as-balls pseudo-villain (the great Oliver Platt), so
there's a bit of forced let's-take-up-some-screen-time conflict going on
other than the animals/sanity bit.
The most humorous thing about this film is the celebrities who play the
animals, but not really because of the writing involved.  I more or less
was mildly amused throughout the film as I distracted myself from the
boredom I had succumb to by playing "Guess Whose Voice That Is?"  Chris
Rock pops up as a guinea pig.  John Leguiziamo shows up as a rat.  Julie
Kavner and Gary Shandling make a cameo as a pair of bickering pigeons.
And (my favorite) Albert Brooks stars as a suicidal tiger.  Not that
their scenes are actually gut-bursting or anything.  Brooks, especially,
isn't given anything very interesting to talk about, even when it has
the potential to be the funniest thing about the movie (and it probably
is anyway).  Instead, his subplot is played nearly straight, and since
the idea of a sucidal tiger can probably only be played as comedy, his
subplot comes off as disturbingly, well, Live-Action-Disney-esque.
Never would I have thought that a side story involving a suicidal tiger
would be the cherry on the top of a dramatic arc, but then again, I can
be easily surprised.
The handling of the animals should have worked, though, as the
foundation of the comedy in this film.  There are many opportunities for
jokes, and it has the right fallacy: that the animals are exactly like
humans personality-wise, but have bitchings about their own kind of
lives.  Nothing they say is particularly humorous, though, and with
Murphy playing the straight man (and nicely, I should add - though this
film doesn't require old school Eddie Murphy tactics, it does show great
modesty on his behalf...or, at the very least, insecurity to take a big
comic risk after the result of his early-to-mid 90s career), there's
really nothing to keep interest.  The result is that the film is a big
fat bore, and after about a half hour or so of unfunny funniness, I
began checking my watch repeatedly, wondering how long I had left until
I could watch something with a little more class.  Say, "Dumb and
Dumber."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Child's Play (1988)
Director: Tom Holland
Writers: Don Mancini, John Lafia, and Tom Holland
Starring: Catherine Hicks, Alex Vincent, Chris Surrandon, Brad Douriff,
Dinah Manoff, Tommy Swerdlow, Jack Colvin, Neil Guintoli
We all know the fate of "Child's Play," which is the same for almost any
film these days that does marginally well financially: Sequel Hell.
With the newest installment in the quasi-popular series currently out
(that would be "Bride of Chucky" - and it grossed 11 million in its
opening weekend, which I think is the sign of the apocalypse number
five), it's kinda fun to go back and see how it all began rougly ten
years ago with the original, a task which is a retread for some, and for
others (namely myself) a chance to see what all the fuss was about.
Alas, the original "Child's Play" actually isn't that bad.  Even seeing
it in the tiny, claustrophobic, and mechanically-challenged theatre at
my college wasn't the horribly dull experience I thought it would be,
not just because of the nicely rowdy crowd (which you almost need to
watch a film like this - and if you don't believe me, try and watch this
flick by yourself one day), but because as a whole, this isn't a bad
movie.  It's not great, but it does have two things that many horror
films like this one don't have: 1) a rather nifty premise, and 2) a
sense of humor, both which save this from Horror Hell, which is
precisely where, say, "I Know What You Did Last Summer" has recently
gone.
The premise of "Child's Play" is that a serial killer named Charles Lee
Ray (Brad Douriff) is shot and almost killed by a Chicago hard-boiled
detective (Chris Surrandon - see what happens to some Oscar nominees?),
and before he dies, utters a voodoo chant that sends his soul directly
into a kid's doll called Chucky, a doll which has got to be the
scariest-looking kid's doll I've ever seen.  The next day, a bum who's
stolen it sells it to single-mother Karen Barclay (Catherine Hicks), who
then gives it to her young son Andy (Alex Vincent) for his birthday.
Of course Chucky begins talking to the kid and trying to find a way to
get out of the doll, but certain twists come up.  Like the guy he
learned voodoo from reveals to him that the only way to break the curse
is to take over the body of the first person he told he was inside the
doll, that being Andy.  And soon enough, Chucky is killing people either
for revenge or for what seems like fun, and people are discovering that
Chucky isn't just a kiddie doll one by one.
The idea is a neat one, ripe for lots of comic terror, and luckily it
utlizes a lot of that.  It plays with an idea stolen from a classic
Looney Toons short that when someone knows that Chucky is alive, they
tell people about it, but when he tries to prove themselves, Chucky does
nothing, and everyone thinks they're crazy.  It plays with this, as well
as the whole child-like thought that dolls and toys come to life, and
even manages to cram in a couple really frightening moments.  Even if
there's an entire sequence devoted to cliches (a woman alone in a house
hears a noise, goes to investigate it, and finds nothing, but wait for
the kicker a second later!), there's also a harrowing car ride with
Chucky trying to knife the detective from the back seat, and then trying
to attack him when the car finally crashes, leaving the viewer with at
least rather visceral exprience.
The ending is rather fun, as well, albeit a tad too drawn-out (about
four different endings, maybe five), and the characters are more
intelligent than the average horror film line-up, making them easier to
sympathize with.  If there's one horrible thing about many horror films,
it's that the protagonists are morons who you can't help but shout
obscenities at, and for the most part, "Child's Play" steers away from
that.  And most of all, the Chucky character is a good one, not just
because he provides instant comic relief (LOOK!  That doll's moving on
its own!), but because he's a generally scary character.
If there's anything really wrong with "Child's Play," it's that it's too
trite and has too less self esteem.  At almost 90 minutes, "Child's
Play" features way too less to be a real classic of horror.  It throws
itself into a simple three act set-up that renders it quick and almost
forgettable if it weren't for the fact that the film deals with a
psychotic doll.  If the film had more confidence in what it was
presenting, it would really push the envelope and become even more than
just a short bit of horror escapism, which is precisely why this kind of
film is only memorable as a cheap little horor film...which isn't
necessarily a bad thing.  As such, "Child's Play" is content to be just
the short, typical horror film, but saves itself via a sense of humor
and a nice quasi-campy feel that makes it much more enjoyable than the
average short, typical horror film.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
Director: Brett Ratner
Writers: Jim Kouf and Ross LaManna (story by LaManna)
Starring: Jackie Chan, Chris Tucker, Tom Wilkinson, Elizabeth Peńa, Mark
Rolston, Tzi Ma, Rex Linn, Ken Leung, Julia Hsu, Chris Penn, Philip
Baker Hall
The buddy pic is easily one of the most tiresome and overused formulas
for a film we've ever had, but for some reason, the Hollywood machine
pumps a couple out every year, munundating all of us with half-assed
storylines, and mispaired pairs that make for a really unenjoyable
movie.  In theory, then, "Rush Hour" should be no exception.  Chris
Tucker is still a bit iffy, with his helium-affected motor mouth being
occasionally amusing, but never rather funny (do any of you remember how
the film stopped when he came on screen in "The Fifth Element?").  And
Jackie Chan's one of the world's greatest entertainers, a dare devil
comic action hero with the best coordination and control over all bodily
movements I've ever seen.  The pairing of these two just shouldn't work
out, and it should have been forgettable.
Well, yes, it's rather forgettable, but that doesn't mean it's not
actually charming when watching it.  "Rush Hour" is not a great buddy
pic like, say, "Lethal Weapon," and in about a year, everyone will be
wondering what all the fuss was about.  In short, this is no classic,
and I doubt there'll be a successful franchise.  But not every buddy
pic, or any film for that matter, has to do that.  Some can be just
entertaining, and for an hour and a half, it is.  If it's content to be
just good, then there's nothing really wrong with that.
"Rush Hour" takes advantage of the Hong Kong transfer of power in '97,
as a couple films this year have ("Chinese Box" and, most recently and
most appallingly, "Knock Off"), and uses the arrival of the Chinese
Consul in L.A. (Tzi Ma) to bring about an elaborate kidnapping scheme by
an underground villain, dubbed JunTao.  The FBI wants to help out, but
so do the LAPD, but the Consul wants to hire an old friend of his,
Inspector Lee (Chan), to come in.  He does, but the LAPD gives him over
to their most troublesome detective, James Carter (Tucker), a reckless,
goofy, but driven detective who doesn't like for one second that he's
been saddled with Lee.
"Rush Hour" wastes no time in utilizing the old cliches, including the
beloved first meeting where they hate eachother, but slowly growing to
respect their own traits and rub off on one another.  In one scene, they
go into a pool hall for some information, and after an admittingly funny
faux pas, Chan is found fighting the inhabitants of the ghetto hall,
much to the distaste of Tucker, but they gradually like eachother,
bringing about the scene where they swap personal likes and dislikes.
Oh, and the plot still has to be resolved, but you know it'll be handled
without the least bit of care.  You can guess who JunTao is fairly early
on (hint: he's British, therefore he's evil), and the scenes involving
the kidnapping instead come off as comic action sequences without a ton
of suspense, but a lot of joking around.  Tucker says a couple of
sarcastic remarks and his overblown self confidence gets him in some
trouble, and then Chan comes in with his Chaplin-esque comic timing,
then kicks some ass the way only he can.  And so forth.
What's surprising is that though this should be crap, and perhaps it is,
it doesn't come off that way.  The reason is because of Chan and
Tucker.  Their chemistry is extremely good, and they work well together
while still retaining each of their own respective individual traits
(even Tucker comes off as charmingly humorous).  Many buddy pics forget
about chemistry, but this is essential to creating a film that is
entertaining and engrossing, both which "Rush Hour" is, and why so many
people are actually enjoying it.  It's not because of the plot, which is
so arbitrary it's a wonder actors like Tom Wilkinson, Elizabeth Peńa,
and Philip Baker Hall would sign on for any other reason than an easy
pay check.
But Chan and Tucker aren't the only reason this is likable.  It has a
light feel to it that makes it easier to intake, and allows goodness to
seep in not just from Chan and Tucker, but also from other members of
the cast and other assortment facets of the film.  Although cliched and
not terribly suspenseful, the action sequences are surprisingly adept
and supply entertainment.  I liked some of those added nuances, like the
handling of the kidnapped daughter as a real form of personality (when
saved by Chan, she kicks him for not saving her earlier).  And
Wilkinson, a great actor who's been in everything these days (notably
"The Full Monty," in which he was brilliant), has an icy dignity he
brings to the role of the villain, as if he's being a good sport about
being in his first big American movie ("I know I'm doing this mostly for
money and exposure, but what the hell - I'll have some real fun with
this role.").
But when you really come down to it, it's mostly the buddy chemistry
that keeps this afloat.  It lives and dies with the casting of the
leads, and luckily Chan and Tucker are so amiable apart and together
that the film is a slight success.  It's not incredibly ambitious, but
for awhile, it's mildly distracting, which is more than you can say for
a lot of the films Hollywood is putting out these days, I suppose.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Dogme 1 - Festen (1998)
Director: Thomas Vinterberg
Writers: Thomas Vinterberg and Mogens Rukov (from an idea by Thomas
Vinterberg)
Starring: Ulrich Thomsen, Henning Mortizen, Thomas Bo Larsen, Paprika
Steen, Birthe Neumann, Trine Dyrholm, Helle Dolleris, Therese Glahn,
Klaus Bondam, Bjarne Henriksen, Gbatokai Dakinah
"The Celebration" is one of an elite kind of films that is completely
absorbant.  You know, where you sit down to watch it, and no matter what
you've heard about it before, you just can't help but be totally drawn
into its story and shocked by every single turn that occurs.  I prefer
films like these because these are what the best kind of films are
like.  I don't really feel there are to be any real "rules" for cinema;
a film can do anything, as long as it makes it work.  But I do ask that
all films have one thing in common: they create experiences.  When I
watch a film, no matter what kind of film it is, I want to be able to
take certain memories along with me.  "The Celebration" is great because
it's chock full of those.  It creates a world so completely realistic
that everything that occurs is as memorable as the little instances of
life that catch your attention and stay with you for the rest of your
life.  And then it makes things just a tad bit farscial, just to make
sure you're paying attention, which you are because what transpires is
just so goddam interesting that if you were to ever feel bored, then
you're of your attention span needs a bit of a tuning-up.
The story takes place at the extravagant home of an aging patriarch
(Henning Mortizen), who has just turned 60 and is having a party thrown
for him.  All his friends and family turn up, and for the first half
hour, we get introduced to everyone, simplistically and realistically
(no aggravatingly condescending posing for the camera deals here).  The
eldest son, Christian (Ulrich Thomsen, looking a bit like a young
Malcolm McDowell), is the first to be seen in the film, walking to his
father's home.  His brother, Michael (Thomas Bo Larsen), drives by,
pulls over, greets him, then kicks his family out of the car, forcing
them to walk to the estate, just so Christian can be comfortable.  We
then meet Helene (Paprika Steen), their sister, a woman who always seems
to be stressed-out, who invites the driver of her car (Gbatokai
Dakinah), an American, to to come join her at the party she's going to.
Once they're all there and settled in, the party begins, and as custom,
the eldest son has to make a speech to his dad, so Christian stands up,
at the head of the table, and reveals the film's punchline: his father
raped all his children at a young age.  But since this is a
family/friends affair, his confession becomes more detested than the
supposed truth, and is simply brushed off despite his efforts, and what
transpires is sorta like Jerry Springer crossed with Jean Renoir, and
it's all terribly interesting to watch.  Twists occur, and soon the film
has taken on a nearly-farsical nature, but still seems realistic because
the people involved really feel like they could reach such ends.
The most notorious thing about this film, which has been getting the
most notice, though, is that the director, Thomas Vinterberg has shot it
in a completely awkward fashion.  As a member of the Danish filmmakers
clan, Dogme 95, a group that has vowed to oppose "the auteur concept,
make-up, illusions, and dramaturgical predictability" so that they may
"purge film so that once again the inner lives of the characters justify
the plot."  I have not seen "Breaking the Waves," the other notable film
by a member of this group (Lars Von Trier, to be exact), but "The
Celebration" works exquisitely in this department.  It feels like
reality, like you're actually watching real people and not actors, and
as a major pointer, has been shot on video.  As a result, it looks more
like the home movies you never dare shot of your family than an actual
film, but always wanted to.  We see key moments in people's lives that
they wouldn't dare show to the world, and it captures the farscial
comedy of life so accurately and acutely that this style, as
ironically-showmanship as it really is, works perfectly for the nature
of the film.
The key, though, to this film, and the reason it's not just a cool
Danish import, is because this film is not about revealing the truth as
much as it is about the way people react to such an explosive truth.
Throughout the film, we see a completely realized debate over the truth
and the effects it has on the lives of those who have learned to live
with lies, a debate so three-dimensional that it could easily blow
Oliver Stone and his the-truth-at-all-costs reasoning out of the water.
Of course it was not right for the father to rape his children, and of
course, they couldn't have fought back then, and of course this has
created scarring suppression inside them.  And yes, it's thearapeutic
for one to release the truth years later, when they know it could easily
destroy the one who emotionally destroyed them earlier.  But then again,
the father, after all, is not a totally bad guy, and we can see the
emotional complications that arise thanks to a performance by Mortizen
which is just so great and touching that while we do believe that he
could have raped his children years earlier, we also see a man who has
also learned to live with what he's done, and deep down, feels true
guilt that is only now beginning to surface.  The final scene, involving
Mortizen and everyone else, is utterly devastating, thanks to him and
Thomsen, whose performance is utterly flawless and equally emotionally
complex.
Everyone else is flawless as well - the actors never seem to be stepping
into the shoes of their characters as much as they do walking
comfortably in them.  The actors or writers have not made the mistake to
judge these characters in the slightest: there are no whites or blacks
but instead all grays, exactly like life.  As such, "The Celebration"
may be the one truly bizarro film of the year: a work of art so eerily
close to reality that it's utterly disturbing and utterly fascinating.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
Director: Bill Condon
Writer: Bill Condon (based on the novel "Father of Frankenstein" by
Christopher Bram)
Starring: Ian McKellen, Brendan Fraser, Lynn Redgrave, Lolita
Davidovich, David Dukes, Kevin J. O'Connor, Mark Kiely, Jack Plotnick,
Rosalind Ayres, Jack Betts
Like "Deep Impact" and "Armageddon," "Antz" and "A Bug's Life," and
"Deep Rising" and "Virus," "Love and Death on Long Island" and "Gods and
Monsters" feel eerily like the exact same movie, released (or supposed
to be released) within months of eachother for extra effect.  The
former's a wonderfully droll piece of cinema, and a witty rethinking of
"Death in Venice"; the latter's a much-similar, much more serious
rethinking of the final days in the life of famous Hollywood director
James Whale (of the first two Frankenstein pics fame) that only borrows
from some of the elements of the former's source material (i.e. the
protagonist dies).  Both deal with an older man's love for a younger
man, but the former only dealt with it in terms of non-sexual love and
came off with clever bits of irony and whatnot (whatever it was, it was
damned entertaining), the latter has the protagonist being notoriously
gay, and his love for the younger man being that of the physical kind
only blossoming into the emotional kind.  Both films are still rather
similar, with the only other major difference being that it's the older
man as the celebrity this time, and, of course, that this one's far less
interesting nor successful as the other one.
I can only attribute this not to the film's lack of ambiguity in its
subject (though, for the record, the older man's love is still rather
ambiguous), but to other elements that seem to distract and hurt the
otherwise very good film that is "Gods and Monsters."  Most of the film
is a series of chats between Whale (played magnificently by Ian
McKellen) and his gardner/object of obsession, Clay Boone (Brendan
Fraser), where they exchange stories and respective thoughts, and all
this is incredibly interesting for being not much than long talky
scenes.  McKellen, white-haired and polished, and Boone, blockheaded but
surprisingly intelligent and understanding, share a very complex
relationship that is the heart and major strength of the film.  Starting
off as a mere obsession with Whale's perception of physical beauty (in a
way, Boone resembles the monster in his movies), we see their
relationship turn from physical love on the part of Boone to joint
respect from eachother and then to self-centered mooching, and it's all
done with a gentle screenwriting touch by the director himself, Bill
Condon.
It's most of everything else in the film that doesn't work as well as
the main section, ranging from partially sucessful to downright sloppy.
For example, much is made of Whale's bitterness over his failing health,
and the fact that his mind is slowly going, so every now and then, we
get flashbacks to memories, most of them traumatic, so we see that we
see that he cherishes what he will soon no longer have.  But these only
pop up sporadically, albeit nicely when they do, while we are also
subjected to melodramatic scenes where Whale is physically crippled by
his past or driven to unbridled anger at who he's talking to.  In a
silly scene towards the beginning, Whale is giving an interview to an
effeminate collegiate reporter wherein every question Whale answers
results in the removal of one article of the reporter's clothing when he
suddenly suffers a minor stroke.  Later on, he screams at Boone for
allowing him to uncover the wounds of the past.  Both scenes would
otherwise be fine, but they're handled in such an overly-dramatic tone
that they're downright silly and distracting from the overall quaintness
of the film.  Nothing's as silly, though, as the sloppy depth the film
tries for in terms of the Frankenstein-esque relationship between the
main characters, Whale being the doctor, Boone being the monster, and
Whale's german housemaid (Lynn Redgrave) being, oh, Igor.  And
gotinheimel, did it actually have to recreate a scene straight from
"Sunset Boulevard" and then culminate it with a maudlin final reel that
only makes the film's finale (Whale's suicide, also eerily from "Sunset
Boulevard") seem contrived when, of course, it damn well shouldn't.
When it's dealing with the Whale/Boone relationship, it's wonderfully
subtle and refreshingly interesting.  When it ventures away from it,
it's either too silly (the interview scene, for one) or too
over-the-top, particuarly when it comes to Boone's outside life, which
is so sloppily-conceived that it either had to be longer or cut out
completely (the final scene, in particular, reduces it to merely being
about how an everyday schmuck knew a famous member of Hollywood once
upon a time).  I wanted to see more about Whale, though, and maybe even
more about Boone, though the Whale bits interested so much more that
anytime it cut to Boone's outside life, I was merely waiting for them to
cut to Whale.  It'd be nice to see more of his past life, more
flashbacks, some more detail (his flashback to making "Bride of
Frankenstein" is wonderful, to say the least), though at least it gave
some more insight into watching his films (I'll probably never be able
to watch "Bride of..." again without thinking of it as a film about a
bunch of queens, or so they say).  But as such, none of it is as
well-documented as the scenes between the two of them - they don't seem
fake and contrived like other parts of the film, and if it had been more
about the two of them as a unit, and how they were able to find
something more to life by knowing eachother, I'd say it was one of the
best films of the year hands-down.
This is mostly due to great performances, though, by McKellen and
Fraser.  I, at least, have no doubt in the pure competence of McKellen -
he's one of the best actors working today (for more mainstream
audiences, he was the only truly good thing about "Apt Pupil," and
otherwise shoddy affair), and what's great about this performance is
that it's not merely a typical posh homosexual role, but that it's a
nuanced, sad, and deft performance - he makes Whale effortlessly
complex, so that we don't immediately notice what he's brought to his
role (in fact, along with Nolte and Hanks, I'd say that if the Academy
knows anything, they'll pick one of these three as the winner - all
three gave such subtle performances that you hardly knew they were
acting).  Fraser, shockingly enough, is excellent as well.  He makes
Boone a surprise - a pretty much intelligent working man who doesn't
succumb to cliches, and only seems minorly disturbed when he discovers,
halfway through the film, that the man he's been hanging around with is
gay.  I also liked how he killed off any suspicion about a potential
tryst between the two men - any such idea would be distracting to their
overall relationship (though, towards the end, the homoeroticism does
nearly reach the surface, and mistakingly so).
Let's say, for the sake of argument, that they had been given a better
script, one that was longer and dealt more with their outside
relationships, making their moments together even more poignant and even
more interesting.  As such, it feels just like the kind of film that is
overpraised while another one is dramatically underpraised.  This one
did have a better performance from the lead actor (though, for the
record, John Hurt is pretty damned close in his dramatic power to
McKellen), but the other one was far more subtler, and deepened the
relationship in an almost effortless fashion, all while retaining a
droll tone that was one of the film's biggest successes (best of all, it
never for a second felt smug and/or cheap).  The tone Condon has adapted
for this film is far more maudlin and even occasionally schizophrenic -
over-the-top funny, then subtly droll, then over-the-top dramatic - he
even tosses in a line from Whale about how the monsters are, *gasp*,
inside him - gimme a break (and what of Mr. Condon's direction?  Well,
it's mostly competent, but nothing too remarkable: a series of
alternating shots, occasionally laced with a distracting DePalma-esque
wide shot of a close-up/things in the distance, showing off the coveted
depth-of-field technique).  And throughout, I just kept on waiting for
the two actors to get together again and share a conversation once
again.  Pity some actors are forced to give great performances in films
that are only half-way wonderful.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
Director: Martin Brest
Writers: Ron Osborn, Jeff Reno, Kevin Wade, and Bo Goldman
Starring: Brad Pitt, Anthony Hopkins, Claire Forlani, Jake Weber, Marcia
Gay Harden, Jeffrey Tambor, David S. Howard, Lois Kelly-Miller
Many of the criticisms aimed at "Meet Joe Black" have been that it's too
long, too maudlin, too uninsightful for a movie about death.  And I'm
not going to rebuke those as much as I am going to say that those aren't
exactly negative pointers.  Yes, "Meet Joe Black" is three hours when it
could have been two.  Yes, "Meet Joe Black" is melodramatic and
long-winded when it could be light and easier-to-digest.  And yes, it's
less like "The Seventh Seal" and more like a Jackie Collins book in
terms of how insightful it is.  But all I can say is no, it's not a
great film, and its mere 45 or so million dollar gross is a sign of Brad
Pitt's dwindling popularity as far as the cinema goes, but it's also
engaging and entertaining in a strange, pleasing way.  I like that this
film is drawn-out and three hours long...in fact, the three hours don't
exactly fly by as much as they pass by without pain.  Those who are
complaining about three hours being a tough sit are those who can't
stand any movie that's longer than and hour and a half and three hours
means an hour and a half they don't have to complain about how long it
was.
All I can say is "Meet Joe Black" held my interest while never involving
me too deeply that if I had never seen it, I wouldn't regret it.  It is,
though, beatiful to look at.  The cinematography is some of the best of
the year, and the production design is almost operatic in its
lavishness.  This all gives it a dour, reserved tone, with nothing but
earth colors as our entire world, and Martin Brest's direction is slow
and stately, as if he were telling his story like a great novel inspired
by D.H. Lawrence.  Combine this with a mix of pretentious and
over-handed messages about life and death, an ironic love story, and a
bizarre sense of wit, and you basically have "Meet Joe Black."
The story of death visiting a dying billionaire and falling in love with
his daughter has been done before (in fact, this is a pseudo-remake of
"Death Takes a Holiday" starring Frederic March), but Brest tells it
like it was the greatest story of all time, yet with a lack of security
apparent in its numerous almost-self-concious asides that this is all a
big joke.  Death, dubbed Joe Black, falls madly in love with the
billionaire's daughter, and she with him, much to the dismay of the
billionaire who is not only selfishly mad that the being who's taking
him away from life is also making his beloved kin feel so alive, and
Brest milks this for all the melodrama that he possibly can, but then
pulls back at the last second to make a joke about it all (one
accidental example of this is a death scene in the beginning which
starts out poignant, but ends up being hands-down this year's most
hilarious unintentional laugh).
By refusing to push the envelope all the way, and really submerge the
film in either being a completely funny film or a completely
melodramatic film (either, which would make for a great film, if handled
correctly from that point on), he sits on the fence, and never allows
the dramatic saps in the audience to ever get their full money's worth,
or the more cynical ones to either.  Since, depending on my mood, I can
be either, "Meet Joe Black" worked for me, but not exactly in spades.
Though the film is never really erratic in its mood swings, it's never
disappointing, thanks to the way it's paced, but it's not exactly
fulfilling either.  Though we're pretty sure of the daughter's love for
Joe, we're never sure of Joe's.
This is pretty much attributed to the respective performances.  The
daughter, played by Claire Forlaini, looks at Joe with her gorgeous eyes
and shows no doubt in her mind that she is completely enthralled by him,
and every time she's around him, seems to be just about to break down
into his arms, while when she's not around him, seems content in her
individuality.  Joe, played by Brad Pitt, is pretty much on the
contrary.  Obsessed with making Joe a complete fish out of water, Pitt
alienates his character from everyone else's, going as far as looking
completely relaxed in his awkwardness and speaking in a slow and
straight-forward manner.  And throughout the film, he puts on an
ignorant half-smile, as if he were a completely unaffected by everything
that happens to him, so that when he finally does bed Forlaini, he has
the exact same expression on his face that he does when he first tastes
peanut butter (which brings out the third funniest post-coital comment
I've ever heard in a movie - the first two being from "Annie Hall": "I
think I'm getting some feeling back in my jaw" and "As Balsac said,
'there goes another novel.'").
Maybe this is what the film was going for - that the usual human
emotions that take up the different realms of satisfaction aren't going
to be different for someone who doesn't know anything about our own
society.  But whatever the point was, Pitt's performance just doesn't
completely work.  He never seems to be going through any real changes,
and we soon just give up on his character and look at the others' and
how they're affected by what happens.  Forlaini is rather magnificent,
at least for a big budget romantic comedy like this, and Anthony
Hopkins, saddled with the role of the dying billionaire, brings the kind
of Shakespearean-actor depth to his role that he brought to this
summer's "The Mask of Zorro."  The two are always wonderful to watch, as
are Jeffrey Tambor (playing a business associate-cum-relative by
marriage) and Jake Weber (playing the mischevious and diabolical
boyfriend to Forlaini with delicious sarcasm - you hate him but you'd be
heartbroken if he was ever defeated, and he is).
In fact, everything in "Meet Joe Black" is beautiful to look at, even
"Sir" Hopkins (so much that afterwards I finally rented the
Mamet-scripted "The Edge" just to watch him speak Mamet's wonderful
dialogue), so much that I couldn't help but be involved in it.  It's
silly and predictable, but it has the charm of a trash novel you read
while on vacation: you pick it up, are involved in the character's
lives, and when it's done with, you place it on a bookshelf never to be
picked up or thought of deeply again, unless you're writing a review of
it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Director: Tony Scott
Writer: David Marconi
Starring: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean,
Barry Pepper, Jack Black, Seth Green, Jamie Kennedy, Ian Hart, Lisa
Bonet, Jake Busey, Scott Caan, Jason Lee, Stuart Wilson, Tom Sizemore,
Gabriel Byrne, James LeGros, Jason Robards, Phil Hawn, Dan Butler,
Philip Baker Hall
With the sudden liberal emergence of personal privacy abounding in the
news lately, what with that whole Clinton thing going on (you know, 100
million bucks to discover the president got boinked by an intern - oh,
please, government, waste my taxes just a bit more, would you?), it's
about time Tony Scott helmed the newest action pic disguised as an
important if not slightly ignorant social statement.  With this and
"Crimson Tide," he's created two successfully chilly films that are
interesting, exciting, even pretty smart, but never totally riveting as
cinema, and the problem I think with each of these films is that each
film is too obsessed with its message to ever be really satisfying, and
too obsessed with looking all cutting edge to ever be totally smart.
That film dealt with a civil war inside a nuclear submarine over whether
or not to follow rules or question them, and was appropriately scary and
all, but never totally thrilling or overly brilliant.
"Enemy of the State" is the same way: it's engrossing for its entire
running time, and it's scary the way that it shows a man's decent into
kafkaism, but it's too technical.  It's too cold and not as fascinating
or exciting as it could be.  It casts Will Smith, one of the better big
budget leading men in movies these days because he's charming and witty
and never uninteresting, and hopes that his charisma can make up for his
character not being well developed enough to really be a person.  I hate
to do this, but last year's film "The Game" got it damn perfect: it
casts Michael Douglas as a deeply flawed human being, a man who is cold
and has cut off everyone from his life, and then pulls everything he
thought he had as a security blanket away from him and watched what
happened.  The result was not only a film that was exciting and
chilling, but also the best mindfuck of the entire year.  Not that I
want every kafkaesque film to be "The Game" (this year's "The Spanish
Prisoner" succeeds with less thrills and chills), but it should be an
example of what works and what doesn't.
Will Smith's character is, frankly, too perfect, at least too movie
perfect.  He had an affair with another woman (Lisa Bonet, ha ha), but
his relationship with his wife (Regina King) is basically fine
regardless.  He has a kid, and he's raking in money as a lawyer, albeit
a very good and reasonably moral one.  So he generally doesn't have any
real problems as a human being, and is therefore boring...except that he
is played by Will Smith, who embodies him with about as much Will Smith
charm as he can without entering "ID4"/"Men in Black" territory.  He's a
good dramatic actor (just see the first half hour of "Six Degrees of
Separation" for proof of this, not that he isn't great the whole time),
and here, he makes his character likable and sympathetic without any
real strain on his character, which makes the film lack any real deep
interesting qualities.
Smith becomes involved in a mass conspiracy involving the assasination
of a Senator opposed to a government law that would create world
surveillance, extinguishing privacy as we know it from the world, under
the pretense that it would make crime easier to control, when he is
passed a disk of the event caught on tape by an outside party (a nature
observer played by, uh, Jason Lee).  The government wants the disk, and
is prepared to destroy his life to get it.  As Smith's plight is
dramatized, we are introduced to the masterminds who surveillance him,
sitting in vans disguised as other businesses, staring at computers and
pulling out tricks faster than a speeding bullet.  These guys (played by
Jack Black, Jamie Kennedy, and Seth Green) are the most interesting part
of this film because they're, well, fascinating: they're doing their
jobs, which are evil, but the film doesn't view them as such, and they
almost become our friends.  We like these guys for the sole reason that
the film doesn't automatically judge them as the villains.  They're also
scary because we get the idea that they're not fully aware of the impact
their jobs have on the world.  It's as if they're obsessed with their
jobs, not because they're evil, but because, hey, it's a fun job, and no
one else can do it like them.
Unfortunately, this also backfires a bit on the film: instead of being
the flashlight in the darkened room that "The Game" was, you see
everything, and are thus not as freaked out because you know what is
going on.  Sure, you're chilled, but you're not exacty freaked out by
what's going on.  But what do you expect from Tony Scott, the man who
never met a five-second piece of film he ever liked.  He's a not-bad
director because, hell, he is always interesting to watch (if not
occasionally moronic - exhibit A: "Days of Thunder"), but the reason
he's not great is because he's too technical and calculated.  His shots
are perfectly executed, and leave nothing to the imagination, and
they're always making sure you're paying attention.  This is incredibly
annoying, and it reduces "Enemy of the State" to a mechanical mishmash
of flashy images that never expand the mind at any great depths, but
still manage to entertain without any real problems.
Despite never actually becoming great, it's never actually boring and
it's always intriguing.  Watching the government set-up Smith is
endlessly fascinating, and since we care about Smith's likeable
protagonist, we are set-up for a good two hours worth of Tom
Clancy-esque entertainment.  Add the best big cast this side of the
annual Woody Allen film (everyone from Gabriel Byrne to Dan Butler pop
up for cameos), and you've got a good old fashioned escapist drama which
does all the thinking for you so that you never have to actually
question the debate over personal privacy and so you can follow Will
Smith's plight without a minute's worth of boredom.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
Starring: James Van Der Beek, Jon Voigt, Paul Walker, Ron Lester, Scott 
Caan, Richard Lineback, Ali Larter, Amy Smart, Eliel Swinton, Thomas F. 
Duffy, Jll Parker Jones, Joe Pichler, Tonie Perensky
The plot, structure, and even many of the jokes of "Varsity Blues" hail 
all the way back to 80s teen movies and sports movies spanning the 
entire length of cinematic history: it's part team tries to win despite 
adversity, part teenagers trying to overcome pressure from adult 
would-be role models. I've seen this way too many times before, as you 
probably have as well if you grew up in the heyday of the 80s, viewing 
films by John Hughes on a bi-weekly basis and intaking sports molds like 
"Major League," like I did, a time I know I at least have numerous 
regrets about. But every now and then, I almost get suckered into liking 
a formulaic film like this, for whatever reason that is. "Varsity 
Blues," in particular, has a freshness I can't quite figure out. It's 
not exactly about either being a downtrodden teen or a sports team 
trying to succeed, and because it's not really much of anything may be 
what's so nice about it. There's not a ton of bad jokes, the more 
sentimental moments (the oft-joked-about "I don't want your life" scene) 
don't feel absolutely wretched, and the lead role is played by an actor 
who, while probably never capable of an Ian McKellen-like performance 
(just to name one superb thespian), is really likable, if not really 
quite good. Hell, even the cinematography is nice, accenting the blues 
of the football jerseys nicely.
And instead of being completely off-put with this film, as I was with a 
couple teen-targeted flicks of late ("Can't Hardly Wait" and "Disturbing 
Behavior," just to name two that made my worst-of-98 list), I was 
instead mildly pleased. The story, about a southern town that is 
devoutly married to high-school football, is yes, a little lame (it's 
blatantly borrowed from an undertone in "The Last Picture Show"), and 
even occasionally mishandled to ridiculous proportions (I just can't 
believe they actually had football coach Jon Voigt hold his hand up in a 
Hitler-esque heil, not once, but thrice). And the story of John Moxon, 
the film's protagonist, and his battle with not wanting to play football 
past high school though showing an extraordinary talent for it at the 
time (and becoming the star quarterback when the original quarterback 
suffers an injury), is at the very least tiresome and unfelt, but it's 
only so in theory, as is the rest of this film's entities. This film 
really should be a crap film that makes a minute impact on the box 
office then goes off to Comedy Central Mid-day Hell, but it has so many 
slightly positive aspects to it that I just couldn't help but be 
enjoying myself for at least some of it.
For just one example, the resident fat-guy subplot, usually the weak 
link of a film like this, is handled with a surprising amount of 
compassion. The said character (played by Ron Lester) is occasionally 
the subject of lame weight ridicule, but is later actually developed as 
a character, and in a scene late in the film where he sits in a 
depressed state with hard liquor and a shotgun actually has some feeling 
behind it. Even the lead character has development: instead of resorting 
to the stardom gimmick that this film almost goes for, it allows him to 
deal with these emotions himself, and when his current girlfriend nearly 
gives up on him, he wrestles with turning to the cliche and sleeping 
with the girlfriend of a friend/ex-quarterback who has been making 
none-too-subtle advances towards him. It's not Shakespeare, or even Neil 
Simon, but it shows that maybe there will be a teenage film that 
actually delves into the emotions of its characters in an intelligent 
fashion someday.
Even James Van Der Beek's performance shows something of a future 
promise. Currently the star of the heavily-discussed "Dawson' Creek," he 
puts not only some depth into his character, but perhaps more 
importantly for this kind of movie, a lot of charisma. He's good at 
making otherwise cheap emotions into genuine ones, and he's completely 
at-ease in front of a camera, and he defines his character so well that 
he nearly makes the film work just by being completely sympathetic. 
There are many a thing to like about this film to those who are willing 
to abandon any dramatic credibility at the door, but then again, this 
isn't THAT good. For all that I liked about it, there's still the many 
things I didn't like about it. Voigt, for one, though good, is saddled 
with a character that the film isn't sure what to do with. I guess he's 
a villain, but if so, what gives with the start-and-stop attempts to 
deepen his character (a saddened scene where he's looking over trophies, 
symbolizing his past successes and his frustration with the present) 
when the proverbial rug will be pulled from underneath anyway? Same goes 
with his father, who is at once shown as a hard-ruling father, ordering 
his son to do his will, then other times as a poor old guy who can't get 
any respect, not from his friends or his son (who ends up pegging him in 
the nose with a football, a scene of such conflicting emotions that the 
film isn't prepared to deal with it).
Just add to the pot the extreme fake-ness of several of the situations, 
the use of half-assed small-town and high school football satire, and a 
couple other major detractors, and this film does not exactly get a 
sure-fire recommendation for your's truly. It's more of a mixed bag of a 
film, with parts I did like and parts I didn't like, but nothing I was 
totally enthused about. But, as I said, it does have promise for future 
movies, especially with the success of the film at the boxoffice, which 
has been nothing short of stunning (especially for a film boasting a 
member of the "Dawson's Creek" gang, a show I admit to watching a couple 
time and admit to actually enjoying). Maybe it's the R-rating that helps 
this film: it's more loose-necked, less-fake, and occasionally funnier 
(a subplot involving a stripping teacher is not exactly good, but it's 
amusing). I'd like to see a teen film that managed to take what was good 
about this film and then expanded on it. Imagine a teen film you weren't 
ashamed to say that you at least sorta liked, but actually liked. And 
maybe it should star Van Der Beek. Yeah, sounds like a good idea.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
Writer: Terence Malick (based on the novel by James Jones)
Starring: Sean Penn, Jim Caviezel, Adrien Brody, Ben Chaplin, Elias 
Koteas, Nick Nolte, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, John C. Reilly, Jared 
Leto, John Savage, Nick Stahl, Donal Logue, John Travolta, George 
Clooney
And so begins the hardest critique I'll probably ever have to write. So 
many movies I see leave me with instant thoughts and criticism(s), while 
others linger in my head days, even weeks before I can finally sit down, 
organize them intelligently, and write about them as best as I can 
(under whatever conditions I'm in). For an example of that, I re-saw "La 
Dolce Vita" this year around, oh, April, and by November I was finally 
able to come to as full a conclusion as I was about it and write a 
review of it. But with "The Thin Red Line," the much-anticipated World 
War II film and return by legendary-and-deserves-it director Terrence 
Malick, I just can't seem to come up with anything that either makes 
sense or shows that I know what I'm talking about. This film has either 
been overpraised or overbashed by many, and after watching it, I'm 
easily annoyed by claims that it's the best war movie of the past 20 
years, or just a bunch of pretentious drivel.
I suppose being admittingly pretentious myself does cause me to 
overglance the possibility of me thinking the latter about this film 
(although I wouldn't call it drivel because or despite my, uh, 
handicap), but I don't want to immediately jump to the conclusion that 
this film is the masterpiece that others are proclaiming it to be. It 
has a wonderful poetic and hypnotic feel to it, yes, that's unique, even 
taking into consideration Coppola's acid-trip-like "Apocalypse Now." And 
there's a whole ton to admire here, from the gorgeous cinematography 
(courtesy of our pal, John Toll) to Terrence Malick's gentle and 
beautiful direction that's in direct opposition of that of Steven 
Spielberg, whose "Saving Private Ryan" is as close to realism as this is 
to surrealism to some of the performances from the titanic cast, in 
particular Nick Nolte and Elias Koteas. But what exactly is Malick 
trying to say here, what is the film's raison d'etre, and what 
comparisons is Malick trying to show here between nature, humanity, and 
war?
"The Thin Red Line" is based on the famous novel by James Jones 
(recently portrayed by Kris Kristoferson in "A Soldier's Daughter Never 
Cries") about the battle of Guadalcanal, one of the most important and 
decisive battles of World War II. As the story begins, we see the 
native's way of life in the area, where two AWOL American soldiers have 
gone to escape, only to be shortly picked back up when an American ship 
passes through and spots them (the sight of beautiful nature being 
interruted by man-made steel is just one of the many unforgettable 
images Malick leaves you with here). One of the AWOL soldiers, Pvt. Witt 
(Jim Caviezel), is then reprimanded by one of his commanding officers, 
First Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn), and between them a strange union is 
formed: Witt, of the group that hates war and believes in everything 
nature; Welsh, with his cynical outlook on man. But this film isn't 
about either of them, to be exact. Malick's film, also scripted by him, 
doesn't have any main characters. In fact, it'd be not totally incorrect 
to say that Malick himself is the main character, and, as Roger Ebert 
pointed out, it's like he's trying to make one film and the actors are 
making another. A correct statement, but I'm not sure if Ebert meant 
that as a knock at the film, or something positive. I believe in the 
latter, but more about that later on.
The plot soon kicks in, and we meet more of those involved. The 
Lieutenenant, a man named Bell (Nick Nolte), is soon introduced, not as 
the intense, screaming maniac he is in the rest of the film (or the 
ads), but as resentful to his own commanding officer (a very brief but 
altogether not bad John Travolta) as his men are probably to him. 
Captain Staros (Elias Koteas) shows too much humanity for his men in the 
middle of a major attack, but confesses his need to be alone and his 
desire to be anywhere but in battle to his troops later on. Pvt. Bell 
(Ben Chaplin, sans native Brit accent) is constantly having flashbacks 
to afternoons with his wife, and wishes of returns to that, but then 
again, some self-destructive acts come about on his own part (like 
volunteering on a possible suicide mission in the middle of the 
picture). Most of the others are reduced to smaller roles, though, like 
famous or semi-famous actors Woody Harrelson (as an intense soldier who 
doesn't last too long, but at least goes out cinematically), John 
Cusack, John C. Reilly, Jared Leto, John Savage, Nick Stahl (another 
great death scene here), and [about 45 seconds of] George Clooney, most 
of whom just wanted to work with the director, even if it meant having a 
small role. In fact, the amount of film Malick shot was so long that 
actors like Bill Pullman were left sadly on the cutting room floor.
The main part of the battle lasts about an hour and a half long, leaving 
another hour and a half for a beginning and end, but not only does it 
feel like much of a plot, but it also (thankfully) doesn't feel like a 
three-hour sit, at least not for your's truly. I can only attribute the 
fact that it's not at all boring to Malick's direction, which, as it was 
for the other Malick film I've seen (the wonderful "Days of Heaven"), 
like that of a soft but effective brush stroke by a painter or the 
gentleness of a Bach concerto ("Air on the G String" comes to mind). A 
friend noticed no matched action cuts, but instead of this factor (so 
important that you probably don't realize it) taking us out of the 
picture's overall feel, it manages to achieve zen-like undertones, and 
the numerous shots of horrific battle coupled with shots of tall grass 
blowing in the wind or animal and/or insect life only help to make you 
relax into a state of hypnosis that is entirely unlike any war movie 
I've ever seen (again, comparisons to "Saving Private Ryan" are not only 
useless, but downright silly). In fact, this entire film is unlike any 
movie that I've ever seen, period. Malick, as usual, breaks several 
"rules" in the world of cinema, like lack of characters that the viewer 
can easily latch onto or see as a guiding point, and the use of 
narration with not one, not two, but about ten different characters.
But that's what I liked about "The Thin Red Line." It's like every 
single character in this film believes that he's the lead character, and 
Malick is only dropping in on each of them from time to time to see what 
they're thinking and how they're reacting to what's going on (Mike 
D'Angelo hilariously pointed out that it's like an "Apocalypse Now" 
where everyone's a Kurtz). But each narration or flashback lets us into 
the character's lives just enough, and Bell's backstory is the most 
heartbreaking and most easily identifiable, at least for me, with 
graceful juxtaposition of current times with the memories of he and his 
wife being intimate (almost heartbreaking, I'd say). Yet at the same 
time, nothing in the film is as moving as Koteas' Staros, who gives off 
an aura of such world-weariness and unhappiness that without narration 
and with his superb acting, I was even more moved (will someone give 
this guy some more great roles, please?). But again, where is Malick 
going with all this? Is he trying to merely say that nature is disrupted 
by war? If he is, he's not only making a terribly trite statement out of 
a beautiful film, but he's also wasting a lot of people's times (nothing 
should be that simple, and I sure hope this isn't an environmentalist 
war film). Or is he trying to show the loss of humanity in the midst of 
war? Well...that would be interesting, but if he's trying to do that, I 
think he kinda failed a bit: humanity does in fact seep through - in 
fact, a lot of it. Or is he trying to show the way we hide humanity? 
Again, if this was what he was going for, he didn't achieve it.
Or, as my best guess is, is he trying to show that everything that 
happens in this film is merely part of nature, whether it be of mother 
or of human? He doesn't seem to judge anything that goes on here, not 
even the war. The entire film is shot the same way: with graceful camera 
movement, and hypnotic editing of images together. Could this be the 
least judgmental war film of all time, a film that doesn't make any kind 
of statements on war and its subsequent damage to nature or humanity, 
but merely observes, I suppose, kind of like God or something omnipotent 
(a bit of modesty, perhaps, Mr. Malick?). Or is Malick just pulling a 
fast one on its audience members, trying to get them to think as hard as 
they can about something which has no real form or meaning or anything 
that is coherently meaningful? Whatever this film means or represents 
(as much as I am keen to believe in my theory), I was at least 
stimulated, and am at least not often quick to jump to the conclusion 
that if I can't figure it out for certain, that it's the one with the 
problem (although I could be wrong with this; maybe this film IS a 
mess...). But the point is that I was stimulated, and this may be one of 
the very few films (along with "Saving Private Ryan") that I can't 
easily pass off as merely "anti-war"...or, for that matter, "anti-war" 
at all. Frustrating, yes, but in a good way.
Home page at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Henry Fool (1997)
Writer/Director: Hal Hartley
Starring: Thomas Jay Ryan, James Urbaniak, Parker Posey, Maria Porter,
James Saito, Kevin Corrigan, Nicholas Hope, Chuck Montgomery, Camille
Paglia
>From what I've seen of Hal Hartley (which is mighty meager: out of about
10 films, I've seen only "Trust"), his films seem to steer deftly away
from potential annoying smugness and being like every other quirky,
indie film out there.  Yes, Hartley suffers from some smugness, mostly
due to his fast-paced brand of Hartley-speak, which only a few actors
can speak comfortably and convincingly, but he, in an almost ingenius
fashion, has created a bizzaro and original world that is still
inhabited by characters who seem, shockingly, genuine.  What may be
annoying to me about certain David Lynch films (save for "Eraserhead"
and "Blue Velvet") is nearly the opposite in his films: his characters
seem like real people suffering from strange idiosyncrasies and quirks
that only add to their humanity instead of detracting from it.  He
doesn't create random weird characters, existing only for a cheap laugh
- he creates funny characters with real problems and who feel basically,
more or less, real.  And this may be his big detraction when it comes to
modern day cult audiences, who have embraced Lynch as a savior of
independent film and pretty much shunned Hartley, reducing him to one of
those directors who makes films on a regular basis but never obtains
more than an elite group of fans who've accidentally stumbled upon his
films.
With "Henry Fool," though, he seems to have taken a giant step forward,
not only because his film ended up grossing a not-bad sum (of about two
or three million dollars, which means it played, if for only a brief
amount of time, in my hometown), but because it contains everything I
liked about "Trust" and improves on everything else that bugged me.
Like "Trust," "Henry Fool" is a bizarre comedy; a strange satire on
modern day life.  Unlike "Trust," its comedy is more subtle and more
tucked away underneath the text, allowing some of the more deeper
aspects to rise up and take control.  Not to mention, it's a masterfully
scripted film that doesn't seem to mind that it's nearly two and a half
hours long, allowing itself to unfold its story and its numerous
elements in a breezy, unforced manner and then expand on them.
With this film, he's trying new things, like doing away with some of his
more perverse dialogue rhythms (like Mamet and Stillman, Hartley has a
distinct pattern of writing that is instantly identifiable, and can also
sound horrific in the wrong hands), and allowing one of two major
characters to be damn near mute and the other to be incredibly verbal.
The latter is the eponomys character, Henry (newcomer Thomas Jay Ryan),
a bum who's just gotten out of prison, and settles into the basement of
the former, Simon (James Urbaniak), a bespeckled,
reserved-beyond-astonishment garbageman who lives with his sick,
prozac-addicted mother (Maria Porter) and his nymphomaniac sister
(Parker Posey), Fay.  Henry appears one day out of the blue and begins
to mingle with Simon almost immediately, acting like they were chums
from way back when.  Henry, with a skuzzy look, long brown locks, and
deep, dark eyes is a poet who believes that having a job rids one of the
time and energy to work on his art, and has long been working on his
epic poem, "Confessions," which he is near done with.  He speaks in
long-winded, complex phrases, and is completely oblivious to the
potential effect of his words and actions ("Look, Simon, I just slept
with your mother about a half hour ago and I'm beginning to think it
wasn't such a good idea.").
He takes Simon under his wing, whether he likes it or not, gives him
advice, like "It's good to do something you're ashamed of from time to
time," and one day hands him a notebook and tells him to write all his
thoughts out on paper.  In the morning, he's written an epic poem,
apparently without effort, and slowly, he becomes recognized.  Henry
begins to put excerpts of his poem in the local Chinese deli, and we see
how it effects people: at worst, people call it "pornographic;" the
opposite, a seemingly mute Chinese woman reads it and begins to sing
(wisely, Hartley never shows a smidgeon of the poem - here's to a new
McGuffin!).  Soon, the poem becomes an international obsession as it's
posted on the internet, and conservative and liberal folk are duking it
out over the importance of the poem as an artform.  Hartley could have
very well made this the point of the film, taking grand satirical
insights about the world of poetry, the importance of the artist in the
world, and various political notions, and to some effect he does (the
mere ridiculousness of how Simon becomes so popular so quickly is
handled in a subtle fashion, but still comically).
But he really makes it a film about the main characters and how Henry
affects them and how others affect Henry.  He's full of himself,
constantly preparing everyone for how phenomenal his final "Confessions"
will be like, but as great as he'll ever become is due mostly to the
popularity of Simon and the mere fact that he found him and got him
started, since Simon wouldn't have ever gotten farther than life as a
garbageman if Henry had never arrived.  Simon, as played by Urbaniak, is
like that of a weak but untroubled scrawny white guy, with a
non-judgmental look always given to everything, and sloppy posture that
makes him the immediate target of jokes and beatings.  He's never
affected by anything, as it seems, and his rampant popularity doesn't
seem to enthuse him a bit, at least in comparison to that of Henry, who
is not only happy for his friend, but proud that he has great taste.
And with Hartley's slow, reserved pacing, he brings out these elements
without bringing too much attention to them, and allows occurances and
insights to happen that only deepen the story.  Henry ends up having a
relationship with Fay, and it goes much farther than one would think at
the beginning.  And meanwhile, Hartley makes quick asides to social
commentary, as when he shows us the character of Warren (Kevin Corrigan,
making his indie rounds in this, "Buffalo '66," and "The Slums of
Beverly Hills"), a local bully turned right-wing activist turned
wife/child beater, who one day scoffs at himself, "The problem with this
country is people like me."  As with "Trust," all of this seems eerily
authentic and real depsite some of the more absurd and comical elements
- we care about the characters, and even, in some instances, sympathize
with them.  But what's so unique about this film, in comparison to
"Trust," is this one's more sly and more subtle.  It's reserved,
distanced tone works nicely with the film, and by showing the contrasts
between Henry and Simon, he's showing us infinitely more of his talent
for moviemaking.  He's making points about society that seem to only add
to the overall effect of the film instead of being distracting (let's
face it - that is, if you've seen "Trust" - the bit with the lonely
woman on the park bench was just time-wasting and you couldn't wait to
get back to the main storyline).  And his characters, though distanced
from us (we can never fully sympathize with Henry's lust for no life nor
Simon's total reservation from life), feel more realistic than in the
past (probably because we're not being forced to like them completely).
"Henry Fool," for the most part, is my favorite kind of independent
film: one that plunges you head-first into a strange world, makes no
cheap judgments about what you're seeing, and tells a story in such an
entertaining and insightful fashion that you can't help but be swept up
in it.  Let's just hope that Hartley has learned from this film, and
will continue to expand on the newfound successes that come from this
source.  Maybe sometime in the future, he'll end up making the great
film that will finally land him on the map and make other quirky indie
directors look like mere hacks.  Boy, will that be the day.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
Writers: Dennis Feldman and Jonathan Hensleigh (based on the comic book 
by Chuck Pfarrer)
Starring: Jamie Lee Curtis, William Baldwin, Donald Sutherland, Joanna 
Pacula, Sherman Augustus, Marshall Bell, Cliff Curtis, Julio Oscar 
Mechoso
I suppose I'm not extremely surprised that "Virus" comes to us from a 
deciple of James Cameron (John Bruno), and if I strain real hard, I 
could even say that it's an obvious given, particuarly looking from the 
standpoint of Mr. Cameron's early works. In fact, "Virus" is yet another 
in the long line of action/horror/paranoia thrillers from the "Aliens" 
vein: a group of people are dropped into a mysterious situation only to 
find a mortally-threatening entity is out to get them, a textbook 
example hailing all the way back to the early talkies, and maybe even to 
the first pictures, albeit redeveloped by Cameron in his 1986 
blockbuster that earned him esteem and bigger budgets to come in his 
future. No such thing will happen to Bruno, whom I believe worked in 
some capacity on that quasi-landmark feature; while Bruno may have 
studied under Cameron's wing for years and years, I'm beginning to 
wonder at what capacity, and what exactly did he learn from him. In 
fact, "Virus" should at least be mediocre; the fact that Bruno could 
have worked under a man like Cameron - a director who, if anything, just 
knows how to make a movie - and then make a film like "Virus" is just 
another detraction fairly aimed at this Z-grade schlockfest of a film, 
albeit a Z-grade schlockfest with a respectable budget.
The film seems to not only borrow it's plot from last year's 
similarly-fated "Deep Rising," but also from a clunkish B-movie from the 
'80s called "Leviathan," an underwater thriller starring Peter Weller, 
Richard Crenna, Hector Elizando, and Daniel Stern about a group of 
miners who stumble upon an alien lifeform that was part "Alien," part 
John Carpenter's twisted remake of "The Thing." "Virus," again, has a 
similar, uh, selling point: a group of sailors on a boat stumble upon a 
Russian cruiser that is dead in the water. They get on. They break up 
into pairs and investigate. And they find an alien lifeform on board 
that comes in the form of energy, has taken over all the machines on 
board, have meshed the machines with parts from corpses, and have deemed 
humankind their enemy because of a misquote in the dictionary (ha ha).
Not that any of this is for a second scary or the least bit involving; 
not only does this film start off with a chintzy Bond-ian opening (the 
destruction of the cruiser via a satellite transmission from Mir), 
destroying any of the suspense in what could happen, but it also fails 
to bring us any interesting chracters. Of its motley crew, it only 
choses as its potentially eccentric cast of characters a lead woman 
skipper, a masculine potential-romantic-interest, a drunken captain, a 
black technician, a tatooed aborigine, a manic Russian survivor, and a 
couple other candidates for alien food, none whom are the least bit 
interesting or more dimensional than a thin, plain piece of writing 
paper. And it's not the traditional argument for films like these, where 
you may in fact want them all to be eaten (even "Aliens" played with the 
karma of the arrogant soldiers, but this was more of a plus-side for the 
film as a whole than the opposite); instead, as another cliche goes, you 
just don't give a damn. I almost don't even have to say that the acting 
from everyone ranges from sub-par to horrific, the former being Jamie 
Lee Curtis in the lead showing off what a strong female lead she is (and 
she is, just not really here) and the latter being - and it pains me to 
say this as he's a particular favorite of mine - Donald Sutherland, who 
plays the captain so poorly and without a second of credibility that 
this will go down as the performance-of-which-he-should-be-ashamed. Like 
Anthony Hopkins for "Legends of the Fall" (the line "Scrooooooo 'em" has 
been thus embroidered upon my membrance). Or Peter O'Toole in 
"Caligula." Great actor, horrific performance. It happens every now and 
then, and it only helps Sutherland's career that no one, except for an 
elite few, even bothered to see this film.
Though it has sat on the shelves of Universal Studios for about two 
years, waiting until it can be released and make as much money as it 
possibly can (read: early January, when everyone's still trying to catch 
up on the potential Oscar-nominees), it does show that Universal shelled 
out a pretty penny to make this film: it's laden with complex machinery, 
boasts respectable production design, and it may even feature believable 
special effects...if, of course, I, or anyone else, could see them. 
"Virus" mostly takes place on a large, abandoned cruiser, and mostly at 
night until the dawn, and mostly without the use of lights, not so much 
for the productivity of the alien creatures in their pursuit of their 
human prey, but more so because, as the Hollywood cliche seems to go, 
"If it's dark enough, then the special effects will be more believable." 
And if you don't believe me, go back and rent "Godzilla," and tell me if 
there's even one shot where we see Godzilla either a) in his entirety in 
one wide shot, or b) n the light so that we can at least see him (well, 
you don't really have to sit through it again; just take my word for 
it).
But all of this doesn't matter since "Virus" is basically just one loud, 
cluttered mess of a movie. The action scenes are muddled and as 
difficult to follow as any action movie I've ever seen (my, um, favorite 
part was the scene where a trio of them end up somehow on the outside of 
the ship, during a five minute bouillabaisse of tidal waves, rain, and 
any other ocean-extremeties the film can cook up, then end up back in 
the ship when one of them is revealed to have apparently drowned - well, 
I must say, thanks for telling me afterwards because I sure couldn't 
figure it out when I saw it). Imagine the first attack of the aliens in 
"Aliens," shot from the POV of the soldiers and then the authorities in 
the battle car if it was all hard to follow and done without any 
dramatic intensity, and that's basically the whole of "Virus": one 
horribly-directed action scene after the other, capping it off with a 
proposterous gadget that saves the day and at least a couple of the 
original cast members.
And my god, it's a long damn sit. With no interesting characters, no 
dramatic urgency, no tension, not one good moment of action, and no 
mesmerizing visuals, it's a wonder that it even got made. We already 
know that big movie studios' mentality is shallow at best, and movies 
like "Out of Sight" and "Saving Private Ryan" give you more faith in 
them, but movies like "Virus" manage to drain a little more out of the 
pool. I almost wish that instead of making this movie, John Bruno had 
gone cinema verite and captured the meetings with Universal heads when 
they gave this film a green light. They read the script, they knew they 
were entrusting millions upon millions of dollars into a director who 
might have very well been a Cameron hack (and he is), and they still 
went ahead with the project, only to have Bruno and company shit back in 
their face. Even though I hold Universal in contempt for making this 
horrible movie, I'd say even more contempt should be aimed at Mr. Bruno 
for making a movie that could be this bad. In fact, shouts of "Egad, 
man, what were you doing when you worked for Cameron anyway?" are not 
only justifiable, but encouraged.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
Writer: Patrick Smith Kelly (based on the play "Dial M For Murder" by 
Frederick Knott)
Starring: Michael Douglas, Gwyneth Paltrow, Viggo Mortensen, David 
Suchet, Sarita Choudhury
"A Perfect Murder" is, of course, lifted from "Dial M For Murder," the 
play that was later transformed into a terrific Hitchcock movie starring 
Ray Milland and Grace Kelly, thus this film belongs in the elite 
sub-sub-genre of films known as Hitch Remakes. Hitchcock is commonly 
referred to as the Master of Suspense, and rightly so, but he was a 
quaint director and liked to deal more with character development and 
set pieces rather than dump thin characters in a silly plot - he made 
his stories believable and involving by major use of directorial tricks 
and the like, but never corrupted his films. And his fims were his own; 
no one has ever been able to immitate his filmmaking abilities because 
he had such a gentle, unique touch when it came to movies. Why directors 
are so arrogant to think they can imitate him is beyond me (Gus Van 
Sant, that was directed towards you), especially since thrillers just 
aren't made like that these days, and that's why I'm just a little more 
open-minded towards Andrew Davis for making "A Perfect Murder" almost 
nothing like the original. The plot - a millionaire hires an assasin to 
kill his cheating wife - is the same, more or less, and the (attempted) 
assasination involves a distracting (for her) phone call.
But that, refreshingly, is where the similarities end. Why refreshing? 
Like an adaptation of a novel, why can't remakes be exactly the same, 
changing as little as possible? Or at least you'd probably think that 
was my thinking, but alas, that isn't as of now. Over the summer, just 
hearing the fact that the lover is hired to kill her drove me nuts; 
nowadays, after hearing the spectacle de crap that was the "Psycho" 
shot-for-shot remake (to be fair, though, I still haven't seen it), I've 
had a change of heart, basically because if a film (or an adaptation of 
a novel) is exactly the same, why should I watch that and not the 
original, which is the authentic one? Well, "A Perfect Murder" changes a 
whole lot from the original play and subsequent film: the assasin is 
changed, as I said; it takes place all over the city, instead of mostly 
inside an apartment; it does immensely less with the detective (David 
Suchet, limited to merely being a sporadic visitor), involving the 
characters more; and the ending is changed incessantly, as well as other 
smaller details (the wife is given a friend and a UN job, etc.).
On paper, it looks pretty good: it makes it more of a morality play, 
dealing with the villainy and evil of each of the characters, at least 
in some way. Not only does the husband wreak evil-incarnate, but the 
boyfriend is given a twisted other-side, and the wife even gets to do 
her own evilness (at least it appears so in an unused, alternate ending 
I was priveleged to see). Some not bad ideas, here, and the ingredients 
for a twisted little thriller. Alas, it isn't really so. While there is 
a lot to like about "A Perfect Murder," mostly of what's above, it's an 
overall disappointing and run-of-the-mill thriller, not too suprising as 
it comes to us courtesy of Andrew Davis, who, yes, directed the terrific 
"The Fugitive" a couple years back, but if you also remember has 
directed a cheapo Steven Seagal movie or two (well, I almost liked 
"Under Siege," but "Above the Law" blew and you know it), as well as a 
couple other disappointments (do you even remember "Steal Big, Steal 
Little?"). Sure, Michael Douglas gives another great, chilling 
performance, the kind he's best known for (read: George Gekko), adding 
mounts upon mounts of tension into such simple scenes of saying hello to 
his wife after a day at work. And he's our protagonist, thankfully, 
ensuring that we'll be front row for some Machiavellian instances of 
gusto.
But instead of being truly twisted, "A Perfect Murder" tosses him into a 
series of twists and turns that slowly become so manufactured and 
questionable that the film soon loses all credibility and descends into 
yet another generic thriller that Hitchcock would have never made 
without a full frontal labotomy. At first, the first big twist, 
concerning the lover (Viggo Mortensen, so marble-mouthed that the film 
should require subtitles when he speaks) works, and it continues to work 
throughout, but the implausibility gear kicks in after awhile, and a 
twist towards the end is so cliched and questionable that I couldn't 
believe the surviving character was so cool about it afterwards. He 
loses his edge along the way, as well, occasionally treated like a 
Richard III-esque anti-hero, as we follow him along with his numerous 
schemes to be the surviving character in this charade, and then treated 
like the supreme villain of the piece because the film's not sure what 
to do with him. It's afraid to go all the way and accept Douglas as our 
anti-hero, like the original film did, and in turn, deceives its own 
protagonist and even we the audience. It only hurts more that his 
character is saddled with such a pathetic excuse for an ending; I'd 
almost like to make a movie law about the use of gunshots to end 
thrillers - they're merely half-assed ways of finishing a conflict when 
they could be finished with a much more complex and much more satisfying 
finale (unforunately, that's not going to be the alternate ending I 
saw).
I'd be willing to look over this (I did with "The Cook, The Thief, His 
Wife, and Her Lover") if it had been satisfying up till then, but sadly 
enough it's only marginally satisfying up to that point anyway. 
Throughout, the script takes numerous easy-way-outs amongst the clever 
twists of the storyline, and instead of being a gleefully twisted duel 
between Douglas and Mortensen, both of whom are greedy, it adds on 
maudlin sympathy involving the wife (played nicely by Gwyneth Paltrow), 
who is seen as a whole other section of the movie as the big 
distraction: she may uncover some cheap truths about Douglas (why can't 
it be more about his wounded ego and NOT about mere greed), but she also 
ends up as the Achilles Heal to Mortensen, a huge detractor for the 
film. This ends up taking us out of the film, and doubting the film's 
handle on his character: is he changing from his past self, and if he 
is, then why is he at the same time not - I mean, what gives, man? 
Throughout, Davis directs with a mistaken amount of distance from the 
situation, as if he's not sure whose story this actually is. In the 
original, Hitchcock gave some sympathy for the husband, and later on, 
made it about wife and the husband. But Davis isn't sure who to 
highlight at any time, and we never feel for any of them, not even 
Paltrow's wife character. A great thriller would have us identifying 
with all of them, and then slowly and subtlely closing in on all of them 
as they play off one another.
I'm not much of a fan of Davis, save for his work on "The Fugitive," and 
I'm again not a fan after this film: his use of suspense is too slick 
and shock-loving. He even mucks up the assasination scene: in the 
original, the most memorable image was Kelly on the phone, oblivious to 
the assasin behind her (it's even on the cover of the tape, folks); 
here, it's another forgettable, in-the-moment jump into frame 
assasination, never more frightening than a quick jump in your seat, 
forgettable seconds later (though I have to applaud its replacement for 
the scissors - nice touch). Not that I'm wishing it were more like the 
original; I'd just like to see it as the competent, chilling film that 
it apparently wants to be but isn't. Instead, it's a film filled with a 
couple smart aspects, some nice twists, and a good jump or two, but 
absolutely nothing that you'll remember more than a week after seeing 
it. Here's to hoping someday someone will be able to make a Hitch remake 
that can successfully stand up on its own. Or, rather, how about just 
abandoning remakes altogether and instead coming up with a wholly 
original thriller, huh?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
Writer/Director: Todd Solandz
Starring: Dylan Baker, Cynthia Stevenson, Jane Adams, Lara Flynn Boyle,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Rufus Read, Camryn Manheim, Louise Lasser, Ben
Gazzara, Jared Harris, Elizabeth Ashley, Jon Lovitz, Dan Moran, Evan
Silverberg, Marla Maples, Molly Shannon
Like a god, Todd Solandz circles around his characters in "Happiness,"
as if he were spinning some wheel where each of the major characters
were represented, and then stops on one and fills us in on their lives.
They all have two things in common: they're all, to some degree,
unhappy; and in some way, they all get what they desire most of all by
the end of the movie.  Each of them harbor dark, deep secrets, and the
materialization of each of them is the subject of this film.  Meanwhile,
round and round the film goes, stopping on each of the characters, and
when he does, we see them as they really are, without any filter, their
souls bare naked for the screen to behold and for Solandz and the rest
of us to judge them.
Yet he doesn't, and neither do we, and that's probably the most
refreshing thing about this film, amongst a pile of other refreshing
things this film has to offer any audience that will have it.  Back in
1996, the very same director shocked audiences with his film, "Welcome
to the Dollhouse," a black comedy about a junior high girl who was the
biggest dork in her class.  That film bordered on sadistic at times, but
still retained a quiet, observant, yet very funny atmosphere.  I think
the amazing thing about Solandz is that his view is not only hysterical
and witty, but walks right up to the line dictating which side is
sensible and reserved, and which side is flat out pretentious
down-talking.  And he doesn't trip over it.
In "Happiness," we meet a wide array of interesting and realistic
people, all with subconscious problems they are trying to deal with.  At
the center of the film are three sisters, though they aren't the primary
specimens, but merely the key to why these people are connected -
there's Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), the one with the perfect family,
perfect husband, and perfect suburban life; Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle),
the gorgeously sophistocated one with a major writing career who
nevertheless feels shallow and hates her work; and Joy (Jane Adams), a
naive, almost vapid songstress who is pure and sweet, but in the very
first scene, dumps her current boyfriend (a shockingly hilarious and
even intense Jon Lovitz), and it's probably because he's an ugly dead
end.  He takes it sadly at first, then tries to make uncomfortably comic
conversation, giving her a present he was going to give her later on: a
specially-engraved, beautiful ashtray (she says "It almost makes me want
to learn how to smoke.").  He then shocks her by pulling it away from
her, saying that it's not for her but for the one who loves him for who
he is, not what he looks like.
While Joy takes a job working as a substitute for on-strike
english-as-a-second-language teacher (they refer to her as a "scab"), we
get to know everyone else, and discover their little idosyncrasies.  We
meet a man named Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman, who was brilliant in
"Boogie Nights" as the boom mike operator with a crush on Marky Mark), a
boring office worker, a mouth breather who masturbates while making
obscene phone calls to women.  He's currently lusting over Helen, who
lives next door to him in his apartment building, though another woman
in his building, Kristina (Camryn Manheim, who just won an Emmy for her
acting on the TV show, "The Practice"), gets a crush on him, even though
she has very low self esteem herself.
Most shockingly, though, we meet Trish's husband, Bill (Dylan Baker), a
psychiatrist, namely Allen's psychiatrist, who urges him to tell him all
his sexual fantasies, but himself, keeps having a recurring dream where
he walks into a gorgeous park on a sunny day with a machine gun.  He's
the perfect husband, though, or at least in Trish's eye, but in one of
the first scenes of the movie, he goes to a gas station, buys a Teen
Beat magazine, climbs into the back seat of his car, and jacks off to
the pictures.
And down in Florida, the parents of the three sisters, Mona and Lenny
(Louise Lasser and Ben Gazzara, the former who has not at all aged
well), who've been married for decades, are splitting up because for the
first time in his life, Lenny wants to be alone.  Although Lenny denies
it has anything to do with wanting to be with other women, this still
drives Mona to re-evaluate her life, and maybe come to terms with the
idea that, as the local realtor she talks to (Marla Maples - !!!) says,
divorce may be the best thing that ever happens to her.
Once all these characters are introduced, Solandz, like a genie, grants
all of them their wishes.  When Allen calls Helen and does his usual
schtick, she shocks him by replying with "I want to meet you."  Lenny
gets the separation, and finds he has attracted the come-ons of a
neighbor of his (Elizabeth Ashley).  Joy meets a Russian cab driver
named Vlad (Jared Harris) in her class, and he woos her by playing an
absolutely riot-inducing cover of "You Light Up My Life" one night at
her house (the joke is that it works).  Most unsettling of all, Bill
gets a crush on one of his son's friends, organizes a sleepover for the
two, and in a scene that is eerily comic in its enactment, Bill attempts
to drug the family and the boy, and then have his way with him...though
it hardly goes as planned.
"Happiness" is an unsettling shocker, filled with insights about
humanity and our internal desire to be happy at all costs, and set up
around scenes that are created to shock the audience.  Cum shots (in
fact, 2 or 3 of them).  Pedophilia (though it is never seen on screen).
Even Bill's numerous discussions with his son (Rufus Read) about sexual
awakening, including frank conversations about masturbation, which come
off as creepy as anything this year (I just thank my dad for not having
these discussions with me when I was growing up).  One would think
Solandz would take advantage of these people, make them fodder for some
kind of satirical insight into humanity.
But he doesn't.  Solandz keeps a droll but distanced view on all of
them, not at all judging them for what they do, and sympathizing with
them enough that they come off as human beings but not too much that his
depictions become clouded.  There's no main character, and there's no
real narrative voice other than his own.  He never looks down on these
people for being evil or unhappy or whatever, but merely sees them for
what they are: people struggling to become happy.
Solandz's tone is reserved, but he still allows tons of comedy to seep
through.  His scenes have a curious and wicked detachment, and his
characters are human enough to be funny most of the time.  He shows he's
a master of pop culture skewering by taking the horrible 80s Air Supply
song "I'm All Out of Love" and turning it into a hilarious love song,
then laces it with a curious sweetness I didn't think he was possible of
before this movie.  Though his characters are humorously drawn, he still
manages to make them human, though, which may be the film's strongest
aspect.  Despite their shortcomings and wonton desires, they're all
still seen as people like you and me, struggling with the usual
problems, and with the same ideals as all of us.
The acting by everyone is incredible, and it's hard to single anyone out
totally as the best.  Jane Adams, though, does the best job out of the
sisters, making her naive Joy into a gentle and lovable creature, and
Philip Seymour Hoffman and Camryn Manheim perform wonderfully in their
respective roles as two people who may or may not find love if they can
only get over themselves and their own insecurities (not to mention
pasts).  Dylan Baker has the toughest job, and his performance as the
pedophilic husband is perhaps the most moving of the year.  He dares to
make him a human being, and manages to make his desire to succumb to his
weakness one of the easiest to relate to, even if we're not relating to
his own personal desire.  Everything's worth it just for that scene
where he has a wrenching heart-to-heart with his son towards the end,
where he lets all the truth pour out without any filter.  This guy's so
good that if this suddenly became a huge hit, he'd come down with
Anthony Perkins disease, and never work again, at least not notably.
Although "Happiness" is a rather unnerrving experience to watch, it's
nevertheless essential to view because out of all the films I've seen
this year, this may be the most truthful about humanity (and I know I've
said that at least once this year), and may be the most shockingly
disturbing.  You walk out with mixed feelings: you enjoyed it, but then
again, you kinda didn't.  But its strength lies in the fact that it
admits to not knowing what happiness is, but rather that it at least
knows that happiness is not getting what you most desire.
Homepage at: htttp://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
Director: Jonathan Demme
Writers: Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese, and Adam Brooks (based on
the novel by Toni Morrison)
Starring: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise,
Beah Richards, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Albert Hall, Irma P. Hall
Since most movies about slavery shield us from the true horrors of what
they're portraying, it's fitting to say that "Beloved" come as a real
shock as a film.  It's confusing, bizarre, and as tough a film to watch
as any film I've seen all year, and that's not necessarily because of
the three-hour running time.  "Beloved" is challenging to watch, filled
with tough and powerful poetry that takes us completely off guard, and
instead of a straight-forward, Hollywood-ized story about what happened
to the slaves after they were freed, "Beloved" comes off as a cry of
anguish from all those who actually lived through what happened (or,
rather, Toni Morrison, who wrote the novel upon which this is based).
"Beloved" tells the story of an ex-slave named Sethe, played by Oprah
Winfrey, who lives on a large farm in the north with her children.  When
the film opens, her house is being terrorized by a poltergeist, which
shakes things up, wounds the dog, and makes things generally
uncomfortable for the family.  Sethe is proud, though, and will not
move.  Her sons run away, leaving only her and her daughter, Denver
(Kimberly Elise) alone with the ghost which is there without any factual
explanation.
A couple years pass, and the ghost remains, and one day, a man named
Paul D (Danny Glover), another ex-slave who knew Sethe years ago when
they worked on a plantation together, arrives, asking for lodging.  He
has been wandering around since he left the plantation, and when he
enters the house, it turns red and becomes incredibly hot.  When he
remarks about what he thinks is evil, Sethe replies "It ain't evil.
It's just sad."
Some more time passes, and Paul D has become a fervent member of the
household, and the ghost disappears.  But when they return one day from
going out, they discover a young woman sitting in the house.  Her name
is Beloved, and as played by Thandie Newton, she has almost zero motor
skills.  She stumbles around, half-grabbing onto things and knocking
them over, and when she speaks, she lets out a low guttural sound that
eventually turns into baby talk.  They let her into her house, and she
begins to turn things upside down.
"Beloved" acts like an incredibly difficult chamber drama paired with a
ghost story.  Most of the scenes consist of people arguing in one
claustrophobic, low-lit room, with the occasional flash to the past,
where we see images of such horror that we thank god for modern-day
psychoanalysts.  Sethe and Paul D have lived through such hellish times
that they are forever implanted with the memories of their slavehood on
the old plantation, which includes such images as Sethe being raped by
the white plantation hands, with her nipples being licked, prompting her
to cry out to Paul D when reminiscing about it, "They took my milk!"
Worst of all was the month after her freedom, when she was allowed to
live like a free person, working with other blacks on a farm, and then
seeing that her old plantation owners have arrived to presumedly take
her and her children back.  She runs to the barn near by, carrying her
four children, and when her old owners burst in, they discover she has
murdered one of them and is ready to murder the rest of them if they
don't leave them alone.  When she is inquired about this moment by Paul
D in a moment halfway through the film, she says she doesn't regret it.
She killed her daughter so that she would not have to live through the
horror she did, and she has convinced herself she did the right thing.
Of course, Beloved is really her daugher materialized, though we aren't
flat out told that until later on in the film.  Beloved represents the
pain and suffering the slaves went through and shows how difficult it
was for them to deal with their freedom after being tortured for so
long.  Thus, "Beloved" becomes a sorta-redux of the Andrei Tarkofsky
sci-fi classic, "Solaris," where a cosmonaut discovers that his wife,
who commited suicide years before, has materialized when he is orbiting
over a planet with a complex brain system.  That film spoke volumes
about humanity and our memories, how we are constantly regretting what
happened in the past, and when if it ever literally came back to haunt
us, it would control us completely.
"Beloved" moves along freely, without a lot of explanation, and for the
most part, this is extremely respectable.  The most interesting films
are the ones that don't explain everything for us, leaving gaps in the
characters that we are supposed to fill in with how they act in the
present tense.  Sethe is never fully explained as a character, but we
understand all her actions since she's being played by Oprah Winfrey.
It's been well over a decade since her last major performance in "The
Color Purple," but judging from these two films, I'll bet she's one of
the best actresses working today...if she was strictly an actress.  Her
talk show, which I suppose is a great entity, has prevented her from
becoming a noteworthy actress, and that's a shame because she brings so
much to this movie.  Emotion.  Sadness.  Strength.  Watching the strong
Sethe, who's so afraid of the past that she's built a rather strong
protective coating around herself, break down when she discovers who
Beloved really is is what makes this movie really great.  She makes it
real.
That's not to say this is a perfect film.  In fact, I'd wager to say
that the fact that it's confusing and painful to watch is what prevents
this from being the truly great film it is.  While Oprah's performance
is powerful and easily sympathetic (and I'm dying to see her win at
least an Oscar nomination this February), the structure of the film,
which doesn't show what happened to her children till halfway through
the film, prevents us from really making a cohesive connection to the
film.  It doesn't necessarily move as though they're memories of one
particular character, and by the end, it has lost control over Sethe,
and as she takes to bed, we are unable to truly identify with her
anymore.
But despite its tediousness, perhaps that's the point.  The distancing
by the end of the film may be just part of the way it has been built
from the start, since they figure she has crossed over from being
identifiable, and it needs to get back with reality.  And for the most
part, this film seems like the cry of pain from the slaves that it
really wants to be.  Jonathan Demme's direction is bizarre, in nature
with the story, and he creates the right mood, making it a tough film to
sit through, making sure that the audience feels as uncomfortable as the
characters.
There's more to admire here, like the way that the flashbacks pop up
freely and without real organization, just like they would be in real
life; and the way that the ending leaves it somewhat open to more pain
and suffering, but laced with a touch of optimism.  The acting, not only
from Winfrey, is amazing, and I anticipate not only she will get an
Oscar nomination.  Everyone has been raving about Thandie Newton's
performance, and how it should be rewarded.  However, it must be noted
that out of everyone, she had the easiest part.  Act like a baby.  Throw
things.  Stumble around.  Chew food with your mouth open.  I do think
there's another performance worthy of Oscar conisderation, but it's
Kimberly Elise, as the daugher who has to stay sensible and sane, and
has to carry the burden of her mother's loss of reality towards the
end.  It's not that Newton isn't great: she's as annoying and wacky as
the role demands.  It's just that Elise has the tougher job and pulls it
off even better.
Despite the fact that this film has Winfrey written all over it, and not
that of writer Morrison or director Demme, "Beloved" has still not done
well.  Costing, I think, around ninety million dollars, it has since
grossed about twenty-two.  Unfortunately, this film is a little too
intense for viewers, even for me, and I can stand almost anything (I
recently viewed the 2 1/2 hour long epic "Caligula," the worst film I
have ever seen in my life, and did it in a mere 2 sittings).  Although I
respect "Beloved," I can't say that I really enjoyed it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Director: Roger Krumble
Writer: Roger Krumble (based on the novel "Les Liasons Dangereuses" by
Cholderos de Laclos)
Starring: Ryan Phillippe, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Reese Witherspoon,
Selma Blair, Joshua Jackson, Sean Patrick Thomas, Eric Mabius, Louise
Fletcher, Christine Baranski, Tara Reid, Swoosie Kurtz
We've been overly munundated with many things, but most recently, it's
been teen movies, which fall into either updates of 80s slasher movies
or 80s John Hughes movies.  Neither of them have actually spawned
anything even remotely good (the worst case, so far, being the dreaded
'I Know What You Did Last Summer'), but last year a film came out that
was intensely enjoyable all without being actually good.  That was 'Wild
Things,' the trashy, B-movie with a vengeance John MacNaughton flick
that came out last year that was, yes, a pretty terrible movie, but was
so gleefully nonchalant in its trashiness that it took on a thumbs-up
worthy guilty pleasure facade.  I'm, however, not going to compare that
film to this one; the only thing these two films have in common is an
air of sexual openness that actually goes to help the film rather than
detract from.  'Wild Things,' after all, was trash; it had a
silly story that would have made its way to either a soft core direct to
video release or a less-steamy made-for-TV USA movie.  'Cruel
Intentions,' on the other hand, boasts not only strong, but incredible
source material: freakin' 'Les Liasons Dangereuses,' for Christ's sake
-- the same story that has inspired at least one opera, a play, and a
couple of film adaptations (the most notable being the terrific 1988
Stephen Frears' flick, 'Dangerous Liasons,' a favorite of mine).  So
y'all should basically know the story - that of two mischievous
aristocrats who plot to devirginize a virgin while also plotting
Machiavellian humiliations for others who have humiliated them.
It should come as no shock to you that this is a modernized story,
taking place in the upper crust of Manhattan society, with the main
characters being spoiled teenagers who live in a world devoid of adult
supervision (could this be a satire?).  The two main characters are
basically the same: one Sebastian Valmont (Ryan Philippe) and the
obscure object of his desire, Kathryn Merteuil-Valmont (Sarah Michelle
Gellar), his attractive, sex-kitten stepsister.  The two love to
humiliate others as they plot revenge on others, and even as the film
begins, Sebastian has gotten back at his over-charging shrink (Swoosie
Kurtz - an in-joke; she was in 'Dangerous Liasons'), and Kathryn has
already figured out her chief goal: to deflower the girl who has stolen
the heart of her most recent boyfriend, the ignorant and overall stupid
Cecille (Selma Blair).  She calls on Sebastian to seduce her, but he's
already up for destroying the credibility of another: Annette Hargrove
(Reese Witherspoon), a perpendicular teen who has gone so far as to
write a column in 'Seventeen' about how she'll resist the, uh, urge
until after marriage, and, as it just so happens, is spending a month or
two at their aunt's estate.  The two make a bet: if he can't seduce
Annette and succeed within a certain amount of time, she wins his
beloved car; if he does, he can have her ('You can put it wherever you
want' is her deal-closer).
Refreshingly enough, the story follows the same basic plot elements, and
even provides many of the same characters of the original, including
Cecille's music teacher/love interest (Sean Patrick Thomas) and
Sebastian's friend (Joshua Jackson) who's sleeping with a pawn in the
story (Eric Mabius).  And it has the same basic plot structure: as
Sebastian successfully woos Annette, he accidentally falls in love with
her, as a so-called ironic twist.  Big difference, though: in the
original story (and '88 film), this is handled to near perfection.  No
big theatrics, no cornball emotions; its subtlety seems real, and it
never felt like the character was being betrayed at all.  That has been
replaced here by, well, cornball emotions and spell-out-the-theme scenes
which stand out as annoyingly preachy and mechanical.  Whenever a scene
comes up where Sebastian is either around Annette when he realizes he
loves her or is dealing with it, it's head-nodding time, and by the end,
it has reached a climax that feels horribly contrived and fake, not to
mention hilariously condescending.  The big confrontation between
Sebastian and Cecille's lover, in fact, is awfully executed: all three
characters involved just seem to stumble upon eachother at the same time
in a city the size of New York, and its conclusion is atrociously rote.
Following it is the worst part of all: a sequence so horribly preachy
and moralistic that I couldn't believe they seriously used a) slow
motion photography at those key moments, or b) that darned song, which
just spells out the theme (for the record, it's the Verve's otherwise
nifty 'Bittersweet Symphony').  I hate to keep up with the comparisons,
but just watch the ending of 'Dangerous Liaisons' - the booing and the
tear destroying the touted face - and you'll see how hackneyed and,
well, terrible this one is (just one annoying side comment: did they
actually have to title the memoirs?).
But other than the downhill escalation the film takes at around the hour
mark, 'Cruel Intentions' isn't all that bad.  Its blunt portrayal of
wicked, egotistical teens is mighty refreshing, and its crude sexual
humor is downright hilarious (Sebastian and Kathryn's sexual repartee is
quite giggle-inducing).  Even its otherwise-considered offensive
elements - its handling of interracial relationships, two flat-out gay
characters, and a lengthy, controversial lesbian kiss between Gellar and
Blair (the camera just closes right in on it and holds for, oh, 30
seconds, showing tongue and all) - aren't so offensive as they are neat
90s twists on the story, just to give it some extra umph along the way.
Even the acting's not bad.  We all know the Witherspoon's a talented
actress, but here she's the best thing about the movie: she gives her
character a surprising amount of depth - after you hear about her and
first meet her, she's hardly what you'd expect.  Gellar...well, she's
since grown on me from those days when my female friend made me watch
episodes of 'Swan's Crossing' with her, thus destroying any intense
likeability I may have ever had for her.  But here, she's nice and icy,
hardly to the point Glenn Close was once upon a time, but at least she
gives it the old college try (and nearly succeeds - maybe some work
towards the end would have helped her a bit, but go ahead and blame the
writer on this one).  Philippe is also slowly growing on me, what since
'Last Summer' and '54,' but he's still not there.  His giddy detachment
in the opening hour are nice, but his attempt at a transformation is
astoundingly inept and little more than a descent into soap opera
acting, terrible delivery of terrible lines and all.
The rest of the cast is merely fine, with kudos going to Joshua Jackson
for his now trademark nonchalantness of line delivery and defames going
to Selma Blair who overacts her goofy part so much that I nearly dreaded
every time her character appeared on screen.  And the direction is
nicely sleek and even a bit on the sexy side now and then.  Do I think
this was a successful adaptation of a great piece of literature?  Well,
maybe.  Is it a good film, though?  Yeah, I'd say so.  I'd even go as
far as to give it a recommendation, basically because this film knows
that it's basically trashy, romance novel stuff and not the deeper stuff
of a great French novel.  As it was fun to watch Malkovich and Close toy
with people in 'Dangeous Liasons' (I'll forever have the image of
Malkovich writing to his beloved Pfieffer on the posterior of a
courtesan embroidered on my membrane), it's fun to watch Philippe and
Gellar do the same to the characters in this film.  But what made
'Dangeous Liasons' worth it all was the third act, where Malkovich
really fell in love, really blew it, and Close was finally exposed
(again, great final shot - I can't mention that enough).  Here, it's not
unlike watching, well, teenagers do the same material: you don't feel
anywhere near the same about the ending; you're too busy going 'aw,
aren't they cute as they try their darndest at tough source material.'
Well, they gave it the old high school try, but this will always be a
teen adaptation and never just an adaptation.  Sorry, guys.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for My Name Is Joe (1998)
Starring: Peter Mullan, Louise Goodall, David McKay, Anne-Marie Kennedy, 
David Hayman, Gary Lewis, Lorraine McIntosh
Lucky for us, "...and I'm and Alcoholic" didn't fit on the marquee, 
because then we may have been guaranteed another tiresome story of a 
man's struggle against his past cornball affliction, which it could have 
very well been. It also could have been yet another in a long line of UK 
social commentary, where the characters and everything else that 
possibly go into filmmaking take a distant backseat to sometimes sharp, 
sometimes unabashedly naive satire - basically one of my major pet 
peeves - but miraculously enough, social commenter Ken Loach opts to 
toss that in the backseat, and run away with everything else, including 
characterization and emotion. And thank god, because not only have we 
seen too much UK social commentary in the last decade to last us our 
entire lives, but we've not had many films that are this alive and this 
intelligently realistic. Love stories these days seem to follow a 
tiresome group of cliches, like the people in love are merely taking the 
appropriate steps, and trying to get from point to point without every 
just savoring moments like the ones here. And when "My Name is Joe" is 
lingering over shared moments between not only its two protagonists, but 
with others like a soccer team and other aquaintances of the leads, it's 
one of the best films of the year. It has such a natural energy to it 
that doesn't feel put-upon, and such a whimsical brand of charm and wit 
that even when it begins to look like it may fly into Mt. Cliche, it's 
easily forgivable because we're near sure that other great moments and 
scenes are going to come up and bring us back into the movie, and only a 
couple more times does the alcoholism and recovering from thereof come 
back into play, and only once in a cliched fashion (that's not a bottle 
in his hand, is it?!).
And without all the great stuff that Ken Loach and company bring to the 
film, it would have been yet another movie about a man's escape from his 
past, which it basically is, only here the emotions are felt and earned. 
Joe, the main character, is played by Peter Mullan as a energetic, 
un-bitter man who's had a rough life before the present, but is eager to 
make up for his past life and maybe even find happiness. Many of we 
yanks may actually recognize Mullan: he's starred in not only in Danny 
Boyle's "Shallow Grave" (as one of the doomed henchmen), but also in 
"Trainspotting" (as the bald, buff, drug dealer, Mother Superior), and 
here finally comes into light as a strong and wonderful actor (he's 
already won himself an award at Cannes, and rightfully so). He has a 
welcoming presence, kind of like a more appreciable Will Patton, with a 
deep tobacco voice and an instantly aimiable presence that makes his 
character effortlessly sympathetic. He wears a windbreaker and sneakers, 
and seems impatient and always on the move, despite the fact that he's 
currently jobless.
He's also the coach of a local soccer team, which he handles like a 
father fusses over kids, and one day when picking up one of his players, 
he runs into a social worker named Sarah (Louise Goodall), has a bit of 
a tiff with her, and runs into her later on. Pushy yet not creepily, he 
gives her his phone number, offering to do her wallpaper for some extra 
money, and is soon flirting with her and then going out on a date with 
her. They get alone greatly and quickly, because they've both in their 
own way been beat down and aren't expecting much, and are soon carrying 
on a relationship that makes the both of them extremely happy. These are 
the best parts of the film because, depsite a couple put-upon instances 
(she locks herself out of her house and has to stay at his house for the 
night...), they have a natural comedy and feel that never succumbs to 
cornball sentamentalism (even a scene where he tells her about why he 
has a Beethoven tape that opens up a deep wound feels completely and 
100% real). The second half, which adds local drug dealing tension to 
the story, seems less real, though, and more like a need to fulfill the 
otherwise-goodguy-pulled-back-to-his-past formula. One of his soccer 
players, an otherwise superb chap named Liam (David McKay) finds he owes 
a good sum to a local mafiaso named McGowan (David Hayman), but can't 
pay it, even after his wife had tried to pay it off by dealing while he 
did a brief stint in jail (and ended up using a bunch of it). Feeling a 
father-like relationship with him, Joe goes to bat for him, and agrees 
to pick up two cars for McGowan filled with drugs, despite his wondering 
why Liam can't just do it.
Basically, it's a guess-what-happens-next rhetorical question here, but 
strangely enough, while the actual plot elements of Joe picking up drugs 
and trying to save Liam feel a touch on the fake side, the love story 
and the story of Joe never feel like they've been trifled with, and, in 
fact, they seem to only be accentuated and built upon because of them. 
This is because through everything, we understand Joe's character, and 
we can realize that despite doing otherwise stupid things, he's really 
trying to prove himself a good person all along, even if he can't 
correctly balance everything. And when the romance slowly becomes 
severed because of his involvement with McGowan, we feel that what's 
happening as a result is real, even if what has actually happened to 
cause the complications seem a bit fake. Even by the time he's resorted 
to the cliche of doing away with his alcohol aversion, we don't feel so 
much that a cliche has been touched upon, but that Joe himself as a 
character and as a person has been deeply woudned, perhaps without any 
hope. Frankly, despite the rampant use of cliches and contrivances, "My 
Name is Joe" posesses a really damn good story because it's told so well 
and in such an involving and unique manner.
And because Joe is seen as a good guy but with flaws (the occasional 
outburst of dramatics, the need to always do the right thing and be 
selfless, his desire to be happy, etc, etc), it's easier and much more 
comfortable to feel that Joe is a character worth caring about, and 
through most of it, he's not been destroyed by his past but by his own 
personality. He's not controlled by a plot, which is giving him a shit 
deal; he's giving himself a shit deal, and it's more justified for we 
the audience to care about what happens to him. A subject like this is 
many a time more interesting than a social commentary or another 
recovering alcoholic story, and it's told by Loach in such an 
idisoyncractic way, making due notice of the foibles and characteristics 
of its characters, that it's almost a shame that it does introduce the 
McGowan subplot at all. Loach has shot it using a dark, pale tone, 
accentuating the more dark aspects of the film's undertones (of a 
plagued society - thankfully, this is left as merely an undertone), but 
this is not a depressing movie - it's filled with life and the 
cinematography only gives it a deeper feeling of naturalism, despite the 
fact that the stateside print of this film has been given distracting 
(though helpful to some - not me, though) subtitles, perhaps a result of 
bitches about the regional accents in such UK films as "The Full Monty" 
and "The Butcher Boy," which start out I thought as a joke, but then 
continue on, like annoying closed-captioning.
And by the end, despite a rather sobering stream of tragic events, "My 
Name is Joe" is less of a social commentary or a traditional story of 
good guys with tragic lives and more of a celebration of life, since the 
best moments are the moments where the characters are just being, and 
these moments tend to overcome the otherwise traditional moments that 
populate a good deal of the second half. Even the ending, which could 
have otherwise been maudlin and generic, seemed like an emotionally 
devastating blow to the head without ever going too far, and without 
tending to stand out as bad moves in a film which is so filled with 
humor and wit (the comedy in this film, including stabs at a bagpipe 
player and the soccer team's uniforms, peeks its head up sporadically 
without feeling like it was tossed in there as a break). My only wish 
was that this film was more affecting, and took more advantage of the 
naturalism that it so wonderfully displays in the less didactic scenes, 
which are amongst the best of the year. For a film that steers so far 
away from sucumbing to becoming maudlin, it'd be nice if it just went - 
and excuse my clumsy allusion to a recent Disney movie here - the 
distance.
(And yes, that's Gary Lewis, of Gary Lewis and the Playboys, as Joe's 
chum, Shanks).
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Soldier's Daughter Never Cries, A (1998)
Director: James Ivory
Writers: James Ivory and Ruth Prawer Jhabvala (based on the novel by
Kaylie Jones)
Starring: Kris Kristofferson, Barbara Hershey, Leelee Sobieski, Jesse
Bradford, Anthony Ruth Costanzo, Dominique Blanc, Jane Birkin, Virginie
Ledoyen, Samuel Gruen, Luisa Conlon, Isaach de Bankolé, Nick Nolte
"A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries" is a beautifull shot and beautifully
memorable film, crafted like it was a series of episodes from one life,
divided into three sections of emotional maturity.  It just so happens
that that's exactly what its source is.  Adapted from the
semi-autobiographical novel by Kaylie Jones, daughter of famous American
war scribe, James Jones (author of "Red Badge of Courage" and "The Thin
Red Line"), this film has been meticulously created to be episodic in
structure, and more like distant remembrances than actual emotional
involvement.  And like all films like this, it not only involves in the
story at hand, but it forces us to remember our own pasts, and what has
shaped us to be the person that we are at the moment.
As a skematic for a person's current life, "A Soldier's Daughter Never
Cries" is never fully complete, and there are moments where we don't
understand the lead's motives until the moment she makes her choices.
As a tragedy, which what it would be in the hands of others, it's
unfulfilling, and little subplots (like the daughter's relationship with
her brother) are never totally together.  And there are more than a
couple notable ends left dangling in the wind.  But that's exactly how
it has been designed to be: just the right amount of judgment on
situations with a twist of emotion.  The events of the film are told in
an almost distant tone, but what transpires from them become exactly
like happy/sad memories.  For instance, the story's plot is supposed to
be about a family who has lived most of their life in France coming back
to America, where the teenage children have to assimilate, but it never
feels like that is the actual point of this story.  It feels more like a
woman at an older, more mature age rereading her diary she kept when a
young girl.
The woman, renamed Channe Willis (played at a young age by Luisa
Conlon), is first seen living in Paris with her parents, author Bill
(Kris Kristoferson) and beautiful wife Marcella (Barbara Hershey), when
they adopt a young child named Benoit (played at a young age by Samuel
Gruen), who was the son of a young french woman (Virginie Ledoyen), too
young to keep him.  Benoit happily renames himself after his new father,
and becomes best friends with Channe.  Once grown up to about the age of
14, the two have drifted apart and Channe (now played by Leelee
Sobieski) befriends an affeminate boy named Francis (Anthony Ruth
Costanzo) at her multi-lingual school, and the two become inseperable,
isolating Billy (Jesse Bradford).  Slowly and methodically, Francis gets
on her nerves, though, distancing himself from her until he finally
confesses his undying love for her in an idiosyncratic and touching
scene.
But throughout, despite who is the closest man or boy in her life, her
father always lingers over her.  Though a notorious drunkard and being
totally and hilarious redneck, Kristoferson brilliantly crafts Bill into
the most wonderfully paternal figure of the year.  He's gruff and
intimidating but he's also bizarrely charming and approachable.  When
his health begins to fail a bit, he decides he wants to move back to
America, and his children react differently to the massive change.
Channe becomes promiscuous, and Billy becomes a loafer, watching TV
constantly, a bag of chips never being far away.
As her father's days near an end due to a mortal illness, they become
even closer: she confesses her promiscuous ways to him, and he takes it
matter-of-factly.  When she becomes serious over a boy, and they get to
the point that they want to sleep together, Bill shocks both of them by
suggesting they sleep in her bed, under the same roof - "If they're
gonna do it, they might as well do it right."
This film is chock full of moments like that, the moments that become
memorable not only to the people who live through them, but to those who
observe silently.  And throughout the film, we get the picture that this
family is completely unique, like all families.  They're close yet still
comfortably distant, and all are respective of eachother, even when they
have fits of selfish rage (on New Years Eve, Marcella lays a massive
head trip on her daughter the likes of which I hope I never have to
endure personally).  This is all told in the reserved, matter-of-fact
manner that Merchant Ivory productions have been acclaimed for.  They
tell their plot points flat out, without a whole lot of production, but
then quietly observe the little emotional attachments that come along
with them.  "The Remains of the Day" would be such a boring flick if it
hadn't been for the way they quietly observed the Anthony Hopkins
character, and brought out his inner demons (that's also thanks to
Hopkins, of course).  Well, they work the same way for the characters in
"A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries."  They observe Channe, and all those
around her, especially her father, a man who borders on flawless legend
and down-to-earth flawed human being.
The acting is simplistic and pretty incredible.  Sobieski, totally
annoying in her past films like "Jungle 2 Jungle" and "Deep Impact," is
totally fascinating to watch here (this gives me hopes for her
supporting turn in the upcoming Kubrick film).  Hershey hasn't been this
good in years.  And Kristoferson gives the performance of his life, at
least as to what I've seen of him (which means, I guess, that this is
his best performance, followed by "Big Top Pee Wee").  As notoriously
redneck as he is, he shows that he's a totally lovable actor, and if
there's some special award for "Best Performance by an Actor Who We All
Thought Had Very Little Talent Previously," hands down it'd go to
Kristoferson.  He and the other actors make this all seem real, and
that's the reason this film is so entertaining to watch.  A film like
this reminds us how little plot matters in certain films - it just
matters how much it affects us with the little things, and the memories
it gives us after the film has been long over.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Velvet Goldmine (1998)
Director: Todd Haynes
Writer: Todd Haynes (story by James Lyons and Haynes)
Starring: Jonathan Rhys Meyers, Ewan McGregor, Toni Collette, Christian
Bale, Eddie Izzard, Emily Woof, Michael Feast
It may seem weird to begin a film about Glam Rock with a sequence that
includes a spaceship, a green ovular pin, and the birth of Oscar Wilde,
but if one really strains, they can see that perhaps maybe these
connections are not half off.  Wilde's philosophy was that everyone
should be true to their own human nature, and the result of his
following this philosophy was that he was imprisoned, loosing his family
and his career.  The Glam Rock movement in the early 70s in England had
a similar take and came to a similar demise.  The main difference was by
placing makeup on their face and acting out on their deepest fantasies
and inquiries about life (mostly dealing with androgony and sexuality),
they became less and less like themselves and more and more like
everyone else.  And that's why the movement seemed to end as soon as it
began.
It's been said that Todd Haynes' "Velvet Goldmine," the film that
chronicles what it was like to be a part of the movement, not only from
those who experienced it but by those who created it, steals a lot from
"Citizen Kane," and that's true.  In the film, a British journalist in
the 80s, Arthur Stuart (Christian Bale), is asked to go back and find
out what happened to 70s Glam Rock star Brian Slade, a fictitious rock
star, who faked his own death on stage, bringing the end not only to his
career but to the entire Glam Rock movement.  Structure-wise, this
totally steals from "Kane," not only from the set-up (he interviews
three people, and the story is a result of their flashbacks), but in
other things, like the beginning (death, then newsreel), and smaller
details, like the bitter ex-friend in a wheelchair and the bitter
ex-wife as a washed-up lounge singer, found in a bar after hours.
This is no "Kane," and it really doesn't aspire to be: it doesn't
attempt to be the deep outlook of something gone like "Kane" did, and it
doesn't really uncover anything poignant about humanity.  Instead, it
uses the flashbacks as a form of contrast between the magic that was the
Glam Rock era and the boredom that was life after Glam Rock for those
who were participants.  The 80s scenes are dry and deliriously
melancholy, equipped with a performance by Bale that is perhaps
appropriately dull and unengaging.
But the 70s scenes are engaging, though, not to mention addictively
campy.  They radiate with gorgeous cinematography that nicely
accentuates all the vibrant colors of the era, and a feel that's so
eerily lighthearted that when combined with the then-footage, they
become not only a symbol of decadence, but of times when everything
seemed so simple.  Instead of creating the world the way it was, Haynes
paints their own world as if it were a narcotic fairy tale: the Glam
Rock movement was full of so much freedom and liberation that after
you've experienced it, everything else seems so mundane.  There's no
outside world to speak of, secluding these people inside a protective
globe that will eventually crack.
Haynes focuses his story on the tale of Blade and the other fictitious
rock hero, Curt Wild, and their relationship that created, molded, and
then brought down the movement, reducing everyone else who contributed
to it as merely that - contributors.  Blade - played with reserve by the
pouty Jonathan Rhys Meyers - and Wild - played with anarchic wildness by
Ewan McGregor - are little more than thinly disguised recreations of
David Bowie and Iggy Pop, respectively, complete with the creation of a
Ziggy Stardust persona named Maxwell Demon and the confirmation that the
two rock stars may have very well not only have been one-time partners
in music, but also partners in bed.
Through discussions with Slade's ex-manager Cecil (Michael Feast),
ex-wife Mandy (Toni Collette, reinventing herself as an American blonde
dish who fakes a British accent when with Slade), and finally ex-partner
Wild, journalist Stuart begins to remember his own experiences in the
era, like his discovery of his rebelliousness cum conformity, including
the moment when he began questioning his own sexuality (when he opens up
his first Slade record, he finds a naked and green Slade lying on a
crimson blanket), and finally running away from home to be part of the
London scene, finally resulting in leading a boring job in America.
Haynes demonstrates that he's quite the visual auteur, molding scenes
that are like long heald breaths, such as a seemingly long sequence
juxtaposing a Slade/Wild concert of them performing a Brian Eno cover,
"Baby's on Fire," with scenes from a decadent drug party; and the film's
most wow-inspiring sequence, the first concert scene of Wild with his
band, the Ratttz, where McGregor lets loose so much anarchic steam that
his wild Iggy-esuqe movements (including stripping naked) and screams
that the film captures that perfect moment when one discovers a major
talent, and another (Slade) discovers his idle.  Even the brief music
videos, spoofs of Bowie's, have a rare visual flair that's pure camp,
and which would cause Ken Russell to drool.
The best sequence, though, may be the beginning, following the prelude,
a sequence which acts as the middle ground for both the actual being of
the movement and the post-movement era.  In it, Stuart and his mates are
going to the infamous Slade concert where he fakes his own death, where
he kills off his alter ego Maxwell Demon in what appears to be a real
assasination, which brought about the end of the era in one swift fake
bullet.  With Brian Eno's famous "Needle in the Camel's Eye" playing in
the background, the scene has a detached exhileration - the song doesn't
seem to be played in quite the same way the other songs are.  It has a
distance that's hard to put a finger on, and it seems to represent that
all this is coming to a quick and sad ending, and when one sees Slade in
the dressing room before the show, docked in a silver frock with wings
and blue hair, depressingly staring into the mirror, it comes off as a
none-too-obvious prophecy of the finale in the beginning of the film.
This movie's not so much about plot, but more about the way it is
presented, making this one of those films which is classified as being
"style over substance," a statement which prompts many critics to line
up for attack.  However, for the most part, the engaging part of this
film is not the story but rather the way in which Haynes creates this
world, by using his sets, costumes, cinematography, and especially the
music to play as characters in his film.  The music is especially
notable.  The soundtrack, which is wall to wall, consists of old school
Glam Rock tunes by the likes of Brian Eno, T-Rex, and Roxy Music, as
well as covers by Slade's band (with vocals by Thom Yorke, and
occasionally Rhys Meyers himself), and even newer music by Shudder to
Think that sounds uncannily Bowie-like.
The cast is rather impressive, but no one really walks away with the
film, and no performances are extremely good.  Although Eddie Izzard, as
Slade's manager (who challenges Slade's first manager to an
arm-wrestling match to see who gets control of his career) and Michael
Feast as the first and tragic manager come off greatly, and Collette and
McGregor have their moments, Rhys Meyers and Bale are noticably sub-par,
neither putting a lot of effort into their respective roles.  Some of it
is at fault with the actual construction of the film by Haynes.  Rhys
Meyers' Brian Slade remains merely a metaphor for the Glam Rock era,
dying when he turned into a retro-Garbo, resorting to a life of
Salinger-ism, and found in the mid-70s to be lying around, sniffing coke
off the ass of a party girl.  In fact, no one in this film is really
seen as a person, rather than just as a symbol or composite of a type
who thrived during the era.  Bale's character is an especially tough
sell: bitter and depressed by flashbacks to his young adulthood, he's
not an extremely personal character, and his cliched experiences (being
hounded by the record store guys for buying a record put out by a
"poof") never help us communicate with him.
Nevertheless, Rhys Meyers and McGregor have the excuses that their
characters are not really characters but rather the results of an era
that has left them, and others, bitter, part of which helps the film
work, since this is a major piece of eye candy.  At the prime of the
movie, they at least look the role of fashionable leaders - Slade with
his perpetually-changing, androgonys persona, and Wild with his topless
and unpredictable image, which clash and fuse into an unstable union.
Their story - of how Slade was so influenced by Wild that he adapted it
into a similar who-cares attitude crossed with camp - is engaging,
without the personal background.  The story of Stuart, though, is a
tougher sell because he's the everyman, and when you can't totally
identify with the everyman, your story's in slight trouble.
As a cultural rock piece, "Velvet Goldmine" is rather good, but it is
merely good.  It never totally takes off, although it has moments where
it absolutely flies, but then comes back down.  It's really nothing more
than a bunch of really great moments, surrounded by material that could
really be much better.  The beginning is captivating but slow, the
middle is fantastic, and the ending is not only shallow but worse than
that, it drags (the final half hour not only does it not bring the story
to any real conclusion, it could probably stop at any point).  And did
anyone really figure out what the mystery is that Arthur unearths?  It
almost seems like there was no point in the entire investigation other
than to unearth the past, which is commendable but not totally so.
Still, it does what the Oliver Stone pic "The Doors" didn't do right,
becoming very insightful to what happened, using the visual style to hit
most of the right notes of contrast between what made the era so great
to those who lived during it and why after living through such an era
that everything else seems half-assed (I suppose the message is: "Live
life, but after you've lived it, what else is the point when you'll be
forced to live with regretful memories?").  The really superb
achievement of this film is that during its flashbacks, it successfully
creates for the audience what it must have felt like to be in that era,
but with the added perk of knowing the result of all that goes down.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Love Is the Devil (1998)
Writer/Director: John Maybury
Starring: Derek Jacobi, Daniel Craig, Anne Lambton, Tilda Swinton,
Adrian Scarborough, Karl Johnson, Annabel Brooks, Richard Newbould
"Love is the Devil" is a challenging film, munundating its audience with
wild imagery and a plot structure that disallows a plot, perhaps in an
attempt to get us to know the artist's psyche rather than the artist's
lifeline.  Watching it, I was enthralled with the look of the film, the
way the director shot everything like it was looking through a bizarre,
personalized filter.  Everything looks like it is not how life looks
like but how painter Francis Bacon, the film's subject, looked at it
personally.
But while I was engrossed, I stumbled upon my thoughts halfway through
the film, awakened from my trance by some inner distraction, and began
to try and follow what's going on.  Exactly what was I looking at?
Watching this film, I wasn't sure if it was the most insightful film I
had ever seen or the most vacuous.  Directed (and written) by John
Maybury, "Love is the Devil" is stylish masterpiece for the senses.
Everything looks originally bizarre and perplexing.  The camera angles
are ferociously askew, and the close-ups are uncomfortably too close.
The editing is deft, occasionally cutting away to something bizarre
every couple seconds, but other times holding on a shot for so long that
you wonder if the audience is not supposed to be voyeurs, or rather,
intruders to Bacon's world and psyche.
As such, there is no real story.  I've not heard much about Francis
Bacon that I didn't read prior to the film, but what I learned was this:
he was a painter in England who reached his peak during the 60s and 70s,
drawing hideously bizarre drawings of carnage and the like.  He was one
of the first to really come out of the closet, and in interviews, he was
notoriously drunk yet incredibly witty.  As played by great Shakesperean
actor Derek Jacobi, he's like a foppish and self-absorbed cross between
Oscar Wilde and Nero.  He lives life the way he wants to live it, to the
disatisfaction of those who have the privelege of being really close to
him.  It's as if he were taking delight in the destruction of others and
maybe himself ("Champagne for my real friends, and pain for my sham
friends," he says one night at the bar he frequents).
"Love is the Devil" chronicles the latter part of his life.  Bacon,
well-known in his mid-life, awakens one night when he hears a man tumble
through his ceiling window and land on the floor.  He walks in, unafraid
of what he finds, and discovers a thief, George Dyer (Daniel Craig).
Bacon gives him an offer: if he spends the night with him, he can take
anything he wants in the morning.  George agrees to this, and off to bed
he goes, but ends up staying with him, for whatever reason.  The film
shows their lives together, at least in reference to one another.
While creating Bacon's world of friends (like "High Art," this film
minors in showing a certain group of people who radiate a connection
that is not shown but is understood), the film shows the relationship of
Bacon and George as it remains rather stagnant.  Bacon is haughty and
bizarre; George is simple and doesn't understand Bacon in the least,
especially not his paintings.  While watching this, that's basically all
I thought was there.  The film has a hypnotic feel, free of any
restraints of form, and is shot so uniquely that I felt my attention was
almost entirely on the way this film was made rather than what it is
about.
Once the film is over, it's easier to piece it together.  I kept on
thinking about this film, wondering what the point to all of it was.
Someone doesn't merely make a film of all style and no substance at all,
and if they do, they do it by accident, but still allow some substance
to creep in.  Thinking about it, I remembered how the two fed off of
eachother.  I thought about how Bacon was a masochist, in love with
cruelty (in one scene, he watches a boxing match with a orgiastic
delight, and lets out a squeal of pleasure when blood from the one
boxer's head splashes across his face; in another scene, he masturbates
to the Odessa Steps sequence of Eisenstein's "Battleship Potemkin"), and
perhaps he drove George too far in his delight for pain.  He drove him
over the edge, and for him that was love, even if it wasn't for George.
I guess that explains the title.  A bit.
That's great and all, but I almost wish the film was devoid of any
meaning.  I wish it hadn't reduced itself to making some point about
humanity, about how love is the most selfish thing in the world (and it
is, if you look at it a certain way).  Or maybe if it had avoided any
meaning about humanity and merely drove itself into being the one film
that was truly inside one man's twisted pysche.  It's almost always best
to obtain insights from looking at one man's uniqueness than it is
forcing universality down an audience's throat.  That way you don't
reduce your film to something it's just not.
I can't say I totally enjoyed "Love is the Devil," though.  Despite all
of the things I respect about this movie, it's still rather
uncomfortable to sit through.  Even at a normally trite length of ninety
minutes, the film still seems like an arduous task to sit through,
especially after an exhausting first hour.  Though hypnotic, it still
almost seems gimmicky and even redundant at times, as if it were taking
advantage of one man's truly bizarre nature but not doing anything
deeper with it.  As such, I respect the way the film looks.  It's
beautiful and painstakingly crafted so that, along with "What Dreams May
Come" and "Dark City," it's the year's most visually stunning film.  In
fact, if a better script had been forged, I'd almost compare it in
visual power to a Peter Greenaway film, complete with similar haunting
images that stick in the mind forever.  And with a dymanite performance
by Derek Jacobi, it has the comic and distanced tone that it needs.  I
just wish it had been more than mostly style and just a hair bit of
substance.  Then I would have had something to hold me over even now.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
Director: Vincent Ward
Writer: Ronald Bass (based on the novel by Richard Matheson)
Starring: Robin Williams, Annabella Sciorra, Cuba Gooding Jr., Max von
Sydow, Rosalind Chao, Josh Paddock, Jessica Brooks, Werner Herzog
Watching "What Dreams May Come" is really one of the more bizarre
evenings (or, in my case, afternoons) I've had at the movies in quite
some time, and I mean that positively.  It's unlike any big budget
mainstream I've seen since "Dark City," and while they share the same
brilliance in artistic and technical design, they also share a true
hypnotism: sitting back and really taking everything this film has to
offer in is like getting totally lost in a movie, and any real short
comings, the amount of which may be the real difference between these
two films, are easy to ignore until afterwards, the best time for
problems to surface anyway.
The protagonist, Chris Nielsen, is played by none other than Robin
Williams, the actor who has made an entire career out of playing
bigger-than-life characters in bizarre fantasy worlds.  This time, in
what seems to be his current attempt to be taken more seriously as an
actor (and by god we do, Robin), he plays it straight, as the entire
story is a serious bit of pondering on what may happen after one dies.
But the film is not necessarily about death, and when it begins, it's
about Chris meeting his soon-to-be-wife in a Meet-Cute scene that turns
into a joyfully happy marriage.
Although Chris and his wife, Annie (Annabella Sciorra), are happy and
have two kids (John Paddock and Jessica Brooks), they are soon struck
with tragedy when their kids are killed in a car accident.  This sends
Annie into a mental institution and somehow, Chris gets her out of it,
nurses her back, and gets her into painting as a form of therapy...then
he dies in a car accident.
The rest of the film, following this short exposition, is mostly
following Chris as he learns more and more about what happens after one
dies, like how we get our own heaven in which all of our desires come
true.  Personally, Chris ends up in one of Annie's paintings, a gorgeous
landscape of where they first met, which at first is actually made up of
acryllic paints, so when, for example, he picks up a flower from the
ground and crushes it, it turns into acryllic right in his hands.  As he
learns more, it turns into a real landscape, and he soon learns all the
other major perks of being dead: you can fly, you can breathe under
water, and everything you wish is at your command, more or less.  In
other words, it's like a much more controlled and more stable acid
trip.  Glad to know I have something to look forward to.
Along for the ride is Albert (Cuba Gooding Jr.), the Virgil to Chris'
Dante.  More or less, he explains things for him, though not everything
and usually after he's already discovered things.  And while he hangs
with them and another Oriental woman, Leona (Rosalind Chao), who takes
him to another heaven for a special emotional meeting, Annie is
meanwhile suffering emotional breakdown, but still desperately trying to
hang on.  Although Chris is able to communicate with her partially
before he ascends to his own heaven, it only destroys her more.  By the
mid-point, she has committed suicide, and has not wound up in heaven but
in hell, which is reserved not for the morally wicked but for those
who've committed the greatest sin: not being able to forgive one's self.
Chris ends up deciding to travel to hell to go find her, with the help
of a mysterious man dubbed The Tracker (and played by the great Max Von
Sydow, who with this, "The Seventh Seal," and "The Exorcist" - not to
mention "Needful Things" where he played Satan himself - has fully shown
he's a master of death, or something like that).  This may sound like a
typical Hollywood film from this point on, kinda like "Ghost" with
unstubtle Orpheus undertones (all Chris needs is a harp), but strangely
enough, this just seems to nicely blend with everything else as a
magical excursion to a foreign land never tred in other movies.
Visually, "What Dreams May Come" is outstanding, and is undoubtedly the
recipient of a nice Oscar nomination for Art Direction (too bad this and
"Dark City" had to come out in the same year).  The image of Chris'
heaven is like living inside components of Renaissance paintings, the
land of Myst, Angel memorablia, and Hallmark Greeting Cards.  Hell is
equally magestic, filled with an entrance that is as fiery and
frightening as we all imagined it would be (like the use of a lake to
surround the entrance to hell, as well as the use of Cerberus), while
the main part is instead a sea of faces buried into the ground, a sight
that is breathtaking and unnerrving.
This is all well and good, and luckily the rest of the movie is
wonderful as well.  The film, though obviously designed into a
traditional three act format, actually flows together quite nicely.
Each large sequence is like a mini-masterpiece unto itself of bizarro
introductions and amazing sights, and there doesn't seem to be any
filler.  This makes for a film that just pulls us right into the moment,
and works us over so much with bringing a brand new vision of the
afterlife to us that we damn near forget about plot advancement.
Unfortunately, "What Dreams May Come" has come under some serious
admonishment from other critics, who have been blasting it for its new
age thinking, such as how we can control everything in our lives and our
after-lives if we only concentrate.  While some of this is true, it's
sadly enough superfluous to the entirety of the film.  The point of this
film is not to invoke this kind of thinking onto you, unless you're so
anal that you actually pay attention to some of Albert's perplexing
explanations (did you really understand all that?), but to really take
us on a journey that's a treat to the senses, and later on the emotions.
I will say that it does have its share of problems, though, especially
in the emotion department.  For most of the film, it's a pretty
emotional experience, what with everyone in the family being dead, and
Annie left to rot out her existence, feeling unfairly guilty that she
didn't drive her kids to school the day they died and make Chris do an
errand the day he did.  In the early scenes, we really do feel a sense
of love between Chris and Annie, and some of the jokes they tell aren't
so much funny as they are sweetly romantic.  And when Chris announces he
will go get her from hell, it really has justified that decision, and
we're right along with him the whole way.
In the finale, it does get in a bit of snag, coming up with an ending
which is way too easy and chipper for a film that is so hypnotic and
complex up until that point.  With Chris seeing Annie, who doesn't
recognize him at all, and desperately trying to get her to get over the
distraught she has put herself in, it perhaps couldn't have come up with
an ending that was either very satisfying or very logical (I will give
it this, though: at least it didn't have Chris telling her "It's not
your fault.  It's not your fault.  It's not you fault," etc. etc.
etc.).  It's as if it pulls us right up to the crevice, turns right
around, and walks in the opposite direction.
Nevertheless, "What Dreams May Come" is a substantial success.  Its
power is that it hooks us in to its story emotionally and
psychologically, and pleases all of our senses with imagery and scenes
that are not to be believed.  Maybe it's because of the technical
reasons that I'm really recommending this, but at least I'm not stupid
enough to take into any major consideration the new age thinking that it
partially touches upon.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Another Day in Paradise (1998)
Writers: Christopher B. Landon and Stephen Chin (based on the novel by 
Eddie Little)
Starring: James Woods, Melanie Griffith, Vincent Kartheiser, Natasha 
Gregson Wagner, James Otis, Paul Hipp, Brent Briscoe, Lou Diamond 
Phillips
"Another Day in Paradise" is without a doubt a major improvement over 
Larry Clark's previous film, "Kids." But, then again, most anything 
could be an improvement over that annoyingly condescending and naive 
"message movie." One thing that did strike me as great about both of 
these films, though, and maybe the one major assett Clark has as a 
filmmaker, is his photography. It's gritty and painfully realistic. 
"Kids," for all the crap that it was, was at least well-shot, and it'd 
be easy that, if you didn't recognize some of the actors in later films 
(like Chloe Seveigny - the other major redeeming thing about that movie, 
by the way) or are stupid enough to think that a filmmaker could 
actually capture kids like this via cinema verite, you'd think it is 
actually cinema verite after all.
The opening shot of "Another Day in Paradise" is especially nice. It's 
grainy with low-lighting and a lack of edits that is refreshing from a 
lot of film, and it has a non-judgmental and observant serenity that was 
lacking sorely from that other movie (as it shall henceforth be named, 
at least in the confines of this review). The fact that it's just of one 
of our main characters getting up out of bed is nicer. And with a 
wonderful soul song playing on the soundtrack, this film was off to a 
good start for me. No pretentious message-making. Hopefully no silly 
excuse for a plot. Just looking at these people and allowing them to 
live, for Christ's sake. Even when this character, a guy in his late 
teens named Bobby (Vincent Kartheiser), put his clothes on, hid a knife 
in his pants, and robbed a couple vending machines, only to be attacked 
by a guard, Clark thankfully doesn't become judgemental.
The fight between he and the guard has a marvelous immediacy, with 
sloppy camera movements, and idiosyncratic touches by the characters. 
The guard wails on him real good, causing blood to pour from his mouth 
and all over, but Bobby manages to stick his knife in him, disabling 
him, and trying to run away with broken bones, desperately trying to 
hold onto the bag filled with quarters. The opening of that other movie, 
though is like this: the lead guy convinces a girl to sleep with him, 
but it has such a forced, staged, and worst of all, condescending feel 
that it's disengaging. There, Clark was trying to force something down 
the audience's throat, trying to stir waves instead of being true to his 
characters. Here, it's as if he learned something. We know what Bobby's 
doing is wrong, but it's not played out that way. This is, after all, 
how Bobby survives in life.
So far, so good, right? With or without the ridiculously condescending 
title (Funny. It wouldn't be like that for any other director, would 
it?), I was expecting a film that was as good as these opening moments. 
But soon a plot is introduced, and the potentiality of expanding on the 
characters and deepening them is abandoned for a hackney plot about 
low-level thieving, that, I think, is supposed to be a testament to how 
parents' behavior passes on to their children. A couple more characters 
are introduced: Rosie (Natasha Gregson Wagner), Bobby's coke-snorting 
girlfriend; and Uncle Mel (James Woods), a middle-aged thief/drug addict 
who at first heals Bobby's wounds, then takes him under his wing for a 
series of planned low-level robberies and drug deals. Bobby quickly 
agrees, and they all hop into a car with Mel's long-time girlfriend, Sid 
(Melanie Griffith). They party a bit. Then they rob a drug store, 
planning to sell the dope to others. Things go awry. As soon as they 
feel like a close-knit family, they all fall apart. Ho hum. Clark's 
opening of weird realism is instead traded in for a cliche-ridden plot, 
and characters who are either one-dimensional or never even bothered 
with.
For instance, the relationship between Mel and Sid is somewhat 
interesting, with a boring beginning and later hints of a pot boiling 
over, but there's very little interest in the relationship of Bobby and 
Rosie. In fact, only one scene between them is at all very good, and 
that's their final one, a scene that seems so improvisational that it's 
like one huge breath of air. Everything is pretty much saved for the 
end, with Sid finally gaining some complexity, as minute as it is, but 
with Bobby switching from admiration for Mel to contempt. But none of 
this feels real, at least not as real as Clark is capable of showing. 
His direction is right, full of daring realism, but the screenplay 
nearly ignores the human element, and it plays like a freakish 
collaboration between neo-realism and cliched robbers story, like Elmore 
Leonard without the wit or insight. Even Clark makes a few mistakes: a 
would-be harrowing shootout in a motel (featuring Brent Briscoe, who's 
all about shootouts this year, what with "A Simple Plan") feels fake and 
totally un-Clark-like (I can't believe he included such an 
audience-pleasing shot of Griffith with a shotgun underneath a bed, 
leveling an assailant a la Albert Finney in "Miller's Crossing").
The soul soundtrack is a nice touch, though: it's like it's filling in 
the emotions of the characters, and the pain that they are afraid to 
show (would work better if the characters were more complex to begin 
with). Only in one instance does the music feel wrong: in a later scene 
of such emotional intensity, what is best needed is just the sounds of 
human pain and the ambiance of the room. No sad music. Just crying and 
despearate pleading. And it's especially sad because it could have been 
the one scene that really deepens the character and shows his true 
emotions (the fact that it's ruined by something that is so often one of 
the best aspects of the movie is ironic, eh?).
The acting, for the most part, is mediocre, especially Kartheiser as the 
one-note Bobby, who's only endearing in one section of the film, and 
Wagner, who once again, is annoying enough to show that she's no Natalie 
Wood. Or even a Robert Wagner, for that matter. Griffith, though, is 
actually good. Every now and then the woman pulls off a performance 
which shows off the good aspects of her talent (remember, we all liked 
her in "Working Girl," didn't we?), and maybe with at least acceptable 
turns in "Celebrity" and "Lolita," she may have a great performance in 
her. And Lou Diamond Philips has a funny, uncredited role as a 
flamboyantly gay criminal mastermind.
But if anyone makes this movie even somewhat good, it's James Woods, who 
infuses the film with so much energy and vitality that he almost 
single-handedly makes it work by sheer force of will. Although hampered 
with several ridiculously cliched lines, he manages to make them as 
unpainful to listen to as possible, and brings depth to his character 
that the screenplay doesn't manage to add. Beaten down by life but 
furiously trying to find the holy grail of criminals, the last big 
score, he's the symbol of down by law tragedy. Even his more 
over-the-top moments seem genuine. Brilliant guy, that Woods. There were 
other things I admired, as well. I liked some of the more strange and 
quirky foibles and moments it had, like how Rosie does coke because 
she's afraid of needles; how the gun dealer was a seriously good 
Christian, who preached the word of god as he sold his weapons; and the 
excitement with which Woods enters every single heist that you just know 
he'll never make it big. It's the criminal tragedy...almost.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
Writer: Paul Schrader (based on the novel by Russell Banks)
Starring: Nick Nolte, Sissy Spacek, James Coburn, Willem Dafoe, Brigid 
Tierney, Jim True, Holmes Osborn, Mary Beth Hurt, Marian Seldes, Sean 
McCann, Wayne Robson
It's easy to see some of the more prominent themes that hover over every 
single Paul Schrader script (or film): that of a man, seen as strong by 
others, is in fact crippled by a paralyzing pyschological handicap. In 
his most famous (and best) script, "Taxi Driver," Travis Bickle is a man 
haunted not only by Vietnam and maybe a bad childhood (both alluded to 
but never dealt with up front), but also by his present inadequacy to 
assimilate with society. In "Raging Bull" (co-written with Mardik 
Martin), Jake LaMotta is a powerful boxer who's plagued with jealousy 
and petty sexual anxiety. Even in "The Last Temptation of Christ," he 
shows Jesus as a man with a giant burden on his back, supposed to be 
some kind of reluctant martyr. "Affliction," his newest written AND 
directed film (others include "American Gigolo," "Mishima," and "Light 
Sleeper"), Schrader presents us with a man named Wade Whitehouse, a 
divorced, alcoholic small-town cop. Nick Nolte, usually a symbol of 
strong masculinity, plays Wade as a man beaten down by life, incredibly 
weary, and foolishly optimistic about the future.
In the film's first scene, Wade drives his estranged young daughter Jill 
(Brigid Tierney) to a halloween party in his town, and though she 
clearly doesn't want to go, Wade ignores it and assures her she'll have 
a good time. After abandoning her with people she doesn't even know, he 
goes out for a quick smoke, and when he comes back in he finds that 
she's called her mother (Mary Beth Hurt) and asked her to come pick her 
up. This scene is masterful for several reasons: a) it easily sets up 
the characters, not by telling about their past lives, but by 
demonstrating it through human action; b) it has no real direction, and 
feels to flow like an improvistational section of life; and c) it sets 
the stage for what's to come.
There are two intertwining stories going on here, and the first one 
begins shortly after, concerning a hunting accident where a notoriously 
wealthy man (Sean McCann) was shot to death in the presence of Jack (Jim 
True), a friend of Wade's. Not known to do much actual police work (even 
when handing out a speeding ticket, he gets it thrown back in his face), 
he decides to be a little suspicious of what happened, and suspects fowl 
play, even if it does involve a good pal of his. Soon, he discovers what 
may be a big conspiracy involving his other employer (Holmes Osborn), 
even if others tell him nothing is going on.
The second story takes off around the same time, involving his father 
(James Coburn), a stern, gruff, obnoxious sonofabitch who's been drunk 
most of his life and is notorious around the town for beating his sons 
up (Coburn, usually not much of a dramatic actor, here is absolutely 
riveting and brilliant). He's been so bad that his daughter is a 
characateured born-again Christian, and his other son (Willem Dafoe) has 
long since left the town and become a college professor. Visiting him 
one day with his girlfriend (Sissy Spacek), he finds him asleep in his 
chair and his long-suffering mother dead of cold in her bed. Broken 
furnace, dad tells him. Wade takes care of the funeral arrangements, and 
prepares to sell his father's house which means he has to live with him, 
even if his dad is still a sonofabitch - a decrepit, miserable old man 
who still drinks too much and bitches about how things aren't like they 
used to be, "when women knew their place."
Along with his constant troubles with his daughter, whose emotions 
juxtapose between love and fear, Wade's life slowly begins to implode. 
Things get out of hand. Nightmarish flashbacks sift through his mind. 
And he has a toothache and can't get a dentist's appointment. Like 
Travis Bickle, Wade Whitehouse is tortured by everything that he can't 
be, but at the same time, is shown that he is in full responsibility of 
his actions. When he attempts to reopen the divorce so that he can 
change the custody precedings, we know that it'll only make matters 
worse, and that his ex-wife, who despises him as it is, will despise him 
a little more. And slowly, he begins to lose touch with everyone around 
him, even his girlfriend, whom we're not sure is with him because she 
honestly loves him or feels pathos for his difficult life. As Wade, Nick 
Nolte is a pile of fear and defeat but with a smidge of hope, and the 
latter his often is undoing in the situations he gets himself into. He's 
constantly told by everyone around him that the shooting was an 
accident, and that even if it wasn't, he should let it go, but he can't 
help himself.
Paul Schrader expertly shows us the pain he has to live with, the 
anguish he feels when he looks in his daughter's eyes and sees 
resentment, and the misery of having been beaten by and living with a 
father who doesn't care for him one bit. His well-deserved temper often 
explodes in fits of anger that are caught right at the second they've 
erupted, and we just know that at some point, he's going to finally 
explode in a fit of monumentous anger from supressing his anger for so 
long. Nolte and Schrader are so good at capturing the mixed emotions of 
the character and the audience of this character that for his character 
alone, this film is a triumph, not as classic and masterful as, say, 
"Taxi Driver" or "Raging Bull," but pretty close. This film has been 
based on a novel by Russell Banks, the same guy who penned "The Sweet 
Hereafter," directed by Atom Egoyan, which is probably one of the best 
films I've ever seen, and like that film, "Affliction" has a cold and 
sad feel to it, that of loss and pain (great cinematography, too, Paul 
Sarossy). But while Egoyan's film was masterful and lyrical, this one is 
more blunt and to-the-point, and in some ways more effective but for the 
most part, not as. Both contain the weird, occasional pop up of 
eccentric humor and instances, like the presence of people in 
wheelchairs who are not more than brief cameos, or unique small town 
mannerisms.
But "Affliction" does have some real problems. The worst part of the 
film is easily and without a doubt its use of narration, done by Dafoe's 
prodigal brother character, who shares his thoughts about the themes, 
especially in the final minutes. There's a couple movies that I'd like 
to re-edit and take things out of, just to make them as good as they 
possibly could be, and mine would be to delete the final minutes of this 
film. It has such a great ending there, but then it goes on, explaining 
more than it has to, and discussing the themes, a no-no if you're making 
a film where the themes are strong, multiple, and even ambiguously 
placed, like they are in this one.
In fact, the final narration deserves major reprimanding because it 
takes the story of Wade, such a great story, and turns it into a 
message-film, preaching against the way fathers beat their sons, because 
it lives on into further generations. Yawn. We already knew that, right? 
But take it out, or flat-out ignore it, like I suggest (even leaving a 
couple minutes early would suffice, and you'll know when to leave), and 
it's a fantastic movie. Haunting. Saddening. Deeply emotional. After 
all, all of Wade's problems cannot possibly stem back to beatings, but 
further instances, and the best thing to do is to show what he's like 
now, and allow us to see what has affected him and how he deals with 
them now. Wade's such an interesting character and so complex that this 
is too good a film to be reduced to an exercise. But I'm almost willing 
to ignore it, and pay most attention to the rest of the film (even the 
opening narration isn't totally horrible - it at least sets the story up 
for a tragic fall, making Wade's attempts to claw out of the inevitable 
even more profound, as if he had forseen it all already), which is so 
good and so effortlessly powerful that it's a shame to see it mucked up.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
Director: Antonia Bird
Writer: Ted Griffin
Starring: Guy Pearce, Robert Carlyle, Jeffrey Jones, Jeremy Davies,
Stephen Spinella, Neal McDonough, Sheila Tousey, David Arquette, Joseph
Runningfox, John Spencer
It's been a good long while since we had a really good horror film, not
merely one that's scary, but one that puts atmosphere before plot, that
replaces cheap special effects with more draw to earthly elements, and
that is totally and truly original.  Of course, 'Ravenous' isn't all
original: it's more like a suspenseful twist on the Donnor Party or
'Alive.'  'Ravenous' may even be a twist on the more traditional vampire
flick, with a villain who's seemingly unstoppable, suave, and lovable,
and a general air of men sinking their teeth into other men and finding
strength.  Sounds all 'Interview With the Vampire'-esque to me, but
'Ravenous' is pretty much all about shocking you, not with gore or
tension, but with originality and a bucketload of terrific atmosphere.
Pretty much everything about 'Ravenous' screams unique, from the
incredibly bizzaro score by Michael Nyman and Damon Albarn
(incidentally, two of my favorite musicians, the latter who has a new
album with his band Blur coming out in a few short days) and, my
favorite aspect, a tone which is so off-the-wall unplaceable that just
explaining it sends me into streams of gibberish.  It's not exactly
darkly comic, and it's not exactly camp, but it's really funny and still
really disturbing and gory and freakish and, well, I can't put a finger
on it.  The opening, especially, caught me off guard, even before the
first shot.  The screen pops up with a traditional quote from Nietzsche
(the one about if you fight monster you may become him...), then you
hear an arrow shot on the soundtrack and hit its mark, and suddenly
another quote has popped up: '"Eat me." - Anonymous.'
We quickly meet our faithful protagonist, Capt. John Boyd (Guy Pearce),
an accidental hero during the Mexican-American War being awarded a medal
for capturing a fort, but in flashback, we see that after all, he was
basically a big fat coward, who, like I probably would, plays dead in
the middle of a key battle.  A flashback occurs during the ceremony when
he stares at the big juicy steak put in front of him (teeming with
blood), showing us how he was buried under a pile of corpses, and when
blood dripped into his mouth, he was able to regain his strength and
single-handedly capture the fort.  Due to nausea and whatnot, the
commanding officer unveils his cowardice, and awards him third in
command of a post way out in northern California, in the middle of
nowhere.  There he meets the usual motley crew: nervous priest Toffler
(Jeremy Davies), drunken second-in-command Knox (Stephen Spinella),
anal-retentive soldier Reich (Neal McDonnough), peyote-loving cook
Cleaves (David Arquette), two helpful native Americans (Sheila Tousey
and Joseph Runningfox), and droll C.O. Hart (Jeffrey Jones).
Mundanity plagues the post until one night when a mysterious man named
Colqhoun (Robert Carlyle) stumbles into the area, freezing, starving,
and unconscious.  They nurse him back to health, and he relays his
story: he was part of a trip to settle out in the west that got derailed
due to a snow storm and had to take refuge in a cave.  There, they ran
out of food, and one by one, they started dying off, at which point they
ate the dead.  Hart, hearing that Colqhoun fled for fear that one of the
two remaining people would kill him and eat him too, suggests that some
of them take the three day hike up to the cave and investigate.  From
here, there are frightening revelations, numerous twists, and soon the
film has turned into a gory, intense thriller, with frightening acts
befalling several of the characters, and then a major twist that is
there basically to keep the story going.  Much of it is clichéd, and a
lot of it is unbelievable (especially when one key character returns
unexpectedly), but what keeps this film afloat is the way it has been
crafted.  On paper, it'd look lame and underthought, and standing back
from it, and looking at each twist that occurs and everything that
happens, it's easy to see how this film could use a little bit more work
on the script and idea level.
But it's easy to ignore all that when it's right there in front of you
because what is most memorable about this film anyway is not the twists
and turns and contrivances of the plot, but the freakin' tone, which is
so unnerving and strange that I can hardly believe that a major studio
has released this wide, hoping it'll make a bit of kickback.  I doubt it
will; it's so weird that during the screening I attended, I was
surprised surprised surprised that there weren't a whole bunch of
walkouts.  'Ravenous' is strange, and people usually don't like strange,
but maybe this film has a unique pull that makes it completely
absorbing.  I liked how it dealt with a Native American myth (that by
eating flesh, one absorbs that person's energy and lifeblood) but never
took it way too seriously, like a lot of films do (no chants and the
peyote smoking is kept comical, thank you David Arquette).  I liked the
way it's structured, it allows there to be layer after layer after layer
of mystery, making sure we never totally know what's going on and are
shocked by every twist.  And despite a somewhat boring lead character
(Pearce needs to get out of the silent quasi-noble types department he's
been in in this and in 'L.A. Confidential' before he gets in a rut),
everyone else is pretty much interesting, if not a bit baffling (I just
couldn't figure out Davies' character).  And there's good acting too,
especially from Caryle, who uses his trademark zeal to really ham it up
and demonstrate that he's one of the best up-and-coming actors right
about now; and there's a great performance from Jeffrey Jones, showing
us what an ingenious supporting player he can be, breathing life into
what could have been an otherwise dull character with a couple nice
lines (again, just love this guy).
But as much of a blast as it is to watch, this film just doesn't know
how to reach several of its conclusions throughout: its finale, notably,
is extraordinarily anticlimactic, if not drolly stretched out and nicely
gory.  And throughout, even with the clichés, I was flabbergasted by how
much they took the opening Nietzsche quote so literally, so much that
placing it at the beginning seems coyly campy.  Yet this film, despite
its obvious and numerous flaws, is really entertaining.  Antonia Bird,
the director who stepped in when its original director was removed
shortly into shooting, finds exactly the right tone for the film from
the get-go, carries through with it, and makes 'Ravenous' several times
better than it would have been, all while crafting everything to be
devilishly unique and clever, from the performances to the
cinematography.  She even knows how to set up a shot so that it's at
once interesting to look at and completely surprising in its
revelations.  In fact, 'Ravenous' may be the extreme example of a film
saved by the correct application of atmosphere: its more mundane scenes,
like flashbacks and gory bits of business, are saved by the tone, which
give it a fresh, idiosyncratic feeling.
In fact, I'm nearly willing to ignore all the lousy parts of the film
and merely state that this film is a rather excellent movie going
experience: tense, captivating, original, moody, and abashedly
entertaining.  For every distracting cliché, there's a totally
wonderful, free-spirited, and witty moment, like the one where a
visiting general (John Spencer) discovers a pot o' stew and tastes it,
though only we know what's really in there.  For every lousy moment
involving plot explanation or Native American mysticism explained over
and over again, there's a great scene like the one where two cannibals
try to seduce another one into their flock by robbing him of free will,
all while spouting witty one-liners and aphorisms by Benjamin Franklin.
And because of its tone, its sense of humor, and its general air of
moody atmosphere, it's easy to brush off the more lame aspects of the
film into the back corners of your membrane, and enjoy what's there on
the screen.  It's fun to watch a film that would otherwise be bad, that
has a pretty terrible trailer that makes it looks like dung, and
discover that it actually has a streak of originality and wit that
allows to rise above what it could potentially be.  Now, wouldn't it be
nice if there was a film that took this farther, and was a surprise
masterpiece despite the premonitions surrounding it?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
Writers: Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard
Starring: Joseph Fiennes, Gwyneth Paltrow, Geoffrey Rush, Colin Firth, 
Ben Affleck, Judi Dench, Tom Wilkinson, Simon Callow, Imelda Staunton, 
Rupert Everett
It's been awhile since we've had a truly great rethinking of the works 
of an artist known primarily for uniting and then splitting up a woman 
named Juliet and a man named Romeo...about three years, if I'm correct 
(that would point out that I am referring to none other than "Richard 
III," Richard Loncraine and Ian McKellen's wonderfully naughty 
adaptation-cum-daring-melodrama). But it's been, oh, three decades at 
least since we've had the last real retooling of the master's work 
("Richard III" more or less played the narrative straight through), and 
that's not counting the mediocre film version - of course, I'm referring 
to "Rosencrantz and Guildenstern are Dead," the legendary piece of wit 
from Tom Stoppard that is almost as cheerfully absurdist as, oh, 
"Waiting for Godot." Apparently he didn't get enough from that play, and 
needed to show us once again exactly how much he knows about the man and 
his subsequent work.
That being, "Shakespeare in Love," the egg that has since hatched from 
his mammoth-sized cranium, as well as that of Marc Norman (who came up 
with the actual plot), is no "RAGAD," but hey how the hell could it be. 
It's lighter. More cheerful. More accessible. Only slightly less 
engaging. Entertaining as all hell. In fact, in a year when even the 
biggest blockbusters can't lift you off your seat and put a big fat 
grimace across your face, it's refreshing to see a movie so witty and 
wonderfully passionate as this, and surprising to find that even if you 
can't name more than two of his plays ("Romeo and Juliet" and "Hamlet" 
notwithstanding), you can still find that this 
love-story-cum-backstage-pass-cum-witty-rethinking-of-the-life-of-a-certa
in-playwright-cum-costume-drama-cum-flat-out-comedy to be almost as 
pleasing as I or anyone else who actually enjoys the Bard does (not that 
I'm being priggish about it). Because Stoppard, even in "RAGAD," doesn't 
merely show off his knowledge of the Bard's work, but demonstrates it as 
well, and forms his plays/scripts so that even if you're not sure of the 
source material, you can still follow along fine (although it doesn't 
hurt to know what he's talking about, just to get some more of the 
jokes).
And he makes sure that the characters it's about are not just 
recreations from a previous much better play, but actual fresh 
realizations so the story is not stale and so it's easy to be drawn in. 
After all, Rosencrantz and Guildenstern, presented so briefly in the 
play, were reintroduced by Stoppard as a variation on the Laurel and 
Hardy mold, a feuding pair of friends who aren't only likable and 
sympathetic because their fate is so obvious, but also because they're 
such great characters. Stoppard does a similar thing with the way he 
recreates Shakespeare. Thought of mostly as a prissy, maybe even 
pretentious artist, the way Shakespeare is presented here is a wonderful 
example of wit: thin, even (as I've been told) devastatingly attractive, 
and, best of all, a hack, he speaks in a whirlwind of aphorisms and 
metaphors, just trying to get his emotions out (a friend, after a short 
speech he's given, says "Enough of that; talk prose."). When we first 
meet him, he's a local London playwright, estranged from his wife, 
selling mere ideas to theatre-owners in hopes of advances and money per 
page he writes, constantly living under the glow of a certain other 
playwright, the then-more notable Christopher Marlow (Rupert Everett, a 
wonderful in-joke here, eh?). Under the employment of Philip Henslowe 
(Geoffrey Rush, in full over-the-top mode here, with a funny mustache 
and a medium-pitched, hilarious speaking voice that screams "rat"), he 
is currently laboring over this new play, aptly-titled "Romeo and Ethel, 
the Pirate's Daughter").
Everything explodes when, during a rehearsal, an actor reads from a play 
of his (the film finds him after early successes, like "Titus 
Andronicus," and before his later masterpieces, like, oh, "Hamlet"), and 
does it with such passion and gusto that he must get his name. But lo 
and behold, it's actually a woman, one Viola de Lessups (Gwyneth 
Paltrow), an attractive aristocrat's daughter, bethrothed to a pompous 
ass of a nobleman (Colin Firth, always on hand to be the asswhole who 
wrecks a lovely romance, like he was in "The English Patient"). The two 
meet again, her no longer in disguise, at a dance, and hit it off 
immeadiately. Once Viola has been cast as Romeo and has revealed her 
true identity to Shakespeare, the two launch into a series of passionate 
love scenes, and she quickly becomes his darling muse. As they make 
love, with the aid of her fellow nurse (Imelda Staunton), his banal play 
(written to make sure that it has pirates and a dog, as Henslowe points 
out) turns into the greatest love story of all time, and just as those 
two were lovers without any hope of a good finale, these two take 
delight in the fact that their relationship as well is doomed from the 
get-go, that she will eventually have to reclaim her social position, 
and he his, but in the meantime, they carry on such a passionate affair 
that it sparkles all the energy in him to write one of his first great 
plays, at least the one that will get him better jobs in the future.
But there's more to the film than just making light of Shakespeare's 
early career and his background for writing such passionate plays: the 
film is basically your traditional Shakespearean play, or at least a 
great carbon copy of such. It has true love, villainy, unexpected 
deaths, vicious twists, character manipulation, bawdy humor, social 
commentary, inside jokes about the times and even itself, and, the most 
classic Shakespearean entity: crossdressing, and not just great 
crossdressing, convincing crossdressing, where people actually buy that 
the gender is what it seems to be. It even has hilarious connections to 
the final form of "Romeo and Juliet" (imagine, if you will, a balcony 
scene culminating in a great fall and a chase by dogs). And it's all 
done in a witty, hilarious way that may have passed as mid-level 
Shakespeare, because Stoppard and Norman know exactly what they're doing 
(and so, I guess, does the other writer, Marc Norman). He knows what's 
funny, and what is also appealing. He crafts not only great lead 
characters, but also memorable supporting characters, like that of Hugh 
Fennyman (Tom Wilkinson), the local moneylender, first seen buring the 
feet of Henslowe, who owes him money, and later seen cherishing the fact 
that he has a role in the final production of the play (even if it is as 
the apothecry). His delight in playing the role is such a sweetly funny 
thing to behold that it gives the film another layer of joy.
But there's much more. I just basically loved almost everything in this 
movie. I loved how it knew its subject backwards and forwards and knew 
how to present it in a witty and entertaining way (it even drolly gives 
a brief nod to Will Kemp, one of the more famous Elizabethan actors). I 
loved how the play was constructed and made so that Shakespeare could 
easily move from a forgettable work to an unforgettable one. I loved all 
the performances, especially Joseph Fiennes, so forgettable in 
"Elizabeth," and here so hilariously witty and charming; and even 
especially Judi Dench, playing an older, more knowledgable Queen 
Elizabeth, who steals all the three scenes she's in (an aside to Viola's 
fiance is just fantastic). For the first time, Gwyneth Paltrow measures 
up to her claim to fame (read: I finally respect her). And I even liked 
Ben Affleck (playing haughty actor Ned Alleyen, who is told that the 
play is titled "Mercutio" so that he doesn't fuck up the play).
But most of all, I loved how the center relationship is so full of life 
and vitality that we don't for one second doubt it's sincerity (a friend 
of mine did point out that when one is in love, one doesn't feel like 
doing work - not so: famous composer Leos Janacek was noted as doing the 
best work of his entire life when conducting a passionate affair, with a 
woman who happened to be half his age...and if it works for him, it 
could've worked for Shakespeare). And we feel for them so that even 
though we know that it's a cursed one from the beginning (like the way 
we know that Rosencrantz and Guildenstern are going to die at the end of 
either of the plays they're in), we can't help but feel a huge loss when 
it actually comes around. It's magnificent direction (by John Madden) 
and beautiful look (which looks genuinely Elizabethan) only help to add 
to the overall impact of the film, but by the end, this is just another 
story of a man who appears to be great but is actually as hopeless lost 
and hopelessly romantic as the rest of us. Like us all, we see the great 
Shakespeare as a local hack, trying to find the muse that will pull him 
out of his prison, and when this happens, it's like a beautiful 
awakening. So is the film. Who else could have possibly made even the 
lowest artist feel better about themselves by downgrading Shakespeare 
and not succumb to the wrath of purists everywhere than Tom Stoppard? 
Just a great man, even if his one attempt at directing was a little 
weak. Norman too.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Writers: Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland (based on the novel "The 
Hunter" by Donald E. Westlake)
Starring: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Gregg Henry, David Paymer, Deborah 
Kara Unger, Lucy Alexis Liu, William Devane, John Glover, James Coburn, 
Kris Kristoferson, Bill Duke, Jack Conley
Like I did with "American History X," I wonder if there's a different 
cut of "Payback," a Director's Cut if you will, that is significantly 
better than the one I saw. As you've probably heard, as it was official 
controversy, both films were subject to re-cuts by each film's 
respective star, and in the case of "Payback," multiple reshoots, 
changing the original cut of the film which either didn't test well with 
said actor, test audiences, or both. But as I also did with "American 
History X," I bet the original cut, though perhaps better, is not 
exactly stupendous. At best, "American History X" was a very good TV 
movie, boasting at least some intensity from its lead actor (Edward 
Norton) if not some truly obvious jabs at contemporary racism (no way! 
racism can transform people into monsters?!). But with "Payback," it's 
at best a really entertaining, silly bad guy flick. The focus of 
"Payback" is, of course, on a "morally corrupt individual" (read: the 
villain, if this was another movie) and his numerous attempts at 
cold-hearted vengeance. Many of the criticisms of "Payback" bring this 
out about the movie: the lead character's completely unsympathetic, the 
movie's too dark and too violent, and it's too bleak. My estimation: 
he's not unsympathetic enough, and the movie's not nearly as dark, 
violent, or bleak as it should be.
My guess why: Mel Gibson, the film's star, who perhaps was not man 
enough to go the distance and make his character a completely repellent 
character. Normal audience members hate to see movies where they have 
conflicting views on the lead character, and they bitch and moan when a 
movie puts them in a position where they are forced to follow things 
from the point of view of a character they are opposed to, for whatever 
reason. The supreme example of this is with "A Clockwork Orange," where 
the lead character is a complete deviant: a thug, a rapist, and a 
self-centered sonofabitch. But because it's his story, because there is 
voice-over narration by him, and because the film puts him in a position 
where instead of him being the torturer, he's the captive, we are forced 
into a peculiar catharsis where we have to wonder if we're supposed to 
like this character or not. Either way, we care about him in some 
capacity, and listening to different people's reactions, including your 
own, is intriguing.
This probably should have happened in "Payback," another film adaption 
of the Donald E. Westlake novel "The Hunter," which was adapted back in 
1967 by John Boorman as "Point Blank," a classic noir film starring Lee 
Marvin which I've not seen but hear it's so cold and bleak that it's 
incredible. The same will not happen for this film: yes, it's very cold 
and bleak and the character is generally a bastard, but it's the things 
that Gibson has added that lessen the edge on the film and make it more 
of a hoot-and-hollering bit of entertainment: the audience laughs 
hysterically at the twists because they're proposterously ingenius. A 
bit with a bomb and a hotel room is only a nice touch because it 
requires skillful manipulation on the part of Gibson's character over 
the rest of the characters, shrewd intelligence that no one else seems 
to have. At one point, he walks into said hotel room, the phone 
mysteriously rings, and he finds the bomb. Next shot is of the bad guys 
who planted it there sitting in their car, and trying to set it off 
again. Suddenly we see someone cutting the fuel tank underneath the car. 
A couple seconds later, we're back in the car, and Gibson is seen 
menacingly through the rear-view mirror, puffing on a cigarette. A large 
lake of gasoline has spread from underneath the car to his feet. He 
drops the cigarette, the car explodes. Audience roars with laughter, and 
maybe some applause.
It's this kind of showmanship that disengages us from the cruelty that 
could be and might very well be the original cut of "Payback." At heart, 
this film yearns to be brutally bleak and questionably immoral because 
it's teeming with villains - there's really not one 100% likable 
character in the movie. The film's plot is even gritty and admittingly 
great: Gibson's character, with the simple moniker of Porter, is a 
career criminal who does a small job with his wife (Deborah Kara Unger) 
and a pal crook of his (Gregg Henry, a greasy DePalma regular) only to 
be shot in the back and left for dead by the two others. He lives, 
though, and when completely rehabilitated, he comes back not just for 
vengeance, but for his cut of the money. His wife is quickly offed via a 
drug overdose (a shame, considering Unger is such an interesting actress 
as evidenced by her performances in "Crash" and "The Game"), but his 
other two objectives are harder to get at. Henry, as it turns out, has 
joined a large crime corportation dubbed "The Syndiacate," and entry 
contained Porter's cut of the money. Not only is Henry harder to get to, 
but now he also has to go through the numerous levels of this Syndicate 
to obtain his biggest objective.
That he's so concentrated on this objective is what's so entertaining 
and so silly about this film. We end up rooting for him not only because 
he's the one dolling out the narration, but because his ambition 
measures head-for-head with his brain, and that he manages to be so 
precise while being so crazy (going head-to-head with this Syndicate for 
a mere 70 grand is a joke in itself). It's a not-bad plot, but let's 
face it: we can't take what he goes through seriously at all since he 
goes so over-the-top in his attack on the corporation, and thus I wonder 
if that other cut is more subtle and more believable, and therefore more 
engaging. Not to say this film isn't engaging: "Payback" is furiously 
entertaining, a showstopper that leaves you with a big stupid grin on 
your face, or at least that was my perception. In short, it's fun. 
Gibson's Porter is weirdly likable, and the opening moments of this film 
are mesmerizing. We see him getting the bullets taken out of him by a 
criminal's doctor, then getting back in the game by stealing a man's 
wallet and spoiling himself, all with a deadpan look on his face, like 
he's not really enjoying himself, he's just being true to his nature.
In fact, Gibson is superb here. With a low, gritty, tobacco-induced 
voice that sounds eerily like the computer in "Alpahville," Gibson plays 
him as a man who doesn't seem to have a real emotion in his body and 
reacts to the doublecross by merely wanting to get his money back, and 
maybe getting vengeance on his traitors as a little bit of extra credit. 
He makes it tough on the audience to really like him, and surprisingly 
enough, Porter doesn't evoke at all his Mad Max character, the antihero 
who has had the soul drained out of him. But then again, there's the 
rest of the film, which tries to make him more sympathetic by 
introducing a romantic interest in the form of a prostitute (Maria 
Bello) whom he comes to for help and becomes interested in. Their 
half-assed potential romance is just that, and it's something I wish had 
been done in a far more subtle, more bleak fashion (I hear "Point Blank" 
reduces their romance to a one-night stand which is far more compelling 
and true to form than the bit in this film). As such, it corrupts the 
film, and makes it seem like Porter is perhaps not being shown in his 
true colors, like he's been distilled for a mainstream audience.
Other parts don't bode too well either: the subplot involving Kris 
Kristoferson as the head of the Syndicate is, yes, entertaining, but 
it's also distracting from what this film should be. Originally supposed 
to be an off-screen Angie Dickenson, Kristoferson's role is there merely 
so that the audience will be whipped into a frenzy by the sheer 
theatrics of the production (meanwhile, William Devane and James Coburn 
as the two sub-heads of the Syndicate, who were in the original cut of 
the film, work nicely). None of this is a bad thing, in particular. I 
really enjoyed "Payback." For what it is, it's a very good flick, a nice 
deterent from the usual Hollywood films that sometimes can't even rise 
to give us any interesting elements, or at least any witty material. 
This film at least has hilarious subplots, like run-ins with crooked 
cops, an incompetent bookie (David Paymer), and a sadistic dominatrix 
(Alexis Liu), all which register well. Its cinematography is exquisite, 
all drained and pale, accenting grays and blues, giving the film a 
wonderful tone that may be the very best thing about this movie. And 
it's never boring or excruciatingly stupid (well...the bit with the dog 
was rather retarded, but ah well...). In short, it's basically 
everything a Hollywood piece of entertainment should be. But should 
films ever merely settle for being a Hollywood piece of entertainment? 
That, of course, is a rhetorical question.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
Starring: Robert Downey Jr, Heather Graham, Natasha Gregson Wagner
Robert Downey Jr. is so good in James Toback's "Two Girls and a Guy" 
that I fear if he had made his primary entrance even a minute later than 
he had (at around the 20 minute mark), and if I hadn't been tipped off 
to the strength of his performance by more than three people, I might 
have turned it off. Shaggy and completely uninhibited, Blake Allen 
(Downey) pops onto the screen and is so much fun to watch and to listen 
to that he gives the film a kind of immeadiacy that it probably wouldn't 
otherwise have, like he knows that this is his show and he better do his 
best to present it well. And what this basically is is a one-man show, a 
showcase for Downey to do the same schtick that he's done before in 
several other movies, sometimes great (the otherwise trite "Chaplin"), 
sometimes bad (his annoying supporting role in "Weird Science"), only 
here he's the center of attention, performing his one-man show for the 
entire audience, and easily winning them over with a certain type of 
charm that most of us didn't know he had. When he makes his first 
entrance, he brings life to the film, doing a five minute long bit where 
he goes through his routine of calling people up, and then performing a 
little song for himself, while looking into the mirror. And as the film 
goes on, we watch him as he tries to defend himself from the accusations 
that he is a lying mysoginist by the two people most close to him - he 
speaks quickly and seems to come up with lies that are not only 
plausible sounding (or at least half-way so), but also sincere.
In the film, his two girlfriends, who have no clue the other exist, meet 
eachother waiting for him on his doorstep. They break into his 
apartment, and wait for him to come home, and once he arrives, they 
individually confront him, and force him to tell the truth, which of 
course he cannot, but his lies sound so realistic, and we sense that out 
of the three of them, he's the one who's most hurt from it, and when he 
finally stares at himself in the mirror, without anyone looking on, and 
tells himself to shape up, we can't help but fall for it, even if we 
hate ourselves afterwards. That's what's great about this film. On the 
other hand, the plot itself is a little too cutesy and the writing never 
goes to the distance it really could. And it's too laid back when it 
should be manic. And there's too many instances when it's unbelievably 
derivative. And the two females aren't that interesting. While I could 
almost recommend this on the mere strength of the Downey Jr. 
performance, I just can't get past the fact that this seems too much 
like a film with one great thing to boast and a whole lot of other 
things to bitch about.
Just for example, the plot itself, while promising, is never fully 
explored. With roughly 85 minutes to film, we waste a whopping 20% of 
that on the long-winded exposition, where we meet the two girls and they 
discover eachother, only to discover that they're nothing more than 
either pretty dull (Carla, played by Heather Graham) or pretty annoying 
(Lou, played by Natasha Gregson Wagner). While the film is infatuated 
with the charming nightmare that is Blake and spares nearly no expense 
to show off how interesting he is, it barely discovers anything about 
the girls other than they are mere plot elements. They're there to 
either act accusatory or sexually arousing, and with no interest in them 
comes the round robin this film gets into: irate accusations, Blake's 
rapid defense, some more accusations, some more Blake defense, and then 
a cool down, followed by some brief and slight making up (where, at one 
point, Blake and Carla go into one of the bigger rooms in his 
astonishingly spacious apartment and service eachother, while Lou, well, 
dances in the other room). Round and round this goes, but we rarely 
learn more about Blake than he's never going to change no matter what he 
tells himself, while we learn nothing about the other two. While they 
aren't exactly awful or bad in their design, they're not even a million 
times as interesting as Blake is.
But Toback doesn't seem to mind. This is not only a lovely present to 
Downey, who starred in his 80s film, "The Pick-Up Artist," and has 
recently been besieged with bad press for his constant drug abuse and 
jail time, but it's also apparently very autobiographical. Toback has 
been immodest in his revelations of the sex life he had in his prime, 
which is quite extraordinary, and it's clear that Blake is supposed to 
be a twist on him merged with the rapid timing that Downey is well-known 
for. But he only goes halfway in destroying himself. He never truly 
makes us sympathize with his main character (we're more charmed by him), 
and he does tack on a nicely ambiguous ending that I almost fell for, 
but the accusations made aren't more than vulgar name-calling (if 
someone has that list of obsenities that he's called, please e-mail them 
to me), and by the end, Toback has included a fight scene where more is 
revealed about the other two characters that almost makes us really 
sympathize with him and revolt the other two. The twists that come out 
are unfair to the way this film should have been played out, and I 
almost wish that Toback had done a major rewrite, adding more and more 
complexity to his film. Why not gradually strip Blake of his protective 
coating, revealing the naked, frightened boy inside?
Filmed almost entirely within the confines of his apartment, and shot in 
real time, "Two Girls and a Guy" is less like a scathing character 
study, like the far superior "Deconstructing Harry," and more like a 
mediocre off-off-broadway play, albeit one with a phenomenal performance 
at the center. But there's nothing else there to really love about this 
film, and Downey becomes the only one who walks away with it with any 
real credibility. It's like seeing a remake of "A Streetcar Named 
Desire," but with Stanley being the only interesting aspect. 
Nevertheless, it is still a fairly entertaining movie. I enjoyed 
watching it for the most part (even if they made Blake's favorite song 
"You Don't Know Me" - disgraceful), but only in the way that I'd be 
interested in seeing any kind of sub-par piece of art just to see one 
great entity.

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
Director: Anand Tucker
Writer: Frank Cotrell Boyce (based on the novel "A Genius in the Family"
by Hilary Du Pré and Piers Du Pré)
Starring: Emily Watson, Rachel Griffiths, David Morissey, James Frain,
Charles Dance, Celia Imrie, Rupert Penry-Jones, Bill Patterson, Auriol
Evans, Keely Flanders
Maybe the most important thing about this movie is that it's not handled
like the Hallmark Hall of Fame Movie of the Month, because it very well
could have been a manipulative tearjerker, broadcasted on ABC on a
Monday Night, starring Kelly Martin and Yasmeen Bleeth, respectively.
Because it's not handled like the greatest story ever told is precisely
why it's so great.  Underneath the to-die-for cinematography, the
brilliant acting, and incessantly wonderful direction is a film of
modesty, not sure whether or not this story is totally great but with
the balls to run with it, tell it in a certain original way.  It doesn't
merely go from plot point to plot point.  It goes from character to
character.  It obsesses itself with the depth and the style of it all,
and makes the story of a world-reknowned cellist who contracts MS and
dies prematurely into the story of two sisters, both musicians, who have
a totally unique relationship.
It's that their relationship is the center of the story that makes this
film transcend any cornball, shamelessly tired tearjerker qualities it
could have had and makes this, unlike "Patch Adams," effortlessly
emotional and real.  In short, this movie is just awesome.  It merely
tells its story really well, and that's something that just has to be
commended these days, when most stories are botched because they're not
told by great storytellers.  Director Anand Tucker tells this story
well.  He overdramaticizes everything, but still keeps it real.
The film tells the story of Hilary and Jacqueline Du Pré (Rachel
Griffiths and Emily Watson, respectively), two sisters who are first
seen in childhood (played by Auriol Evans and Keely Flanders,
respectively) as the very best of friends.  They are also both
musicians, Hilary a flutist and Jackie a cellist, and when it all
begins, both are considered child prodigies, but Hilary is seen as the
better of the two.  Jackie, a bit jealous, works and works at her
playing skills, and soon the tables are turned.  When they both hit
adulthood, Hilary strives for a comeback, while her sister is playing in
famous halls around the world, but instead of fame, captures the heart
of a hapless, joyful conductor, Kiffer Finzi (David Morissey, in a
semi-star-making turn).  They marry, after a short courtship, and move
to a lovely country house, making Jackie incredibly jealous since her
cello playing becomes a symbol of her current life: when she plays, she
has the eyes of the world, but when she stops, she's alone.  She enters
into a shallow relationship with an equally famous pianist, Daniel
Barenboim (James Frain), in hopes that she may overcloud her sister, but
she eventually begins to lose it, and runs away to Hilary's country
home, where she hopes to gain admittance by Hilary to sleep with her
husband, since no one she sleeps with gives her any pleasure.
It's all terribly melodramtic, as you can see, and by the time Jackie
has contracted MS (in a brilliantly edited scene that surpasses the
breakdown scene in the semi-smiliar "Shine" in technical and emotional
devastation), it would have been the time that I could easily call the
sign for melodramatic overload if it hadn't been handled in such a way.
The key thing here is that it's not about her gradual death and slip
into insanity but rather that it's about her tumultuous relationship
with her sister, which, I might add, is perfectly realized.  Their
relationship is the most down-to-earth complex entity of the year: they
love eachother more than anyone else in the entire world, but they're
also completely jealous of one another.  When a young Jackie surpasses
her playing abilities, she tries in vain to make a comeback but can't,
and almost seems to marry to get back at Jackie for her success.  When
Jackie lands on top and sees her sister marry a wonderful man, she is
jealous of her lifestyle to the most extensive brinks that I've ever
seen in a film (only two sisters who truly love eachother would dare
share the same man).  And the whole time, their love for eachother is
never doubted or even tested.
Another thing I really liked is Emily Watson's performance.  I usually
make it a note to never overpraise an actor for playing either a
drunkard or a lunatic or someone with a mortal disease (or any
combination of the three).  My reasoning for this is that it's a fucking
easy job.  The worst case for this very year may be Thandie Newton in
"Beloved": sure, she's good, but what's so tough about playing a woman
who stumbles around, slurs her words together, and acts like a three
year old inside a 20-year old's body?  Hell, I could play that if I had
a pair of breasts.  In that same exact movie, though, is a performance
by Kimberly Elise where she has to be the rock that holds the family
together as her mother slowly goes insane, her brothers run off never to
be seen again, and her mother's lover is scared off.  She has to
actually deal with real emotions, something much harder than mere
stumbling about.  But the Academy of Arts and Sciences loves loves loves
overpraising performances like Newtons.  If you don't believe me, look
at Jack Nicholson's performance in "As Good As It Gets": great
performance, but easy job.
This isn't so for Watson, though, because her insanity comes from real
emotions, not just a plot point.  And thanks to the opening sequence,
where we see her and Hilary as kids, we understand the motives behind
all her actions, and by the time she actually contracts MS and begins to
loose her sanity and her life, we've already understood that this is the
last straw for a woman plagued with terrible neuroses.  Rachel
Griffiths, who would have otherwise been the understudy to Watson's
protagonist, actually matches Watson step-for-step, because as Watson
grows insane, and demands unspeakable things from her, Griffiths holds
her own, and has to deal with what she is able to give her sister who
needs emotional help from her.  Griffiths, an otherwise unknown actress
(and Watson being famous from "Breaking the Waves" and "The Boxer"), is
absolutely brilliant, just as absolutely brilliant as Watson is, and if
the Academy and all the other Critics groups, who've already deemed
Watson's performance the best of the year, glance over hers because
she's the one who doesn't get to go insane (read: she gets the boring
role), then the scream of hysteria you hear will be from me.  After all,
Griffiths has the thankless job of keeping things real - the Tom Cruise
role in "Rainman" (the one who should have gotten Oscar consideration
and not Hoffman).  She does, and if anyone deserves accolades from the
Academy this year, it's Griffiths.
Together, the two actresses work extremely well, though, and both have
to go through deep emotional hell, the likes of which haven't been seen
this year.  If it hadn't been for an otherwise not-totally-great final
section that deals way too much with Jackie and not enough with Hilary
(when the two had gotten equal treatment for the entirety), I'd say this
is one of the top ten best films of the year.  It's so close to
perfection, in its structure, its treatment of its subject, and its
beautiful technical specifications (cinematography nomination, without a
shred of doubt in my mind, and maybe film editing), that it's nearly a
shame that it's not the flawless gem that it should be.  But, hey, as it
is, I can hardly complain.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Writer/Director: George Lucas
Starring: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Pernilla August, Ray Park, Samuel L. Jackson, Terence Stamp,
Olvier Ford Davies, Ahmed Best, Frank Oz, Kenny Jones, Anthony Daniels,
Warwick Davis, Brian Blessed
How the hell do I even write this review?  That's been the question on
my mind ever since I became a critic, as amateur as I am, since the
announcement that a new Star Wars film came out long before I even began
to write these things.  I'm a Star Wars fan, I may admit it; though I'm
not a "die hard fan" (amongst the scariest people in the world, I assure
you...though a quaint second compared to Star Trek fans), and because of
this personal problem, I have a huge bias against judging this film on a
fair basis.  I love the other three, though hardly on equal levels, and
would easily and without much trepidation award each of them the coveted
four star rating - yes, even 'Jedi' - but how does one even begin to put
into logical order the thoughts concerning the viewing of the newest
installment in this saga, let alone the first in nearly 16 years?  I
pictured early drafts  of this review that would lapse into considerable
amounts of hyperbole, virtual years before seeing the actual movie, and
I swore tonight, a mere hour after leaving the theater, that I would: a)
write the review and get it out there before I passed out from fatigue;
and b) try not to do what I feared I would do under pressure.
But though the temptation may have been strong to over-dramaticize the
greatness thereof before, it's remarkably easy not to after actually
having seen it.  As people talked about how incredible it was on the way
out, remarked about the action sequences with flustered enthusiasm, and
already began speculated about the way everything we saw is incorporated
with the other three, I kept a mild and reserved contain on my
emotions.  A big grin plastered on my face, not merely because I had
actually seen the most anticipated movie of all time two weeks before it
is released to the general public in America (a feat I am almost certain
I would have been killed for, or at the very least tortured inhumanely
for), but also because it did in fact work for me.  Thanks to several
unexpected disappointments within the past couple years with highly
anticipated movies that had actually blown, I made a conscious decision,
say about six months ago, to not get too pumped up for any movie (and
this includes new films from the likes of Greenaway, Egoyan, and Leigh),
and thus lessen the impact of disappointment on me.  Instead of building
this new film up to be the Most Incredible Motion Picture Experience Or
Else, I kept a handle on things, and by walking into the movie, I was
more excited about actually being there, seeing a big exec from 20th
Century Fox in person, et. al., than I was about the fact that what
would unfold in front of me in a very short amount of time was yet
another movie in the saga that is the most embraced cinematic saga of
all time, and a personal favorite of mine.  I was prepared for the
mediocre, to put it bluntly.
That may have backfired on me though.  Instead of either really loving
it above all or hating it above all, I just really liked it.  I sat
there watching the movie, nearly forgot that it was a Star Wars movie
from time to time, and was just really entertained.  The story was well
told, the characters were for the most part nicely drawn, and the action
was phenomenal.  Even the CGI effects, which I swore would be its
downfall (I mean, it looks so...fake...), worked extremely well and
didn't bother me for a second.  So in short, very recommended.  But my
big problem is this: do I really like it because I wasn't expecting much
and it delivered more than I thought it would; and if so, am I sure this
movie isn't really the mediocre mess my friend made it out to be (a
non-Star Wars fan, for the record, who must be glad I haven't targeted
him for scorn in this)?  There were things that bugged me, namely the
fact that instead of running smoothly like the other three, it seems to
have adopted an ebb-n-flow technique that isn't incredibly satisfying,
at least not as satisfying as it should be.  It introduces elements to
us that are terrific and mesmerizing in theory, but does it work
as a whole in execution?  I'd answer that with a reasonable "sort of,
for the most part."  Looking at the plot structure of the film from afar
makes it sound incredibly incredible.  The Federation may be overtaking
the Republic with an illegal attack that may run its course due to
corrupt politicians and legal technicalities.  The Queen of the Republic
of Naboo is saved by two Jedi Knights who stop by Tatooine on the voyage
to safety due to a damaged ship and stumble upon no less than Annakin
Skywalker at the ripe age of about eight.  He helps them in their
current predicament, gains their trust, and the fact that he is a Jedi
is made known to everyone.
The rest is, of course, predictable, but just look at the situation, by
god.  Annakin, the same guy who becomes Darth Vadar even before the
original 'Star Wars' (or probably to be forever recognized under the
more dour title, 'A New Hope'), becomes the completely ironic hero of
the film!  Star Wars geeks get to have a field day with this situation!
If the most prominently figured character - a Jedi Knight named Qui-Gon
Jinn (played marvelously by the ever-reliable Liam Neeson) - is the most
wise character in the film, and he fingers Annakin as the messianic one
of the Jedis who will bring everything together in peace and harmony,
he's in fact dead wrong, isn't he?  Or is he?  Isn't by training Annakin
to become a Jedi Knight only to have him turn to the dreaded Dark Side
the good option since his becoming evil actually causes everything to
come together so neatly in 'Return of the Jedi?'  This is loads of fun
to think through, especially for anyone who's ever given any serious
thought to the 'Star Wars' saga in terms of novelistic entrapments, but
does this automatically make this new film - called 'The Phantom
Menace,' by the way, though there doesn't appear to be an 'official
official' title for it - a brilliant piece of art?  Is it great merely
because it comes fourth in being made but first in terms of order, thus
giving it a weight it wouldn't have to begin with?  Lucas may have
stumbled onto something quite clever by making the fourth episode first,
but it doesn't automatically make this film anything great.
Yet what I admire, perhaps most about this film, is how it doesn't at
all play up to this contrivance.  There isn't a lot of Lucas pointing
out irony here in the delicious situation he's cooked up for us; no
clever asides that gawk at the brilliance of himself, how he managed to
make an entire movie that could potentially hold onto the reins of the
previous moneymaking machines without doing any of the steering for
itself.  In fact, it seems, quite refreshingly, that Lucas is actually
working to make this good.  He actually cares about the storyline
and isn't automatically set to shoot anything in front of us and feel
confident that everyone will like it because it's Star Wars.  No, Lucas
is the real deal.  He doesn't bullshit us with all the work he's done
before creating this universe.  He makes it all seem incredibly real and
fresh and new.  In fact, it hardly seems a thing like the other three.
The  irony is here, not only with Annakin, but with Emperor Palpatine
(Ian McDiarmid), the gentle, kind man who becomes the head of the
counsel, but who by the next trilogy becomes the dreaded Emperor who
shows up prominently in 'Jedi' and is done away with nicely by
Vadar/Annakin (McDiarmid, by the way, is great).  This paradox hadn't
even occurred to me during the run of the film (though Diarmid also
portrays Darth Sidious, who like Emperor Palpatine in the other films,
is only seen with a cloak brought down over his head mysteriously), and
only afterwards did this hit me.  This kind of thing makes me excited,
not only because this means we also get to follow his assured path to
evil, but because that means this film is for real because it doesn't
play it up.  Even Annakin isn't overblown.  The kid they've chosen to
play him, Jake Lloyd, plays him like he was playing just a normal kid
who's entranced with everything he sees.  There's no sign of Vadar in
him yet, and if you hadn't seen the other three (and had subsequently
been living on Mars in a cave with fingers placed firmly in ears), you'd
have no idea of the tragedy about to ensnare him.  That he plays this
completely straight is marvelously commendable for anyone else would
have wanted to brag about the fact that they've developed something so
immensely adroit.
For most of it, it's an exciting, engrossing motion picture, mostly
because it's slow paced enough to take in the situations and
interestingly enough structured.  Neeson commands most of the movie,
bringing a realistic and natural feel to the first act and it's more
standard escape-from-the-bad-guys stuff, and thus to the rest of the
movie which plays out a whole lot smoother.  In fact, once Annakin has
popped up for the first time by around the 40 minute mark, the film
begins to really take off.  He becomes a source of selfless aid to
Neeson and company (including his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi - played
with dour temperament by Ewan McGregor - and Queen Amidala - played with
reserve, dignity, and head dresses galore by Natalie Portman) during
their tenure on Tatooine, and though some of the plot points are
contrived (as are their explanations: "Nothing happens by accident." -
gimme a break), it at least feels fresh while happening, mostly due to a
state of intellectual tension that's there (read: if you think about the
fact that if they don't hurry up and get the Queen to her rendezvous,
more and more people will die, though they hardly keep reminding you).
I was even impressed by the way Lucas seems to purposely gloss over the
inclusions of characters from the next trilogy, including a brief
appearance by Jabba the Hut, a couple scenes with Yoda (as a senator,
walking cane firmly in hand), and introductions to both R2-D2 and C3P0.
R2-D2 is even glanced over when he first appears, and C3P0 is given such
a brief role that it's refreshing that Lucas didn't pander too much to
his audience.  The same goes for the inclusion of Samuel L. Jackson and
Terence Stamp, two terrific actors given unglamorous cameo-sized roles.
Still, a lot of the film feels like it was pasted together out of neat
ideas that don't gel terribly well together, something not present in
the other films.  There's also an odd air of "we should be completely
enthralled though we aren't that enthralled" throughout.  My reason for
this is because, with the exception of Annakin and Qui-Gon Jinn, there's
no real source of emotional appeal.  Neeson's likable just because he's
commanding and wise and confident, and Annakin's likable because Lloyd
makes him so darned appealing (also, kudos to Pernilla August for
playing his mother so damn well, adding a considerable amount of
emotional weight to the film).  But most of everyone else is a bit
disappointing.  Amidala is underwritten, and the same times two goes for
Obi-Wan Kenobi (McGregor turns in a 'not bad but not great either, is
it?' performance, consisting of trying too hard to appear like a young
Alec Guiness and coming up with vacuousness).  The other films, even the
first one, had sharply drawn characters that were full of personality if
nothing else and only got better as the series went on.  With these
characters, I doubt much can be done, though.  Amidala possesses some of
Princess Leia's feistiness from time to time (probably because she's her
mother), but she's mostly authoritative and kinda cold; I can already
picture her reasons for wanting to marry Anakin in a later episode.  And
Obi-Wan's future seems painfully clear already: he'll learn more and
more and become stern and wise as he gets older.  For Annakin, though,
it's wonderfully vague.  I'm nearly anticipating the second episode
already, just so I can see where Lucas takes his character on his
journey to assured evil.
While this all factors in the fact that I shan't be giving this a four
star rating like the other ones (sorry, guys), I was at least totally
thrilled with the film's final act, a juxtaposition a la 'Jedi' where
three battles go on simultaneously and are shown via cutaways at key
moments, that was exciting, filled with originality, and
pulse-pounding.  The inclusion of the character Darth Maul plays a key
role in the impact of this section as he's probably the most incredibly
fascinating minor character in the saga since Boba Fett: his face is
painted red and black stripes, he has horns on his head that aren't
revealed till the finale (and with lots of 'oo's and 'ah's from the
audience), and he says all of one or two lines.  A mysterious character
like this, especially one so menacing, is all this film needs, and his
final battle with both Obi-Wan and Qui-Gon is nothing short of
breathtaking.  The orchestra adds choir voices and then pounds away with
intensity, the acrobatics and choreography are probably better than the
stuff in 'The Matrix,' and there's so much tension, namely in the
survival of Qui-Gon, that it's sublime.  Only problem is the other two
aren't nearly as captivating, though still terrific, and every cutaway
is like a massive jolt that lasts until the next time they come back to
it.  Same thing happened with 'Jedi'; why this structure wasn't avoided
at all costs by Lucas is beyond me (well, really not; he probably thinks
'Jedi' is just flawless stuff).
But still, this entire section, plus a nifty (and short) denouement cap
the film off with an enjoyable feeling, leaving the audience pumped up.
And while I left with a big stupid grin on my mouth, the thing I really
respected is how divorced this is from the other films.  It doesn't try
and play like one of those films, and by playing it so differently, the
CGI effects actually work.  They don't look too unreal, as I feared, but
they do give it a whole other feeling that wasn't there in the other
films, which relied mostly on puppets and real creations, not CGI.  But
that all works with this film.  The characters seem to have more life in
them, and we're able to visit places where more diverse creatures dwell
in large numbers.  This didn't work at all in the re-releases (where you
could visibly tell where they injected CGI), but it works here because
it's consistent and clearly defines its reality (the flip-side ot this
is it seems to have given Lucas the chance to add broad comedy to the
brew - mostly in the form of 'comic relief' Jar Jar Binks - most of
which falls flat and proves quite annoying).  It'd be nice for a return,
just because I prefer the look of those films, but if this is the
direction Lucas is taking this trilogy in, I'm glad to follow along.
His dialogue may still be shit, and he's lost a bit of his storytelling
magic, but 'The Phantom Menace' is at the very least incredibly
satisfying, which is commendable since this is, in fact, the most highly
anticipated film of all time.  It's nice not to be letdown by such a
film, even if you have turned skeptical.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
Director: Roberto Benigni
Writers: Vincenzo Cerami and Roberto Benigni
Starring: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini,
Giustino Durano, Sergio Bini Bustric, Marisa Peredes, Horst Bucholz,
Lidia Alfonsi
The entire world has been praising Roberto Benigni's "Life is
Beautiful," and I'm no exception to that.  I too think it's a wonderful
flick, but I suspect for different reasons.  Everyone's been praising
this as a great uplifter, a - oh, how did they put it? - "triumph of the
human spirit."  In fact, the opposite is true, and it took me awhile to
come to my conclusion that the entire film is about man's ability for
denial, and the way horrific instances cause certain people to pervert
reality in favor of themselves, and thus harm others considerably, if
not mortally, psychologically.  I can remember seeing it vividly: I
laughed through the first, magical half, then hardly peeped during the
second, except to let out a couple hollow laughs at some rather funny
moments.
But as I went home, I felt unsatisfied in my delight for the film, while
my movie-going companion seemed to think it was the greatest film of the
year, without a shred of doubt.  Cute, witty, and sad.  Sure, it was.  I
let that unsatisfaction subside, though, and I began to write the review
that everyone else had written - how it was wonderfully uplifting, as
good as the best of Chaplin, all that crap.  But the more I thought of
it, I decided that my primary reasoning had, in fact, been compeltely
off.
Let me lay out the film for you, first, to illustrate my point.  The
film, as you may have heard, is about the Holocaust, but it's also a
comedy (don't mesh those words together, though: this is not a
"holocaust comedy," as I describe it to some of my friends who haven't
seen it, jokingly).  Great Italian comic actor Roberto Benigni directs,
co-writes, and stars in the film as a hapless character who is a joyous
motormouth, a wonderfully adept physical comedian, and also energetic
and charismatic.  He's not exactly the Little Tramp or Buster Keaton or
anyone else from the silent era though: he's an original creation,
though a bit inspired by them.
But anyway, his character, Guido, moves to a lovely, picturesque Italian
city in the beginning of the film, and along the way, meets and falls in
love with a beautiful woman, Dora (Nicoletta Braschi, his wife and thus
his co-star).  She is, of course, engaged to another man, and of course,
he's a jerk and he hates Guido because of a hilarious situation that
happens early in the film.  Much of the first fifty minutes deals with
his attempts to woo her, by bending reality so that he can be with her,
and his attempts at becoming a respectable waiter so that he can make
money and one day open a bookstore of his own.
It's all rather predictable, and we've seen it all before, but that
hardly means it's arbitrary to the rest of the film; the first half is
hilarious and witty and charming and it's completely entertaining in the
way films today aren't.  Gags abound, and the romance between Guido and
Dora becomes sweet like romances aren't these days.  However, this first
half isn't just cuteness: it's deceptively complex, with hints that this
film may be deeper than just uplifting, and that Benigni probably just
didn't stumble onto something more interesting.  As Benigni courts Dora,
he finds he is able to bend reality, and soon keys are popping into his
hand at will, and she's becoming truly in love with him because he is so
magical and wonderful and so not the bore her temper-ridden fiance is.
By the time, he rides into her engagement reception on a horse and
sweeps her off her feet, the film has almost transcended any traces of
realism, and become a truly magical experience...and take note of that,
because they carry on a picturesque, near-perfect life together.  They
have a child named Giousé (Giorgio Cantarini), he opens the bookstore,
and they stay completely in love with eachother.  They also live in
Italy during the holocaust and Guido just happens to be Jewish, so when
he and Giousé are taken away by Nazis to go to concentration camp, their
life is shattered.
Now here's where the film becomes complicated, not to mention
controversial: in order to protect his son from the horrors, Guido lies
to Giousé and tells him that it's all a game, an adventure holiday
disguised as a horrific prison.  Points are handed out for doing things
like not asking for desert, and hiding from the Nazis, and not
screaming.  In fact, in one scene when a German officer comes into the
shack where the prisoners are held and asks for an interpretor, a
non-German-speaking Guido says he can translate and turns every word and
every gesture the officer makes into a description of the rules of the
game.  The complicated thing about this is is he really protecting
Giousé?  By the end (if you don't want to hear what happens, skip a
paragraph or three), when Guido has been gunned down by an officer for
making trouble, and Giousé thinks he has won the game by collecting a
thousand points, and is then reunited with his mother in one beautifully
uplifting reunion where they're both happy to see eachother and have no
clue their father and husband is lying in a ditch a couple miles away,
you have to wonder if this isn't the least uplifting film of the year
disguised as the exact opposite.  Though the narration by an older
Giousé says he's happy his father retained his son's humanity, it's a
wonder if everyone in this film isn't in deep denial, and if they are,
this has to be the entire point of the film.  Guido, a man who has been
able to pervert the truth for the entire film, finds himself in real
hellish conditions, and tries to fix them by lying to himself and to his
son, finally meets a tragic conclusion - not so uplifting anymore, eh?
But that's what's so extremely interesting about this film.  It's
deceptive and clever, and it certainly had me thinking it was something
else and not such a downbeat film.  In fact, this may be the greatest
hoax in contemporary cinema: the film has been praised as the great
humane film of the year, been awarded numerous accolades from
organizations who usually don't recognize films, and Benigni himself has
gone around discussing how it is a great message for his life, and how
his father used to water down the stories of his life in a concentration
camp to not freak his kids out.  Maybe a little bit older, Benigni has
recognized the errors of his father's ways: by not telling the truth, he
has perhaps awakened some deep psyhological demons in his son when he
learned the bitter truth about life, and Benigni, clever bastard that he
is, has constructed a film so complex that it can only be accurately
discerned by heavy thinking and a lack of suppression.  The fact that I
denied the final shot, the key to the entire film's truth, and thought
it was a great uplifter was one example of Benigni's genius as a
filmmaker.
In fact, out of all the reviews I've read for this film, only one other
critic in the entire world agrees with me, and that's Mike D'Angelo, who
makes the exact same case as I do, and likes it about as much as I do.
He too spotted the hints, the allusions to Schopenhauer, and the little
tricks Benigni uses to make his point about denial so incredibly
truthful, that if the only thing I have wrong with this film is that it
is deceptive.  I'm always a tad taken back at a film that uses
manipulation to make its own ends meet, and I'm a little appalled that
Benigni has let it go as far as he has (unless, of course, I'm reading
this film completely wrong, and that's not out of the question).
Add that along with the fact that the second half is just not as great
as it should be, even with the deception, and you have a film which is,
yes, great, but perhaps not as great as it could be.  I admire the fact
that it goes to such far lengths to get its point across.  But that
doesn't mean that it's perfect.  But as it is, "Life is Beautiful" may
be the most engagingly ironic film to ever hit the big screen - a film
that I fear may result in bad word of mouth if every critic realized the
truth behind the mask long after they've praised it for being so
incredibly "uplifting."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Directors: John Lasseter and Andrew Stanton
Writers: Don McEnery, Bob Shaw, and Andrew Stanton (story by John
Lasseter, Bob Shaw, and Andrew Stanton)
Starring: Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, Hayden
Panettiere, Phyllis Diller, Richard Kind, David Hyde-Pierce, Joe Ranft,
Denis Leary, Jonathan Harris, Madeline Kahn, Bonnie Hunt, Michael
McShane, John Ratzenberger, Brad Garret, Roddy McDowell, Edie McClurg,
Alex Rocco
"A Bug's Life" may not be "Toy Story," but it's more close than "Antz"
was.  I really liked "Antz," basically because, yes, it is clever and
witty and intelligent (and it has the temerity to take a chance and put
Woody Allen in the lead, perhaps the year's most inspired casting), but
there was, in fact, something missing from it, and I'm the first to
admit that.  Maybe it's that it never totally lets go and takes off into
real innocent fun - it's too obsessed with its Orwellian message to
become totally engaging, and if it weren't for Woody Allen, it would
have been just a really clever good-not-great flick.
"A Bug's Life" has a similar premise, and it also has Disney to insure
that it's G-rated and not totally over kids' heads like "Antz" was (not
a bad thing, believe me), but what it also has is a tone that's
completely innocent even when it's also remaining perpetually clever.
"Antz" is still the more witty film, and I love it for it, and "A Bug's
Life" is more for general consumption, but it's also more entertaining.
It broadens its horizons, and when it really moves from the ant colony,
it really shows us a whole new world we've never seen before, and it's
take on the evolution of bugs is a lot better than the one in "Antz."
It's also light AND clever.
The visuals are, instead of earth tones, bright worldly colors, and
still gives the amazing visual technology of "Antz" at least a worthy
contender.  The characters are also nicely realized - though
watered-down for broad consumption, they still carry more wit than the
contemporary Disney animated films.  The lead character, Flik (voiced by
Dave Foley), is nothing more than a slightly-less neurotic Z from
"Antz," but Foley makes him nearly as engaging as Allen made Z.  Instead
of Gene Hackman playing the villain, we get the much more menacing Kevin
Spacey as the lead grasshopper, the nicely-titled Hopper.  And for the
romantic lead, we don't get spacey Sharon Stone, but intelligent and
hard-to-get Julia-Louis Dreyfuss, who doesn't even come around until the
very final frames.
Not that the plot's really any better than the one in "Antz" - it's
basically yet another redux of "The Seven Samurai," with an ant colony
under the control of giant grasshoppers forcing them to produce a
product for them or else.  When Flik, a bone fide inventor, creates a
time-conserving apparatus that accidentally destroys the season's
donation, he puts them all in risk, and is sent away so that he won't
screw anything up with the pretense that he is searching for help to
fight the grasshoppers.  He runs into a group of "warrirors" who are,
unbeknownst to him, a group of carnival bugs, and they agree to help
under similar false pretenses.  These bugs are an equally wonderful
assortment to anything in "Toy Story": foppish walking stick Slim (David
Hyde-Pierce), German caterpillar Heimlich (Joe Ranft), quick-tempered
and insecure male ladybug Francis (Denis Leary), pretentious praying
mantis Manny (Jonathan Harris), his assistant butterfly Hypsy (Madeliene
Kahn), spider Rosie (Bonnie Hunt), and two fleas, Tuck and Roll (Michael
McShane), who speak in undiscernable jibberish.
The writers lightly touch on each bug's place in bug society and the
malleability thereof while making a wisecracks at everything they can,
and blowing the audience away with wild visual treats.  Grasshoppers
jumping in unison seems like a menacing earthquake.  A small bird
becomes an ominous mortal threat, whose usual mild-mannered squeal is a
scream of death.  The bug city is a modern-day metropolis, complete with
fireflies temping as traffic lights and a fly sitting on the curb,
holding out a cup, with a sign lying next to him that says "Kid tore off
wings."  And a rainstorm is like a giant flood, with each drop acting
like a small bomb dropped at millions of miles per hour.
Around this, the Pixar animators stage several large set pieces, like a
resuce mission halfway through that is as wild and entertaining as
anything this year, and a wonderfully exciting action piece at the end,
a chase scene at night through the labyrinthine branches of a small
thicket.  Meanwhile, each character gets the spotlight to be completely
idisyncratic and interesting, something "Antz" couldn't do, and by the
end, over the end credits, "A Bug's Life" pulls it's final punch, out
clever-ing "Antz" with a series of incessantly hilarious faux-bloopers
that come just at the right time, when those who leave immeadiately
after the final frame of a film have left, and you can brag that you
were one of the elite who stayed and got the full money's worth of
entertainment.
Still, it's no "Toy Story."  That film, maybe above any animated film
I've ever seen, encompassed almost true perfection in story, character,
and wit.  It proved that it didn't need to brag about it's cutting edge
technology to really soar (it's the least visually striking of the three
computer animated films thus far, but is still the most satisfying), and
created a perfect world of idiosyncratic delights and innocent fun.  Yet
"A Bug's Life," as well as "Antz," are still amazing films, and prove
without doubt, that if you're gonna make a computer animated film, send
it to the guys who created these three flicks, evne if they're not
working under the same roof.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
Writer/Director: Mike Judge
Starring: Ron Livingston, Jennifer Aniston, Ajay Naidu, David Herman,
Gary Cole, Stephen Root, Richard Riehle, Diedrich Bader, John C.
McGinley, Paul Wilson, Todd Duffey
Of course I agree and like everything that 'Office Space' stands for.  I
have a job, and while it may not be a desk job like the one in this
movie, it's still a station for purgatory on earth.  And I fear the day
when I have to give up my dreams of whatever it is I dream of and settle
for a boring, spirit crushing desk job, like the one the characters in
this film have.  They work every day, sometimes even weekends, at a
computer plant and their job is to prepare for Y2K.  As written and
directed by Mike Judge ('Beevis and Butthead,' 'King of the Hill'), it's
a cartoonish hellhole of orwellian and kafkaesque proportions.  The lead
character (Ron Livingston, from 'Swingers') is basically a mutation of
the Job character from the bible, complaining to a hypnotherapist that,
'Since I started working, every single day has been worse than the day
before, so that every day you see me is the worst day of my life.'
On his way to work, he gets stuck in a mind-blowing traffic jam, and
every time he successfully gets into the moving lane, the lane stops
moving, and the lane he was just in starts moving miraculously.  He
glances out of his blind spot and notices the old man with a walker,
moving at a snail's pace, is making more locational progress than he
is.  When he gets to work, people notice he's gloomy and say he's 'come
down with a case of the "Mondays."'  Then his main boss (Gary Cole)
shows up at his cubicle and mentions that he didn't put the cover sheet
on his latest TPS report.  A couple seconds later, another boss comes up
to him and says the same thing.  Then again.  Then again.  Meanwhile, a
high-pitched receptionist's voice repeats the same annoying mantra to
caller after caller after caller.  Work is hell; a desk job is worse.
There are many hilarious things about 'Office Space,' and all of them
have to do with the hellishness of work and the way they make the
characters feel.  And it only helps that Judge, in his own right, is an
exceptional satirist, not only in terms of the lowest-of-the-low-ness he
brought to 'Beevis and Butthead,' but also to his 'Milton' shorts that
were shown on 'Saturday Night Live' way back when.  'Office Space' is
basically the live-action materialization of those shorts, complete with
the materialization of the Milton character (played brilliantly by
Stephen Root).  Milton, an overweight, perpetually sweating lisper works
in a tiny cubicle, with his radio and stapler as his only refuges, and
is always either being told to relocate his cubicle or to allow more and
more cardboard boxes to be stored there, crowding him in.  Just about
anything Milton does in this film is just about laugh-out-loud
hilarious, not the least being the scene where the boss has his birthday
party and is passing out cake while Milton is furiously worrying if
there's enough pieces or not.
In fact, there's so much potential comedy here that it's a damn shame
that it had to succumb to the silliest of Hollywood Movie Standards and
give itself an actual plot, and then succumb to the second silliest
Standard and give itself a go-nowhere romantic subplot involving the
main character and a 'Friends' cast member.  See, a movie these days,
especially one that's main strong point is its satire, doesn't feel like
it can get by on just it's on random comic insights, and the result is
that a film like this often becomes subject to a balancing beam of
judgment, concerning the ratio of great, funny moments to the thinness
and annoyance of the plot that it felt it had to add.  In fact, for a
lot of this film, I was in mild suspense, wondering how this film would
turn out in regard to that; it has a ton of funny,
tell-your-friends-and-family moments, but on the other hand, it has that
distracting plot that, self-depricative or not, still gets in the way of
potential jokes.  The actual storyline concerns our hero, Peter, and his
two office buds, Samir (Ajay Naidu, from 'SubUrbia') and Michael Bolton
(David Herman)...and no, not that Michael Bolton, as we're told (at
least it leads up to one really funny joke, involving John C. McGinley),
and their decision to try and rip off the company over the course of a
couple years by using a program designed by Bolton that was in fact
ripped off of a job pulled off unsuccessfully in the 70s (and, as they
note, in 'Superman III').
There's another plot going on at the same time, though, featuring how
Peter goes to a hypnotherapist who puts him in a positive trance and
then dies before he can bring him out of it.  Pretty soon, Peter is
sleeping in for days on end, ignoring his boss, knocking down part of
his cubicle so he can see outside the window, and even gutting fish at
his desk.  And he's also becoming acquainted with an attractive waitress
(Jennifer Aniston) at the local T.G.I. Fridays-esque establishment near
his office, who is stressed out by her own job, which requires her to
wear a minimum of 15 'flairs.'  She does, but her boss wants more
personality out of her, and points out that Brian, another waiter has 37
'flairs,' and a heck of a smile to boot.  Basically, this film has lots
of really superb moments, and a great philosophy about work that would
make for an otherwise recommendable film.  Alas, it's not to be.  The
main plot, about the virus, and the romance interfere too much with and
seem to detract from the overall orwellian/kafkaesque feel that this
film nails in its opening ten minutes.  Sure, Stephen Root is a
guaranteed riot, and Gary Cole (who with this and 'A Simple Plan' is
becoming a favorite supporting player of mine) is a hoot as the tiresome
boss, who opens every single sentence with a prolonged
'Yeeeaaaahhhh...." only to ignore anything anyone else says.
But the rest of it is hit-and-miss.  Livingston is likable in the lead,
but he never pushes the envelope far enough (he basically needs more
material to work with), and the same goes for Naidu and Herman, who both
do the best with what they're given.  As usual, it's the supporting guys
who have to work the hardest, to cover up for the amount of laughs the
plot and subplots take away from the overall effect of the film.  But
even they aren't given a whole lot to work with, and the entire feel I
had coming out of the film was of dire unsatisfaction.  I knew there
were lots and lots of great moments that I was still giggling about, but
there are too many missed opportunities and the main plot just ain't
funny enough.  What I did like, though, was the change in Peter from
'this blows' to 'who cares?' and what it gets him into.  Basically, the
office is being visited by efficiency experts (McGinley and Paul
Williams), a disguised word for those who give the bosses more money by
trimming the fat off the office.  Going through interviews, most people
kiss up, but nonchalant Peter tells them he actually does work for a
mere 15 minutes a week, and when questioned about the amount of work
he's missed, he gleefully states 'Well, I wouldn't say I've been missing
it.'  They like his attitude, and instead of firing him, as his boss
suggests, they state he should be promoted so he can have a challenge.
Okay, good idea.  This is stuff comedy, cartoonish as this is, is made
for.  But even when it gets to Peter's promotion, it still falls back on
the dreaded virus plot, which is more of an excuse-for-a-plot than an
actual plot.
Suggestions for the film: 1) drop the Aniston romance or at least modify
so it either goes somewhere or is the least bit interesting, because as
such, it isn't; 2) drop the virus stuff altogether - just not that
funny; 3) maybe, just maybe, go with the stuff about the promotion, and
make it more satirical and even funnier - expand expand expand; 4) up
the orwellian and kafkaesque tones a lot - apart from the
beginning stuff and a couple spots throughout, there's just not enough
of it; and 5) maybe just ditch any sense of a plot and make it an
episodic, plotless look into office life, exposing the horrors and thus
the humor in a more productive and satisfying manner.  Number 5 is the
most feared of all because not only does this mean the screenwriter(s)
has/have to come up with more jokes, it means snobbish critics will pan
it for not having a plot.  Let me state this loud and clear: you do not
need a plot to make a good film.  I just saw a Truffaut film called
'Small Change,' which is just a great flick, that dealt with the lives
of children in school and out.  It was plotless, save for a bit at the
end about a maltreated boy, but its lack of a plot allowed it to be more
open to insight, and to be able to concentrate more on mannerisms and
create individual sequences which together made up a complete portrait.
Now, I'm not suggesting in any way that a film like 'Office Space'
should be like a 70s French art house film; I'm merely implying that
this kind of structure would actually benefit a film like this.
Because, as such, it's just not at all satisfying, even if it does have
its head in the right place and comes with a powerhouse of great jokes.
Just not amusing enough.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
Writers: Darren Aronofsky, Sean Gullette, and Eric Watson
Starring: Sean Gullette, Mark Margolis, Ben Shankman, Pamela Hart, 
Stephen Pearlman, Samia Shoaib, Ajay Naidu
Made for about the same amount of money that I earned during an entire 
summer break slaving at Radio Shack, "Pi" is an incessantly cool-looking 
paranoiac thriller, all the more interesting because it's budget was so 
excrutiatingly low (as I've already mentioned). Like a German 
Expressionist Film from the 20s, it nearly takes pride in the lack of 
resources it has, and creates a unique-looking world from what 
technology it has, meaning stark, unrealistic black and white 
photography, lots of shadows and pale faces, and a story that relies 
more on visuals and crazy images than entities like acting and plotting. 
In fact, the way it's shot is as appropriate as the way this year's "The 
Celebration" was shot: that Danish film gave a feeling of hidden home 
video, and this film puts us directly into the mind of its protagonist, 
a brilliant mathematician, Max (Sean Gullette), whose sanity wanes as 
the film progresses. The plot - about Max trying to find patterns in the 
stock exchange and therefore predict it - is not nearly as important as 
what the film's main theme is: that knowledge is a crutch, and the more 
you know, the more in danger you are.
With balding hair and a world-wearied facade, Max lives a lonely life, 
but doesn't seem to mind completely since his entire apartment is packed 
with computers and machines. At the top of this cluttered mess is a 
standard stock market scrolling marquee that ominously reveals the 
information that he needs to know to complete his work. The people we 
meet are either loners themselves (a wise older man whom he plays chess 
with, played by Mark Margolis), those out to profit from his knowledge 
(a woman who works for a brokerage, played by Pamela Hart), or 
well-meaning neighbors (an Indian woman, played by Samia Shoaib, who 
seems to have a sweet crush on him). The main plot kicks into gear 
immeadiately, as he runs into a seemingly friendly Jewish scholar (Ben 
Shankman) who piques his interest in finding what may be the Name of God 
from the Rosetta Stone. According to him, God has as many numbers as the 
project he's working on. Max begins working on all of these, and slowly 
passes over the brink of sanity, just as those who would profit from him 
begin to become more and more belligerent (if you've ever wanted to see 
irate and deadly Jewish scholars, have I got a movie for you...). But is 
this all part of his growing insanity, this film seems to question, as 
it shows off more and more crazy sequences, like a creepy scene where 
Max stumbles onto what seems to be a human brain in the subway.
Filled with manic imagery and a great techno soundtrack, "Pi" should be 
an absolutely astounding motion picture, like the two films it's been 
compared to, Orson Welles' "The Trial" and David Lynch's "Eraserhead," 
both which feature many of the same elements of stark black and white 
photography, extensive use of chiaroscuro lighting techniques, and a 
paranoiac overtone. But "Pi" doesn't completely deliver. The way it's 
made is superb, and I have no doubt that Darren Aronofsky's future in 
film will be a promising and exciting one, just from the way he directs 
this film. But it just needs a better script. The story of Max is 
interesting, but it's hackneyed with an interesting but way too simple 
theme, that being that too much knowledge alienates us and drives us 
into insanity. It's almost a pity that it deals with this direclty on 
the surface and doesn't let itself become free and complicated: all the 
plot elements, while interesting, are only there to serve the theme, and 
it becomes less of a human story. When you think of either "The Trial" 
or "Eraserhead," you not only remember the complicated storylines and 
numerous themes, but you also remember the lead characters, respectively 
the irate but guilty Joseph K. (played by Anthony Perkins) and the 
lonely-to-a-fault Henry Spencer. Max, while interesting and greatly 
played by Sean Gullette, is still nothing much more than a catalyst to 
bring about the theme.
In fact, by the end, looking back on the plot, I was wondering if this 
was all there was. If this wasn't told the way it was, it'd be a totally 
forgettable albeit somewhat effective thriller (somewhat referring to 
the amount of horror that Jewish scholars and rabbis on your trail bring 
about). But it is told in a great fashion. Aronofsky is effective with 
his shot designs and camera movements, and his look has that of a 
nightmare, as if it was the world from the POV of a slightly deranged 
and cut-off genius, and we are quickly and effortlessly sucked into 
Max's world, and feel the pain and horror that he witnesses, like the 
way "The Trial" and "Eraserhead" are directed. And this world is as 
fresh and unique-looking as those two films. He's so effective that you 
soon ignore the plot, and concentrate on the hypnotic visuals that are 
being presented to us, so that later on you don't recall the potentially 
frightening elements of the plot but rather the insanity of the film's 
look. Great ending too; in fact, an unforgettable ending, just like the 
design of the film, but while you can't forget the images, do you even 
remember what it's about?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Parent Trap, The (1998)
Director: Nancy Meyers
Writers: Nancy Meyers and Charles Shyer (based on the 1961 script by
David Swift and the book "Das Doppelite Lottchen" by Erich Kastner)
Starring: Lindsay Lohan, Dennis Quaid, Natasha Richardson, Elaine
Hendrix, Lisa Ann Walter, Simon Kunz, Polly Holliday, Maggie Wheeler,
Ronnie Stevens, Joanna Barnes
I actually am a fan of the original 1961 or so Live-Action-Disney flick
of the same name starring Hayley Mills twice as a pair of twins,
separated at birth by divorcing parents, never to come in contact with
the other so the parents never have to meet again.  And everyone should
know how I feel about remakes, especially of films I happen to enjoy (my
fallacy: unless you're going to either capture the same exact spirit of
the original or do something different with it or maybe even both, just
wrack your brain and come up with a *gasp* new idea).  This remake was
not originally on the top of my viewing list, and was actually quite the
opposite.  Contemporary Live-Action-Disney films are not one of my
favorties, anyway: they're usually unfunny, alienating, and a big fat
bore, at least to anyone over the age of 11 and above the IQ of 10.
This one, however, is shockingly not bad.  In fact, it's actually good.
Not the original good, but what's great about it is that it doesn't
necessarily retread the original or capture the same exact spirit as it
does become entertaining for the same exact reasons the original was
entertaining.  Because it's cute and innocent fun.  Because it has a
pretty killer plot that is endlessly fun to follow along with.  Because
the lead star is immensely appealing.  Because the parents are also
immensely appealing.  And (I'm repeating myself) because it's cute and
innocent fun.  There's nothing too risque about it, save the plot (the
idea of separating twins and denying them the truth for years is
ominously selfish, but that is precisely the point of the movie), and
it's aimed directly at either kids, adults who want to remember the
original, or young adults who want to remember what it was like to be a
kid.
I, personally, am somewhere between the second and third.  I can vividly
remember when my taste in movies wasn't so weird or diverse (the names
Godard and Kubrick weren't even a glimmer in my right eye back then),
when I would tune in every Sunday night for a couple years to see ABC's
"Wonderful World of Disney," where they'd show you a Live-Action and/or
Made-for-TV Disney flick an hour per week.  I can remember my mom taking
my sister and I along with all my friends and their mothers to see all
the rereleased Disney films (like "Lady and the Tramp" and
"Pinnochio").  And, most sadly, I remember every single Christmas,
without fail, there were a barage of children's animated half-hour
shows, made exclusively for the Christmas season, that I wouldn't dare
missing.  I can even remember seeing the made-for-TV "Parent Trap II" on
TV one night, and after I had seen that one over and over and over
again, I saw the original "Parent Trap."  It's more of a late childhood
movie, because it deals with the issue of divorce, but it deals with it
in a Disney-ized version.  It's playful, and witty, and charming, and if
I saw it for the first time right now, having never experienced that
part of my childhood, I'd probably dismiss it.
I'd probably do the same for the new version of the same movie if I
hadn't seen the original at such a perfect age.  Watching it, I could
remember what fun it was to watch a Disney film, and how divorce for me
started to get me thinking about the possibilities of my
seemingly-perfect parents splitting up, and how it affected my
adolescence.  And also how it brushed that fear off with a smooth
stroke, and pointed out that even in the most fucked-up of situations,
things could always work out if you, well, manipulate things a bit, at
least for the better.  This new version did that for me, but it's also
charming in its own way.  It has a new cast, a contemporary feel, and,
for the first time in awhile for a Live-Action-Disney flick, a tone that
isn't corny or condescending, but just right.  The moments that would
otherwise seem corny are actually affecting in a safe kind of way.  And
for the first time since the original film, the kids actually know
better than the foolish adults.
The story is basically classic by now, repeated almost as many times as
Kurosawa's "The Seven Samurai": a pair of twins (played here by Lindsay
Lohan, just like they were played by Hayley Mills in the original) are
separated at birth by their divorcing parents.  One, Annie, is sent to
live with the mother (Natasha Richardson, resembling her mother, Vanessa
Redgrave, more than I had ever noticed) in London, where she lives with
her parents and her devoted, foppish butler (Simon Kunz), as she works
as a swingin' fashion designer.  She grows up refined and classy, but
also with a keen knowledge in sports and poker-playing.  The other,
Hallie, is sent to northern California with her father (Dennis Quaid) to
live on a vineyard with their pseudo-maid (Lisa Ann Walter), and grows
up rugged yet charming.  They both meet at the same camp, one that Annie
wants to go to to become more rugged.  They feud because they look
all-too similar, and are thus in tight competition, which results in
some nasty pranks, which winds them in seclusion together in a private,
out-of-the-way cabin.  There, they become friends, then learn about
eachother.  Once they know everything, they concoct a scheme to switch
places so the one can meet the other parent, whom they've only heard
of.  They learn about eachother's lives in detail, they make sure they
look alike (which requires hair cutting and, notoriously, ear-piercing -
a scene which is like the kiddie version of the hypodermic needle scene
in "Pulp Fiction"), and when the end of summer comes, they switch and
hope for the best.
Lindsay Lohan doesn't necessarily copy the acting style of Hayley Mills
in the original.  But she comes off just as appealing as she did once.
She does, though, add a couple new things: she makes the California twin
a little more appealing and the London twin a bit more frank and
snobbish than the snotty and proper original, respectively.  She also
adds on an American and British accent to each one, with one faking the
other accent throughout, and if you really take notice, you can see that
the fake ones' accents aren't exactly perfect.  She's also incredibly
appealing, not merely cute, which is especially notable since this is
her first feature film, and we know how notorious child actors are,
especially in their first films.  She makes a great protagonist, and it
only helps that the supporting cast is equally appealing.
Dennis Quaid, in fact, hasn't been this likable in about a decade - his
big dumb smile and near cocky attitude is what has made him a notable
actor in the past, not just that he's Mr. Meg Ryan.  Ditto Natasha
Richardson (except that she just hasn't ever been this likable period).
The two make a winning couple, maybe not so winning as Maureen O'Hara
and the late Brian Keith in the original, but they still work for this
film.  Instead of the bickering that ensued in the original, the film
adds another dimension and another angle to their characters that was
amiss in the original: during the opening credits, we see glimpses from
their courtship on the QE2, where they fall quickly and madly in love
with eachother, and when back together again, the film's more smarmy
scenes come off as actually sentimental, but in that great way, not the
migraine-inducing way as in many such films.
This all brings this new "Parent Trap" to a level of entertainment that
hasn't really existed since, well, the original film years ago, still my
money the best Live-Action-Disney flick of all time.  This is because it
has a form of intelligence and wit that makes such plot points as an
otherwise standard villainous love interest subplot (a gold-digging
Sharon Stone type, played by Elaine Hendrix, who's deliciously tormented
by the twins later on in the film) a treat instead of a bore.  Like the
original, this film transcends all the crap that it very well could be
(case in point: "It Takes Two" starring the Olsen Twins) because it
treats the children as the smart ones, and the adults as the silly ones,
not the other way around.  And because, above everything, it knows
exactly how to be charming without biting off more than it can chew.
However, in comparison with the original, it could be a bit better.
Certain scenes work well, but not nearly as well as they worked in the
original.  I liked the way the parents fought over past dilemnas and
then fought over falling in love again better than I liked watching two
old flames getting back together over a bottle of wine - somehow,
feuding is always more cinematic and pleasing than mere reminscing, a
lesson extracted from the Howard Hawks/Cary Grant films of yesteryear.
And as much as this film transcends mere cutedom, compared to the
original, this film almost drowns in cutedom.  The original, though not
gritty, was far more stylized and just as suitable for adult audiences
as it was for young audiences.  As such, this remake may never be nearly
as great or classic as the original film, but it at least knows how to
treat its source material with dignity and respect, and how to create
virtually the same effects without bordering on plagerism or petty
annoyances.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Big One, The (1997)
Starring: Michael Moore, Phil Knight, Rick Nelson, Garrison Keillor, 
Studs Terkel
No, I haven't seen "Roger and Me" (and let's just forget "Candian Bacon" 
doesn't exist, eh?) but I do know a few things about Michael Moore, as I 
did happen to watch a couple minutes of his short-lived 
summer-replacement TV show "TV Nation" back in the day (and managed to 
glance over "Downsize This" in a bookstore once). He's a liberal with a 
whole lot of money and a loyal film crew, both which he uses to shake up 
the "system" in an attempt to get the point across about the downtrodden 
workers, which let me assure you there are in abundance (I'm one of 
them, though not of the I'm-not-getting-benefits kind, but of the lazy 
kind, not that benefits don't bother me). Physically he looks like a 
poor man's Roger Ebert, an oafish man with a big grin perpetually 
plastered on his face, not revealing his immense intelligence and making 
him easily approachable. He also has an incredible sense of humor, and 
that's his best weapon because otherwise no one would take him seriously 
(you've seen the typical angry demonstrators, and face it, you're as 
annoyed as I am). His other chief weapon is the camera, which he uses to 
embarass the hell out of those in control of workers' jobs, and who have 
no better explanation about mass lay-offs in profitable corporations 
than that someone's greedy. Oh, and he made a film called "Roger and 
Me," which, again, I haven't seen yet, but as I hear, it's about him 
going around with the camera in a northern town, trying to interview the 
CEO of a company that laid off millions of workers at the time.
It's been about a decade since that film hit, and a good thing and a bad 
thing have happened to Mr. Moore: a) he's not lost his sense of humor, 
but b) he's lost his focus...well, sorta. "The Big One" follows him on 
his book tour for "Downsize This," which he describes as the book he 
wrote just so people would still know he was alive (and thus the film), 
and the result is an episodic trip around the America, meeting book 
dates, giving interviews, holding auditorium-sized discussions, and, of 
course, meeting with either potential or actual unions. So every ten 
minutes, we get to see Moore and his crew talk with a union, and then do 
the noble thing of attempting to help them out, with means he tries to 
go right up and see the big cheese, at which point he's either giving a 
bunch of bullshit from the underlings or told by security to leave the 
premises (or at one point, lied that he'll get an interview with the 
president of a company).
And it's all great, priceless material because Moore is such a witty and 
down-to-earth guy, not merely a typical guilty-liberal, but a man who 
has the knowledge of how the system works, the funds to do what he can 
for them, and the showmanship to attract real attention. He's not afraid 
to humiliate people to get something proven (and many of the instances 
are totally worth the price of admission), even if nothing concrete 
actually happens until later. So basically, as I hear, nothing's 
changed...except for a little thing. Throughout the the film, there's a 
disturbing amount of self-gratification going on. More and more scenes 
of him in front of pleased crowds, a near-shameless scene where he gives 
hope and courage to a woman who lost her job the day she met him (and 
buying a 25 dollar hardcover book immeadiately after?), and a lot of 
reaction shots that show Moore listening like a great martyr. In fact, 
there's not much of a point of making this film. Other than showing that 
he's still hard at work, it also shows a side of Moore that takes 
pleasure in the way he helps people, and the entire film has creepy 
undertones of a big fat valentine directed at himself, albeit a 
subconcious one that I'm not sure he realized he was forming when he 
assembled the film together.
But it's so easy to merely brush that aside and ignore it so that you 
can just sit back and enjoy the way this film is made, which is more 
entertainment than social criticism. Moore's wit is heavily on display 
here, and even the aimlessness of the film's structure becomes 
appealing, because you just have no clue what he's going to do next. One 
minute, he could be signing books at Media Play; the next, jamming with 
Cheap Trick member Rick Nelson in his home right near by. It almost has 
the charm of an improv sketch, and Moore has such a great sense of fun 
and adventurism that "The Big One" comes off more like a really 
entertaining ride, even more entertaining if you buy into his philosophy 
(which I do, for the most part). And he concludes it with the one thing 
he couldn't provide in "Roger and Me": an actual filmed interview with a 
CEO. In a priceless bit of movie-dom, Moore sits down for two long 
tete-a-tetes with Nike CEO Phil Knight, accusing him of everything he 
can, humiliating him, yet still coming off as friendly and polite to 
him, and ditto with Knight. The entire last section of the film is 
easily the best, and even if maybe part of the charm of "Roger and Me" 
was that you didn't actually get to see any kind of cherished interview 
transpire (I'm only guessing here), it actually doesn't matter since the 
entire point of the film is that of entertainment. In fact, "The Big 
One" may actually be one of the funnier, more entertaining films of the 
year. But what was the point of Moore even making the film? Beats me. I 
guess it has something to do with him not selling out.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
Writers: Wes Anderson and Owen Wilson
Starring: Jason Schwartzman, Olivia Williams, Bill Murray, Mason Gamble, 
Seymour Cassel, Brian Cox, Sara Tanaka, Stephen McCole, Ronnie McCawley, 
Keith McCawley, Kim Terry, Connie Nielsen, Andrew Wilson, Luke Wilson
Max Fischer's such a sublime creation that the only way you could make a 
bad film about him would be by either determination or utter 
incompetence. At the very least, you'd have to make a mediocre film 
about him, with his character standing out amongst it as the film's 
true, and perhaps only, master stroke. In fact, a film called "Bottle 
Rocket" come to mind: made by the same guys (Wes Anderson and Owen 
Wilson), it featured several great characters, but most notably it 
featured a guy named Dignan (played by Wilson) who was about the 
funniest character of that year. With a short haircut, a mixed accent of 
parts hick and surfer dude, and a knack for devising overly ambitious 
schemes that were almost bound to fail from the moment they were 
introduced, he was the best thing about this frequently funny but 
somewhat unsatisfying film (read: it dragged here and there). But there 
was something about that film that made it better than a lot of comedies 
(indie or not): the creators came up with comic yet completely 
dimensional characters, people who were funny but complex and even 
human, making the laughs come without a sense of condescension (like 
you're laughing at them, but yet you're not, if that makes any 
sense...).
They bring the same droll detachment to "Rushmore," a giant improvement 
on "Bottle Rocket" because it's nearly successful in every way. It's 
witty, laugh-out-loud hilarious, and, for the kicker, strangely poignant 
and touching. The reason it's the most original comedy of the past 
couple years by a long shot is because Anderson and Wilson have managed 
to make big laughs out of the lives of fully realized characters, people 
who are very hilarious but whom we care deeply about and are deeply 
complex. For example, in the film's opening scene, Max is shown having a 
revealing dream about solving the hardest math problem in the world, and 
receiving the accolades of his entire class. Like many of us (read: me), 
Max is insecure and constantly worries about how other people perceive 
him, and maybe that's why he's so happy attending the elite Rushmore 
Academy, the stage where he sets his numerous overly ambitious artistic 
achievements. Max is currently enrolled in at least a couple dozen 
extracuricular activities, usually as either the founder or at least the 
president, including the leader of the Max Fischer Players, a dramatic 
club that is currently putting on a stage production of "Serpico." 
Always wearing his school blazer, while most students can barely stand 
the blue suit shirts, Max has set himself up as at least the school's 
most famous student, if not the most popular, and seems to take glee in 
his black-rimmed glasses, his braces, his perfectly combed hair, and his 
mature vernacular without letting anyone else know about it. Yet he 
never lets anyone know about the truth behind his life: that he was 
given a scholarship to the school in second grade for penning a one act 
play about Watergate, and his father is not a neurosurgeon but rather an 
unambitious barber (Seymour Cassell, of Cassavette films).
And, of course, as the film begins, he's placed on "sudden death 
academic probation" by the school's long-suffering dean (Brian Cox). But 
that only means more dandy work for Max, as his life is interrupted by 
meeting two people who begin to bring about his long-due "coming of age" 
(as this is, tradionally, a "coming of age" story, told 
untraditionally): Herman Blume (Bill Murray), a self-made millionaire 
whose two bratty teenage twins go to Rushmore; and Rosemary Cross (Olvia 
Williams, late of "The Postman" ha ha), a pretty first grade school 
teacher at Rushmore. The first becomes his mentor; the second becomes 
his objet d'obsession. Always needing something to do, he makes his main 
point of business the courting of Rosemary, first becoming her volunteer 
assistant (pouring her lemonade, replacing her red marking pens, etc.), 
but soon makes grand gestures in order to win her over, including a 
would-be romantic dinner and building a multi-million dollar aquarium 
(donated by Herman) on, of all places, the baseball diamond. But these 
grand gestures and his setting the bar way too high soon take a turn for 
the worse, and things begin escalating out of control. He's expelled 
from school. Max's best friend and loyal assistant (Mason Gamble, late 
of "Denace the Menace" ha ha) turns against him. Herman and Rosemary 
meet and fall in love. And Max and Herman go to war against eachother.
All this is done with a uniquely droll sense of humor, the kind that was 
the saving grace of "Bottle Rocket" and here just another way in which 
it's a phenomenal and original comedy. There are plenty of laughs in 
this film, from the ridiculously funny (Max as a back-flipping male 
cheerleader) to the deadpan (Max asking Herman about Vietnam: "So were 
you in the shit?" "Yeah I was in the shit.") to the sublime (a montage 
of static shots showing every actitivity Max takes place in), all 
presented with beautiful and even witty direction by Wes Anderson, who 
mightily improves over his completely deadpan direction of "Bottle 
Rocket." This is a film of lots of colors and glorious wide shots (I 
can't imagine this cropped for the TV screen), and filled with either 
glorious British Invasion obscurities (from The Kinks, The Who, Cat 
Stevens, Chad and Jeremy, and others) or Marx Mothersbaugh's hilarious 
neo-baroque score. The script is absolutely killer: there's more laughs 
than an episode of "Seinfeld," and more dead-on insights into teenage 
behavior than an entire multi-seasonal run of [pick your teenage soap 
opera, prime or daytime].20
And Max will go down in history as one of the truly great comic 
creations: he has the refreshing, cynicism of Holden Caulfield, the 
restlessness of Huck Finn, and the wit of Woody Allen, but a completely 
original desire to be more mature than he is, just because that will 
elevate him above everyone else. And he could have been cold and eerily 
manipulative, but as played by Jason Schwartzman (son of Talia Shire, 
proving once again that there's something in the Coppola bloodline, by 
god), he's easily an anti-hero, someone we root for even when we can't 
believe what he's doing, whether he's trying his best to form a fencing 
club at his newest high school or tampering with the brakes on Herman's 
car. Along with Eamonn Owens from "The Butcher Boy," this is the most 
striking new arrival of the year: a multi-dimensional performer who's 
not afraid to show the flaws of the character while also showing off his 
many redeeming qualities. Thankfully, his object of obsession, Rosemary, 
is also mutli-dimensional: a damaged widow who's also irresistable and 
easily charming, and Williams plays her with such ease and intelligence 
that I, who haven't seen "The Postman," cannot fathom that her 
performance can be anything short of wonderful (then again, I've been 
disappointed a lot). And there's many other great performances here, 
including sharp supporting turns from a gentle Cassell, a reserved Cox, 
a hilarious Gamble, and even a Ewan McGrgeor-lookalike Stephen McCole as 
a scotish bully/fellow student.
But if there's any truly brilliant performance here, it's by Bill 
Murray, recently snubbed greatly for an Oscar nomination for a 
performance that is not only delightfully Murraysian, but surprisngly 
subtle and tragi-comic. Herman, the opposite of Max, owns a giant 
factory but loathes his empty life, his potentially-unfaithful wife, and 
his two monstrous sons, and not only finds a refreshing change of pace 
in the friendship with Max (at first bewildered, but later finds pure 
ease with him), but he also finds that while Max yearns for adulthood, 
he personally yearns to be a kid again. In one wonderfully cinematic 
moment at his sons' birthday party, Herman gets up on the high dive of 
his pool, complete with cigarette dangling from mouth and cup of booze 
in his hand, he cannonballs into the pool, and stays underneath, curled 
up with eyes closed which is straight out of "The Graduate." What's so 
great about this performance is that it's so easy to overlook. Instead 
of the usual Murray schtick, like in "Stripes" or "Ghostbusters," Murray 
opts to speak in a defeated and saddened tone, and acts with 
worldweariness but new life thanks to Max. His performance is, yes, 
funny, but also touching and sad, and if anyone out there has recently 
lost faith in Murray for quality (with "The Man Who Knew Too Little," I 
had), here's the best performance he's ever given, and maybe the best 
supporting performance of the year (he and Billy Bob Thornton are, at 
the very least, head-to-head in my opinion).
Ditto the film. It's hilarious, and plenty witty, but it's also 
extremely affecting, and watching it, I not only felt for the 
characters, but also was able to identify with what was going on because 
everyone, I hope, at some point, faces something similar: a feel of 
inadequacy that you try to overcome in the most idiosyncratic ways. 
Someday, when the hype and all that has been lifted from this film, we 
may hopefully be able to rank it along with several Ernest Lubitsch and 
Woody Allen films, Hal Ashby's "Harold and Maude," and, well, "The 
Graduate," as one of the most unique and weirdly touching comedies to 
ever be made. Hopefully.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
Writer/Director: Woody Allen
Starring: Kenneth Branagh, Judy Davis, Joe Mantegna, Charlize Theron,
Leonardo DiCaprio, Famke Janssen, Winona Ryder, Melanie Griffith, Bebe
Neuwirth, Michael Lerner, Hank Azaria, Gretchen Mol, Dylan Baker,
Jeffrey Wright, Greg Mottola, Andre Gregory, Saffron Burrows, Alfred
Molina, Vanessa Redgrave, Joey Buttafuoco, Mary Jo Buttafuoco, Donald
Trump
After hearing reviews for Woody Allen's upteenth movie in history,
"Celebrity," range from terribly boring to just so-so, my heart lept
when the opening images of the film closely resembled that of
"Manhattan," my personal favorite from my personal favorite director of
all time.  Woody Allen's films almost never rely on visual flair over
textual flair, so when one of his films closely resembles the one time
that these two entities fit hand-in-hand ("Manhattan" really is one of
the best-looking films I've ever seen, beautiful black and white
photography of the city's best areas, etc.), a fan can't help but feel
visibly moved.  The film opens up, with the usual credits with plain
white font over black backgrounds, and an old ironic standard playing on
the soundtrack, but then the screen fills with a gorgeous dull gray sky,
with the word "Help" being spelled with an airplane.  Beethoven's 5th
blasts on the soundtrack.  The city seems to stop to take notice of this
moment, and it's all rather lovely to look at.
And then we cut to a film crew, shooting this as the film's hilariously
banal key moment in the film, where the lead actress in the film
(Melanie Griffith, looking as buxom and beautiful as ever) has to
realize something's wrong with her life or whatever.  It's a terribly
stale scene for a Woody Allen film, with the great opening shots or
without, and my heart sank and I soon got used to the fact that once
again, a new film of his was not going to be as great as his past works
(though, for the record, last year's "Deconstructing Harry" came awfully
close).
What the hell has happened to him?  The man who once could be relied on
for neurotic freshness in cinema has not become less funny, but his
films have become less insightful and more like he tossed them together
out of unfinished ideas.  "Bullets Over Broadway," though wonderful,
relies on irony to pull a farce that just never totally takes off.
"Mighty Aphrodite" is more full of great moments and lines than a really
great story.  "Everyone Says I Love You" was more of a great idea than a
great film.  Even "Deconstructing Harry" is admittingly cheap in a way,
even if it does top as one of his most truly hilarious films.
If anything, the reception of "Celebrity" by everyone should tip Allen
off to the fact that this time, it's not the audience and critics who
are wrong about how wonderful his film is: it's him.  "Celebrity" is,
yes, a good film, but it's only marginally satisfying as a Woody Allen
film.  Instead of creating the great Woody Allen world, he's created a
world out of a subject he knows only a bit about.  And he's fashioned a
film that is based almost entirely on his uninformed philosophy of
celebrities, so that it plays like a series of skits with minor
connections.  It's like "La Dolce Vita" without the accuracy, the right
amount of wit, and the correct personal crisis.
Woody, becoming more insecure in his old age, choses to drop the Woody
Allen character in on the world of celebrities, and then hang him and
all his flaws up for scrutiny, and does this by casting not himself but
Brit actor Kenneth Branagh in the lead.  Much has been said about his
performance - dead on but irritating, makes one yearn for the real
thing, blah blah blah - but to anyone who actually knows the Woody Allen
character knows that Branagh's performance, though featuring some of the
same mannerisms (stuttering, whining, lots o' hand gestures), is hardly
a warts-and-all impersonation.  Branagh brings along with him little of
the Woody Allen charm, which actually allows for his character's flaws
to be more apparent.  Woody's a flawed guy, and we know it, but we love
him anyway, because he's really funny and really witty and really
intelligent.  Branagh's Allen is a bit more flat-out bad, but with the
same charm so that, yes, we like him, but we're still not sure if he's
really a good person or not.
His character, Lee Simon, is first seen on the set of the aforementioned
movie, hits on extra actress Winona Ryder, then goes off to interview
Griffith, who takes him to her childhood home where he makes a pass at
her, and she denies him...sorta.  We then learn, through flashbacks,
that Lee has been sucked into trying to be a celebrity thanks to a
mid-life crisis and an appearance at his high school reunion.  He has
since quit his job as a travel journalist and become a gossip journalist
of sorts, covering movie sets and places where celebrities congregate,
so that he can meet them, and maybe sell his script (a bank robbery
movie "but with a deep personal crisis").  As such, he has divorced his
wife of several years (Allen regular Judy Davis), and continues on a
quest for sexual happiness, boucing from girlfriend to girlfriend and
fling to fling over the course of the film.
After Griffith comes his escapades with a model (Charlize Theron) who is
"polymorphously perverse" (glad to see Allen is using new jokes, ha ha),
who takes him for a wild ride not different from that of the Anita
Ekberg segment of "La Dolce Vita."  Following are his safe relationship
with smart working woman Famke Janssen, a relationship that almost
assures him success, and his continued escapades with Ryder, whom he
fancies most of all.  His story is juxtaposed with that of Davis, who
flips out, but stumbles onto happiness when she runs into a handsome,
friendly TV exec (Joe Mantegna) who lands her a job that furthers her
career to national status.  While Lee is fumbling about, selfishly
trying to ensure his own happiness, Davis becomes happy ("I've become
the kind of woman I've always hated...and I'm loving it.") without doing
a thing.
The result is a film of highs and mediums.  The mediums are what take up
most of the film, with sitations and scenes which don't exactly work but
you can't help but pat Allen on the back for trying.  But other places
are really great scenes.  The opening.  The sequence with Theron, which
is so good that I wished it hadn't ended.  A banana scene with Bebe
Neuwirth (droll as ever).  And, perhaps the best sequence: a romp with
hot-as-hell teen idol, Brandon Darrow, played by none other than Leo
DiCaprio, who is so un-DiCaprio-esque that if any of this fans could sit
through this film, they'd never look at him the same way.  He ignites
the screen with intensity, and spares nothing in showing his character
as narcissistically tyrannical, and totally heartbreaking for Lee, who
comes to him to talk about his script that he has read, and finds
himself on a wild all-day ride with him.  They go to Atlantic City to
watch a fight, they gamble, and they wind up in his hotel room, where
Darrow gets it on with his flame (Gretchen Mol) and he lends him one of
the leftover groupies.  Allen's writing in these scenes are so good that
just for them, I'd almost recommend the film.  Almost.
But what I really liked about this film is despite the fact that it's a
mess, despite the fact that what this film really needs is a good old
fashioned rewrite by Allen himself, it's still a smart and insightful
film.  Though some of the jokes are either stale or misplaced (some seem
too cartoonish, even for this environment), Allen still manages to get
across that this film is not exactly about celebrities, as it may seem
to be (if it were, it'd be extremely out-of-touch), but about those who
want to be celebrities, and how they equate celebrity-hood with
happiness.  We never get close enough to the actual celebrities to see
if they're really happy (they may appear to be on the surface...), but
we do get close enough to Lee and Davis' character.  Lee is obsessed
with the phenomenon, while Davis takes is at arm's length, and never
gets too involved in what it is, and soon becomes one herself.
Besides, it's witty, and it does have the one thing that no other film
has but Allen's: that great Woody Allen feel.  It may be not exactly
fresh and lively or totally brilliant in its depiction of its subject,
and yes, as a part of Woody Allen's oeuvre, it's merely a blip (no
"Annie Hall" but it's no "Shadows and Fog" either), but it goes to prove
that no one can make a film like him, and only he and maybe Godard could
possibly take a totally horrible metaphor, like the one in the
beginning, and make it work not once but twice.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
Writer: Scott B. Smith (based on his novel)
Starring: Bill Paxton, Billy Bob Thornton, Bridget Fonda, Brent Briscoe, 
Chelcie Ross, Becky Ann Baker, Jack Walsh, Gary Cole
It's been a good long while since we had a good old fashioned thriller, 
where mostly everything goes right for the audience and wrong for the 
characters, but it's been even longer since I saw a thriller that 
actually *shock* cared for the characters, not merely judged them but 
actually allowed their human foibles, flaws, and strengths to emerge so 
radiantly. I'd saw that it's been at least a couple decades, even as far 
back to the great Hitchcock thrillers, though I'm hardly comparing "A 
Simple Plan" to, say, "Rear Window" or "Strangers on a Train." Yet it's 
almost as good. It's simple, yet strangely complex, and astonishingly 
rewarding, because instead of moving from plot point to plot point, and 
merely laying out they-might-be-caught overtones, it instead concerns 
itself with the moral corruption and depths of greed that its 
protagonists can go to, all without ever judging them as either evil or 
even immoral. Elegantly directed by Sam Raimi (yes, the same), "A Simple 
Plan" concerns itself with the discovery of a crashed plane and within a 
bag full of millions of dollars by an upright, moderately financially 
stable working man (Bill Paxton), his dim-witted brother (Billy Bob 
Thornton), and his drinking buddy (Brent Briscoe). Without anyone 
around, and the possibility that no one would come looking for it, the 
three debate and debate but finally reach the decision that yes, they 
will keep it, but until any authorities or possible owners of the cash 
come looking, and so they generally don't flaunt anything they don't 
want to flaunt, they'll keep it stored away in the custody of Paxton.
The possibilites of this circumstance are much diverse: a) they could 
endlessly play cat and mouse with the authorities; b) they could try to 
fight off the rightful owners, who are either villainous or just; or c) 
they could fight amongst themselves. "A Simple Plan," though borrows a 
little from each of these. A little tiff with the cops here, a subplot 
involving an alleged FBI agent (a chilling Gary Cole) there), and a bit 
of inside feuding over here. But, as Austin Powers would say, that's not 
necessarily its bag (baby). What I most admired about this film, and 
what makes this a far superior and unique thriller is that it's 
successfully able to have its cake and eat it too. It effectively 
involves some of the traditional thriller cliches, like the ones 
mentioned above, but at the same time, it involves itself more deeply 
with the way the characters become morally corrupt and what price they 
have to pay to have what they think is happiness in a black duffle bag.
So while steps are taken to neatly cover things up, and these subsequent 
steps go miserably awry, the film choses to never loose the sight that 
in covering things up to the extent that these characters have to, they 
are slowly losing their souls and their humanity. In one early scene, 
Paxton and Thornton have to make a trip back to the plane to return some 
of the money so it doesn't look like it was all stolen (not a bad idea), 
when Thornton screws up (as he does continuously throughout the movie), 
and Paxton has to do some major covering-up (read: homicide). Instead of 
a quick murder and immeadiate hands-washing, Raimi shows a lengthy, 
painful shot from a low-angle onto Paxton's face as he tries to sift 
through his emotions and reach a conclusion. There's a similar shot 
afterwards of Paxton watching the murder he's committing and taking in 
all the horror which is also wonderfully effective, but the previous 
shot is even better: more morally complex and more gut-wrenching. In 
short, probably the best piece of direction Raimi's ever done, 
demonstrating once again that sometimes the simplest way to do something 
yields the best results (for further proof, watch "Persona"'s "sex 
scene" and witness what may be the best scene Ingmar Bergman's ever 
done).
But the film hardly stops here; it follows completely through and rarely 
loses sight of its characters humanity and the depletion thereof. Yet it 
also moves from step to step in such a graceful method that we never 
feel like the film is merely stamping out the plot points of the story. 
When the time comes for Paxton to start becoming selfish and thus 
diabolical (with aid from his pregnant wife, played by Bridget Fonda, a 
pal to Raimi), he does, and soon the horror of the situation is 
escalating to tragic heights. There's at least two grand shootouts, and 
at least one of them may be one of the greatest shootouts in cinema 
history, and when they arrive, they don't come with masochistic delight 
but with cringe-inducing horror. During the one, I was actually sinking 
into my chair, with the mantra "they can't do this, can they?" streeming 
through my head. In fact, this film, which is getting many comparisons 
to the Coen's [superior, but forget about it] "Fargo," has many similar 
moments of manic insanity, attributed to the major amount of subtlety 
and restraint with which the directors direct what, in other hands, 
would be over-the-top distractedness (imagine, I suppose, Robert 
Rodriguez directing this...then again, after seeing the "Evil Dead" 
films, I'd hardly assume Raimi would be able to pull something like this 
off, although there are moments of the film which are easily dubbed 
"Raimi" moments, a rifle-shot notwithstanding).
Instead, Raimi directs with maturity and a gentle touch, easily letting 
the story and characters co-exist, while still letting some of the more 
traditional Raimi elements come out, like some offbeat comic touches. 
Most particularly, Billy Bob Thornton's character, Jacob, is a brilliant 
creation. His dim-wittedness is often hilarious (for most of the film, 
every line he uttered was greeted with howling laughter), but there's 
authenticity to the performance that strangely enough makes sure that 
we're not totally laughing at him. The chuckles he gets are not 
necessarily ones of full-condescension because Thornton is so damn real. 
Jacob's a multi-dimensional character, and while being stupid, we see 
that as not so much a flaw, but a strength to his character: his 
simplicity is endearing and many of the acts he commits are out of a 
strong inner strength and belief system, primarily towards the middle 
where his bud and co-conspirator begins to make some heavy waves 
concerning the money. The final third of the film spends much time with 
him, and many of the touches upon his character, not only by Thornton 
but also by screenwriter Scott B. Smith (adapting his own book, by the 
way) are just great. I particularly admired a back story about an old 
high school girlfriend, told by Thornton with such sincerity and 
acception that the cruel story is reversed to near-sweetness and further 
strength of his saddened character. Thornton is absolutely brilliant in 
this performance, by far the best performance he's ever given and 
further proof that he's the best character actor in contemporary cinema 
(if you don't believe me, go back and watch his wonderful performance in 
"Primary Colors," a performance that would have been nominated for an 
Oscar if this hadn't been in the same year) because he's easily able to 
slip into a character, and make him completely and utterly believable. 
He brings so much weight to the film that, as it is with most character 
actors, it's difficult picturing anyone else in the role.
The rest of the cast is great too, from Paxton's declining working man 
to Chelcie Ross' amiable town sheriff. Even Fonda shows off her talents 
nicely. And if I had any complaints about the film, it's that the plot 
is almost too simplistic, and that at times, it seems too much like an 
exercise, like a cruel test on humanity that still pays attention to the 
humanity involved. And the occasional narration is, as it usually is, 
annoying (narration should be used with extreme caution, especially when 
you're trying to set things up and/or express emotions - didn't Raimi 
watch the first murder scene?). And, the thing that can most usually go 
wrong with a movie, the ending is basically amiss. I won't reveal it, 
but it's way too cruel and too much of an outsider set-up, as if the 
appearance of a plane wasn't already too much of that anyway. For a film 
that deals so much and so intimately with the humanity of the characters 
involved, this is the wrong ending. Imagine a character-controlled 
ending; otherwise, it's like if in "Crime and Punishment" if the police 
had caught him instead of him breaking down and confessing...not that 
I'm at all comparing "A Simple Plan" to Dostoevsky. The ending does 
work, despite my protestations, but to me, there was something 
incessantly nagging and unsatisfying about it; but if you had no qualms 
and were happy as a clam with it, then just ignore me and go about your 
day. But despite my mere claims, make no mistake that I was completely 
and utterly edge of my seat throughout, and even sometimes curdling up 
by the situations that occured, not because of any kind of gore factor 
(which is, thankfully for this, very minimal), but because the film 
places its characters in situations and gives them such painful things 
to overcome that I've frankly not seen much like it in quite awhile. At 
least not since the previous worthy Hitchcockian masterpiece.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hillls/8335/

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Director: Shekhar Kapur
Writer: Michael Hirst
Starring: Cate Blanchett, Geoffrey Rush, Christopher Eccleston, Joseph
Fiennes, Richard Attenborough, Fanny Ardant, Kathy Burke, Eric Cantona,
James Frain, Vincent Cassel, Daniel Craig, Kelly MacDonald, John Gielgud
Flat out, "Elizabeth is a wonderful flick: as gorgeous to look at as a
Peter Greenaway film and as delightful to follow as a Stephen Frears
movie.  It's bold, lavish, mischevious, and downright entertaining, but
those aren't the reasons it's so good.  At the center of this film is a
performance of such immense power and complexity that perhaps we don't
fully comprehend the greatness now.  Cate Blanchett's performance as the
title character has already won her tons of accolades, a Golden Globe
nomination, and an almost sure-fire bet at nabbing an Oscar nod (she
better look out, though - back in 1995, when Nicole Kidman was
considered a sure-fire bet for an Oscar, she was snubbed come February
from even a nomination), but her performance still isn't as
well-received as it should be.
I think it's such a good performance because it's one of the few
performances by an actress in quite a while to actually be really
complicated.  She doesn't allow her character to be easily defined by
audiences and critics - she shows all her flaws, all her strengths, and
puts her character up for complex scrutiny and still remains
mysterious.  She does it all without overacting or underacting - she's
just right on.  She's sympathetic yet still a bit untrustworthy.  She's
definitely a force to be reckoned, but seems easy to crush.  And she
acts like the coolest person in the world, tossing out jokes to those
she works with, but is still a little frightened girl underneath.  Maybe
the best scene in the movie is one where we see two scenes juxtaposed:
one where she's speaking to parliament, cracking sarcastic jokes, and
winning them over; and another where she's preparing for this, nervoulsy
trying to come up with the right thing to say and the right way to say
it.
She's also the anchor in this entire film, which isn't, admittingly, the
greatest film I've ever seen.  The problem I think is that while the
film is setting up her character and her situations, it never truly
functions as a real cohesive story.  I said it was fun to follow, but
it's not the plot you're to follow, but rather the fact that deeds like
the ones that transpire in this film transpire at all.  Deceptions,
beheadings, burnings, and other sorts of treachery abound, and all with
the perfect visual flair from director Shekhar Kapur (I especially liked
the scene in the beginning where a group of protestants are burned alive
- the camera sweeps up, then cuts to various scenes below as members of
the audience react with either displeasure or with just the right amount
of taste that they toss another log onto the fire).  For a lot of the
film, I wasn't even exactly sure why they were being killed or people
were being avenged - I was just along for the ride.
This biopic on Elizabeth I deals with her first years on the throne,
following her half-sister's demise, and it perfectly captures the
turmoil England was in at the time, when Henry VIII had brought the
country to near Civil War between the Protestants and the Catholics, and
both sides were fighting eachother for power.  Elizabeth claims the
throne after a fit with her sister of her possible execution for being a
suspected Protestant, when all the time she was really just in the
moderate view on things, and once there, is forced to bring peace
between the two groups, and to learn her way around the country as she
went.
Equipped with many advisors (including one Richard Attenborough) and one
extremely devious assistant who helps her manipulate her way to peace,
Sir Francis Walshingham (Geoffrey Rush), who is so incredibly evil that
we can't help but love him for being evil for Elizabeth.  All this plays
around for two hours, as we watch these characters play off one another,
try to figure out how the pull the country out of a state of disaray,
and punish those who need to be punished (including the Catholic with a
vengeance Duke of Norfolk, played with intensity by Christopher
Eccleston).  All the while, she has to balance all that with her
relationship for an older lover, Robert Dudley (Joseph Fiennes, brother
to Ralph), who may not be around in her life much longer.
That said, "Elizabeth" is a wild ride, albeit a confusing one.  The plot
moves without stops and there is much that is a) not explained very well
(what the hell happened to Robert?), and b) is historically inaccurate
(a bit involving the death of Mary of Guise is hilariously askew).  But
despite this, "Elizabeth" is about as fun a film to watch as "Dangerous
Liasons" or "L.A. Confidential," if solely because the things that
transpire are handled with wit, and strong visual flair.  And at the
center is Cate Blanchett, who shows Elizabeth to be a real human being,
flaws and all: she's not a terrifically great person, but she's smart
and quick to learn, and has the lack of self-involvement to realize that
the problems with the country lie in the fact that the Catholics and
Protestants are too hell-bent on both being right, and if she has to
pervert things to fix this up, she better damn well do it.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
Writer/Director: Guy Ritchie
Starring: Nick Moran, Jason Flemyng, Dexter Fletcher, Jason Statham,
P.H. Moriarty, Lenny McLean, Steven Mackintosh, Vas Blackwood, Frank
Harper, Vinnie Jones, Peter McNicholl, Stephen Marcus, Steve Sweeney,
Jake Abraham, Stephen Callender-Ferrier, Suzy Ratner, Sting
Here's a big shock, for ya: there's actually a film that has to do with
crime, uses the now-dying Tarantino brand of love for crime and
criminals as a backboard, and is filled to the brim with immense amounts
of style over a minute amount of substance that, *shock*, actually
works.  I'm not so sure I believe it myself, but 'Lock, Stock, and Two
Smoking Bullets,' the new film from newcomer Guy Ritchie, is probably
the first straight-up crime flick since 'Pulp Fiction' to actually
breathe life into the overused genre.  Ever since 'Pulp Fiction' came
out, the necessity of others to make films just like it has plagued us
and only recently begun to seriously decline, not just because the
Tarantino style has gone out of style, but also because no one could
ever actually capture that feeling that 'Pulp' introduced.  What makes
'Lock, Stock...' work is that while it's obviously inspired by
Tarantino, it's also been inspired by the great British crime flick,
'The Long Good Friday,' and the hybrid of the two, I suppose, has bred
this: a film that is jam-packed (and I mean jam-packed) with interesting
characters who are all, in some way, related to crime; features a
plethora of nasty violence (shootings, stabbings, beatings, burnings,
even a hatchet in the back or two); possesses a complex amount of plots
and subplots; and has a streak of humor that is not necessarily black or
quirky as much as it is traditionally 'British.'
In fact with all of that compressed into about 105 minutes of film, it's
actually a bit tough to follow.  But the main plot is this: a foursome
of young London Eastenders, who hardly need the money, enter their
unofficial leader (Nick Moran), who's ace at cardplaying (he can sense
emotions easily), into a high-stakes poker game with a local mob boss,
named Hatchet Harry (P.H. Moriarty, incidentally from 'The Long Good
Friday').  Turns out, duh, that Harry cheats with the help of his
enormously menacing assistant, Barry the Baptist (the late Lenny McLean,
once a real-life bouncer and ruffian), and once they lose, Barry informs
them that they have only three days to get what they owe in to him.
Meanwhile, another gang, who lives next door to them, are devising a
scheme to rob a local pot dealer (Steven Mackintosh) of his cash on the
day it's being transferred to another local mob boss, Jamaican Rory
Breaker (Vas Blackwood).  Thus the main gang decides to rob that gang.
Also meanwhile, in another part of town, two inept crooks are hired by
Barry to steel some very expensive antique rifles from a mansion, and,
believe it or not, they become involved slightly in everything that goes
on.
I'll refrain from revealing any more, as part of the fun is just trying
to keep up with the plotty plot, while another part of the fun is trying
to keep track of who's who.  This film must feature about 25 main
characters, some who actually look alike, but all of whom have catchy,
quirky names, like Nick the Greek, that are instantly reminiscent of the
heydays of Tarantino (oh those were the days).  And, surprise, much of
this film rides high on the enormous amount of style that comes along
with it.  Guy Ritchie has pretty much officially overdirected this film,
employing slowing down a shot then speeding it up frantically, freezing
frames and spinning around a subject, using bizarro angles and lenses to
distort the picture, the occasional use of narration to sum things up
(this was my favorite effect, I must add), witty direction (when you see
a guy throwing carrots into a pot from the POV of the pot, you really
should have no doubt Ritchie worked in commercials) and usage of about
35 years of music in designing the soundtrack, which features everything
from new stuff to James Brown and Dusty Springfield.  To tell you the
truth, it looks a lot like a Gap commercial.
And, predictably enough, throughout much of this film, with all the
style and glitz that accompanies it, we don't really care what happens
to anyone.  There's no real characterization here, and it would almost
seem like if the film had decided to concentrate on another group of
characters in this film and not our lead foursome, there'd really not be
much of a difference.  And as much as this sounds like a criticism, it's
not.  I enjoyed this film.  There's no real big reason why: it's just
bloody entertaining stuff.  I liked the use of style way over substance
(particularly the poker scene, which is phenomenal to look at), and I
liked how the film took an objective look at all the characters and
never actually deepened them (in a film like this, depth of anything
would be distracting beyond recognition).  Hell, I even liked the fact
that this film actually coasted on style for most of it.  I suppose if I
had to actually come up with a concrete reason why I actually think any
of this is worth a teensy bit of merit is: it has energy.  This movie's
alive.  Movies aren't much alive these days, but this film is so
energetic and filled with zeal that you can almost sense that making
this film must have been the most fun thing in the cast and crews'
lives.  And this is conveyed to the audience in the way that it's been
designed, through the humor and the unserious tone, which could
otherwise be interpreted as posing.
But even if this stuff is not your average cup of tea, the final act is
so brutally wicked and devilish that it's as if the first two acts, the
exposition and the chief robberies, were only leading up to the
hilarious way in which the film ties up all its loose ends.  At least
three quarters of the cast of characters get done away with, and by the
end, everything (or at least almost everything) has been dealt with in
such a satisfying and Machiavellian manner that it'd be tough not to
leave the theater with a big stupid grin on your face, giggling about
what you just saw.  But even so, throughout there's such a good amount
of humor that watching it is breathlessly entertaining (all clichés
aside, British humor really is pretty much the best kind, at least I
think so), from the little one-liners (quoting Winston Churchill on the
subject of gold whilst torturing a victim) to the small idiosyncrasies
(one crook's fascination with his poofy hair) to the hysterical bits of
casting (most hysterical: Sting, yes Sting, as Moran's bartender father
- the camera seems to linger over him whenever he shows up, as if
someone offscreen is about to shout out 'Hey!  Isn't that recording
artist Sting?!?!?!').  Even the acting is spotlessly superb, with
our four leads being instantly likable (esp. Moran), and the biggest
accolades going to McLean and professional soccer player/hooligan Vinnie
Jones as soft-spoken yet still enforceful collector Big Chris (with his
dry little son, Little Chris).
Basically, this is the most furiously entertaining movie I've seen so
far this year (big challenge)...yet, that may actually be a part of its
partial undoing.  It's so furious and so busy trying to always be
unpredictable and wild that I wonder if this film actually holds up over
repeated viewings.  Maybe this film will be one of those films where the
initial viewing is always the best, while others slowly degrade in
quality.  Yet, there's still that initial viewing, which was so
demanding of attention, so witty, and so entertaining that it's hardly a
shock that it's not completely satisfying.  You're more or less bound to
have a blast watching it, that is, if you don't take any of it seriously
(this includes the style which, once upon a time, may have been
considered, *ahem*, 'Brilliant').  Even then, though, even not taking it
the least big seriously, I couldn't help but describe this film to a
friend in one damning word: 'cute.'  Fun flick; doubt I'd think so after
three viewings.  Yet, strangely enough, I can't wait to see it again.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
Director: Tony Kaye
Writer: David McKenna
Starring: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Avery Brooks, Fairuza Balk,
Beverly D'Angelo, Stacy Keach, Jennifer Lien, Ethan Suplee, Guy Torry,
Eliott Gould, William Russ, Paul Le Mat
It's tough to really say something nice about a type of person who's so
ethnocentric that any humanity they once had is now gone, but by god,
"American History X" does it, and for that, I commend it.  It not only
takes balls but intelligence to make a human being out of a neo-nazi
skinhead, a kind of person who dedicates their lives to hating anyone
who's not what they are, and this film wisely and miracurously pulls it
off.
The subject of this film is one of them, but he is worse than one of the
blind followers that make up most skinhead members since he is the
leader of the pack.  He's the one who instigates them to take a firm
grip onto their rage, and then in another brilliant stroke, justifies it
with political propoganda that makes eerie sense when he speaks.  He's
so utterly convincing as a public speaker and so firm in his convictions
that it comes as a shock when he actually goes through the
rehabilitation process.
His name is Derek Vinyard, and he's played by Edward Norton with so much
fire and intensity that when he speaks he's almost as convincing and
arresting a public speaker as, say, Malcom X.  When we first see him,
he's clean shaven, with a jet black swastica emrboidered on his left
breast, a devlish goatee, and he's attacking the black carjackers
outside of his house dressed in nothing but his white boxers and
carrying a handgun in his hand that never seems to run out of bullets,
at least when he doesn't need them.  He so believes in his convictions
that he's willing to put his beliefs to the test, even if he knows it
will mean a stop in prison, if only for a couple years.
"American History X" is about Derek, how he became a neo-nazi skinhead,
how he rose to power, how he was rehabilitated in prison after murdering
two black men in a fit of rage that was less to do with the stealing of
his car and more to do with proving himself, and how he tried to save
others, namely his younger brother, from making the same mistake.  We
see him at all of these stages - as a smart teenager, a vicious hate
monger, a man having an epiphany, and the man who tries to correct what
he's done before - and in all of these, we get a portrait of a man from
all sides.  Or at least, that's the intention.
The film's framing device is his brother, Danny (Edward Furlong,
perpetually looking about 13), also now a skinhead, and how his
principal, Bob Sweeney (Avery Brooks, who I just found out was or is the
captain on Star Trek's Deep Space 9), is trying to "correct" him.  When
the film opens, Danny has just written a book report on "Mein Kampf,"
landing him in trouble with Sweeney, which causes him to make him write
a paper on Derek's life and how it has gotten him nowhere.
Coincidentally, this day is the day Derek is released from prison, and
when we see him, he's cleaned-up, not as buff, and has a full head of
hair.  He's just as intelligent, but still very rough along the edges,
but he's wisened up.  He's no longer controlled by his anger at blacks
and jews, and tries to persuade Danny, who's becoming what Derek was
before, to give up his lifestyle.  But Danny won't.  He goes to a large
skinhead beer bash, meets with the skinhead leader (Stacy Keach), and
then discovers that Derek is as opposed to neo-nazi-dom as he was for it
a couple of years ago.
The film circles around this, then spins off into non-linear flashbacks,
all done in black and white.  We mostly see Derek at his prime as a
skinhead, living in Venice Beach, organizing vicious and quasi-sadistic
raids on local stores that no longer hire the white, middle-class
teenagers since they can easily get cheaper illegal immigrants to do the
same work, and mouthing off his theories on affirmative action and how
illegal immigrants and blacks have destroyed the fundamentals this
country was built on.  To them, the white man is the one who has gotten
the fuzzy end of the lolipop, and he not only speaks elloquently,
forcefully, and intelligently, but he backs everything up with political
reasons, justifying their rage at least to them.  And frighteningly
enough, much of what he says sounds true.
"American History X" is a collection of really great scenes and moments,
rather than a cohesive, great film that flows effortlessly from one
moment to the next.  In it, there are some of the best scenes I've seen
all year.  One scene features a dinner between Derek's family, and his
mother's newest boyfriend (played with reserve by Eliott Gould), a
jewish liberal who quietly disagrees with Derek's rightist views,
launching the scene into a fit of rage and anger that builds unparalled
emotions in the audience (Gould's reaction to Derek's final summation is
unnerrving).  Another scene uses humor and traditional macho sex talk to
build a friendship and a nice connection between Derek and a black
co-worker (Guy Torry) while folding laundry in prison.  And another
soon-to-be-classic is actually divided in two: the murder of the two
black men that winds Derek in jail, which contains a final murder so
nasty that it may be the most revoltingly shocking all year.
There's much more to appreciate, like the acting, which is uniformly
good, with stand-outs coming from Avery Brooks, Beverly D'Angelo (as the
long-suffering mother), and Gould (who has one horrible line, but other
than that, comes off with the best performance he's given in what seems
like a really long time).  Norton walks off with the film, though,
coming off with such intensity that he reduces anyone not doing an
adequate job to rubble.  In only the fifth movie of his career, Norton
has invented himself as one of the most reliable and intense actors of
his generation, and maybe the best.  There's nothing like it when Norton
really gets rolling in this movie, spewing out lines with such authority
that he commands all attention from the audience, coming off with power
similar to that of a young Maron Brando.  That he allows the little
emotions to seep through is amazing.
Sadly enough, this isn't going to be the great portrait of racism that
it perhaps hopes to be.  It's too unambitious and even a little
contrived to really take off as either a powerful statement or an
emotional masterpiece.  The ending, especially, is pencilled in from
other movies, tossed in just so the emotional keyboard can be trounced
upon.  Some of the skinheads are reduced to mere cliches (Kevin Smith
regular Ethan Suplee fairs rather annoyingly as the "Fat Skinhead,"
whose lines consist without fail of expressing his desire to eat more),
and even the dramatic arc isn't as well travelled.  Furlong's Danny
never seems to really be learning a lesson, since the flashbacks refuse
to show his point of view, and when he decides to make a change by the
end (which was inevitable), it doesn't seem like it has actually arrived
there.  Even Derek's descent into skinhead-dom doesn't seem justified.
Though his fireman father (William Russ, the dad from "Boy Meets World,"
and don't ask me how I know that) is killed by a black junkie, and even
before he spoke against affirmative action intelligently, there never
seems to be any real back story why Derek became so intense about his
beliefs.
As such, one can see why the director, Tony Kaye, wanted to have his
name removed.  Sorta.  "American History X" is a very good movie, and I
was very moved by it, but it could be a lot better, and the problem
seems to be that the cut as it is is not up to what he claims to be his
potential.  Somewhere, he claims, there lies a Tony Kaye cut, and that
was to be the true cut until it was viewed by Norton, who then ordered
another cut, and that is thus.  Although he aimed for the directing
credit to go to "Alan Smithee," the resident name for any film that is
to be disowned by its director, it wasn't allowed to him, under the
grounds that once you disown a film, you can not badmouth it (but
really, that's the MacGuffin - no one really wanted a film this good to
be given the Alan Smithee sign of disapproval).
Kaye's right in that it's not up to par, even if he's not referring to
normal par but rather his own personal par.  This will not be a "Do the
Right Thing" for the late 90s.  Yet it still gets its point across
intelligently, and backs it up with its story (its message, that one
cannot be so enwrapped in one's own beliefs or pain and suffering will
occur, is literally said over the narration, unfortunately).  And even
if it isn't perfect, at least when Avery Brooks turns to Norton after he
has been beaten and raped in prison, and asks him if anything he's done
has made his life any better, it realy hits a nerve, not only in Derek,
but also in the audience.

Title
Review for Very Bad Things (1998)
Writer/Director: Peter Berg
Starring: Jon Favreau, Christian Slater, Cameron Diaz, Jeremy Piven,
Daniel Stern, Leland Orser, Jeanne Tripplehorn, Carla Scott, Russel B.
McKenzie, Lawrence Pressman
Well, "Very Bad Things" is not exactly bad, but it's not exactly great
either.  Peter Berg's hopeful satirization of the hidden angst and
horror that lies within the souls of yuppie suburbanites is hardly the
success in either the insightful field or the realms of actual funny
black comedy, and the result is a pitch black black comedy that is
actually blacker and more desolate than, say, "Dr. Strangelove," but
about a millionth as satisfying.  Walking out of this film one warm
Wednesday night, I wasn't laughing or particularly freaked out by what
had happened, but merely trying to figure out just why this film hadn't
taken off, when it did have some very big positive pointers going for
it, not the least being its excellent cast, and definitely not the least
being that it does, in fact, have a pretty killer story.
All I can think of is that this film is perhaps too intense, maybe too
black.  I know that the idealism behind the sub-genre of "Black Comedy"
is that you can push the envelope as far as you want to go, that
actually pushing it beyond the realms that anyone has ever gone is what
makes it so "black."  "Strangelove," in fact, pushes it farther than
anyone has pushed it hence (at least up until now), making comedy out of
nuclear anihilation, finding big chuckles in the mere sight of wild-ass
hick Slim Pickens riding a H-Bomb, waving his hat in the hair, as he
plumets to not only his death, but many others'.  There are similar
moments in "Very Bad Things," including several gruesome deaths,
freakish occurances, and some general orgiac pandemonium - stuff that
either equals or rivals the content of "Strangelove," yet there's a
world of difference between the two - in fact, so much that I'm of all
people wondering why I'm comparing the two, when in fifty years,
"Strangelove" will most likely still be one of the most-talked about
motion pictures and "Very Bad Things" will be viewed as merely a blemish
on the oeuvre of all involved...even Jeanne Tripplehorn.
The thing that differentiates this from all other black comedies is,
then, tone, and the matter in which it is applied.  The director and
writer, Peter Berg, has stated that he wanted to make a film for him,
and he likes his films like he likes his food, and probably everything
else: with spice.  And what happens is, yes, this film definitely has
spice, above everything else, but that's probably it's undoing.  It's so
audaciously in favor of being completely over-the-top that for most of
the film, I wasn't sure if I was supposed to be laughing or actually
being frightened by its ghastly events.  This apparently was the
purpose, as Berg has been quoted as telling its potential audiences to
just keep on reminding themselves that what they're watching is a
comedy, even though the film is so cartoonish in its presentation that
even if it is intense, it's absolutely impossible to take this as
anything short of a really black comedy, funny or not.
And for at least the first half hour, it isn't half bad (read: I
laughed, but not much or hard).  Berg's dissection of young upwardly
mobile members, living in suburbia, and just starting out their lives is
mildly amusing if not a little tired.  We're introduced to the five pals
(played by Jon Favreau, Christian Slater, Jeremy Piven, Daniel Stern,
and Leland Orser) and their respective problems (Favreau is getting
married to Cameron Diaz; Stern and Piven are perpetually feuding
siblings), and after all this, they all head out for the lavish Bachelor
Party for Favreau, all the way out in Vegas, where they engage in drugs,
general rucous, and eventually, a stripper who bares her body, then ends
up in the bathroom, where she fucks the now-emotionally-released Piven,
who slips on the wet floor, landing the back of the stripper's head on a
coat hanger.
Things get pretty intense from here, including a visit from a security
guard (some have actually made the mistake that this film is racist from
the fact that the stripper is asian, the security guard is black, and
Stern is openly Jewish), and like a first-time director trying to be
completely hip, Berg mistakens the stupidity of these five characters as
a form of really inspired comic flight, unfortunately the only real
source of jokes in this film.  Favreau does his character from
"Swingers," Stern does the trademark Stern character he's done twice too
many times before, Piven does the Piven-schtick, Orser just kinda sits
there with nothing to do, and Slater, for the first time since, oh I
dunno, "Heathers," actually steals the show and becomes pretty
engrossingly witty.  It's all generally interesting, and I was actually
pretty much into it so much that I was actually enjoying myself and
wondering what would in fact happen to hold this flawed but engrossing
mixture of bad jokes and extremely intense pseudo-drama for another hour
or so.
Sadly enough, once the guys are back home and when they're consciences
are getting to them is about the time the film just slowly collapses
under itself.  The jokes become less and less funny, the situations
become more intense, and by the end, it has come to an almost-completely
disappointing denouement, where two characters don't get at all what
they deserved, and one does.  When the movie was over, I got up, left,
and walked slowly to my car in a bemused state of depression, not
depressed over what had happened in the film, but depressed because I
wasn't at all satisfied with what had happened.  Theoretically, this
film should work.  It shows that humans are, deep down, horrible people,
and any pain they receive is justified.  Great point.  It was also made
in the black comedy "Your Friends and Neighbors," a brilliantly funny
movie that also doesn't respect its characters and still manages to
leave the audience satisfied.  Maybe that was because writer/director
Neil LaBute not only had a more observant tone, but also told funnier
jokes.  The characters were fully realized, and they seemed like, well,
real people who really did deserve their sad fates by the finale.
"Very Bad Things" rests on characateurs, and that's not really bad, but
it's not exactly great either.  It doesn't help that Berg has nothing
original or even very interesting to say about them, and the only
character who's even close to possessing anything resembling dimensions
is Cameron Diaz's, a Martha Stewart with a vengeance who isn't so much
interested in marrying as she is BEING married, and will go as far as to
bash a man's head in and order the deaths of man and canine to insure
her possible happiness.  Combined with Slater's joyously devious lawyer,
who seems that he may miss covering up for what happened in Vegas, and
you have the only real signs of wit and comedy in the entire film.  Even
Favreau, a really hilarious actor, seems like he was imported from
another film and is just standing around, awkwardly awaiting the finale.
But perhaps the worst thing about "Very Bad Things" is that after all
the hype, all the trailers that made it look like the hippest black
comedy to come our way since the dawn of Quentin Tarantino, it is
ultimately forgettable, and seems to be a direct miss in what Berg was
hoping would happen.  Afterwards, I couldn't get some of the carnage out
of my mind (particularly one pretty vile death about halfway through),
but a week later, I had all but forgotten what it was I didn't really
like about it.  Okay, sure, it's a tad engrossing, but when the film no
longer held my utmost attention following a promising beginning, there
was nothing left for me to really care about.  When the bomb finally did
go off in "Strangelove," I saw it as hilariously disturbing, since those
who caused it to happen were not only a bunch of imbeciles, but also the
ones in charge of our lives.  When the end finally came for "Very Bad
Things," all I could think of was "ugh."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Lolita (1997)
Director: Adrian Lyne
Writer: Stephen Schiff (based on the novel by Vladimir Nabokov)
Starring: Jeremy Irons, Dominique Swain, Melanie Griffith, Frank
Langella
Much ballyhoo has been made over this new version of "Lolita," made in a
time when one would think that a faithful adaptation of the infamous
novel could be made, over its use of pedophilia, and as such, it's
important to address it straight-forwardly, before any other ideals such
as goodness and themes can be discussed, as this film has been in film
limbo for a number of years, lying around in vaults san a distributor,
and having critics waiting to either hail it a masterpiece or call it
anticlimactic horseshit.  When seeing this film, after all the hoopla,
keeping in mind that there are people, namely me, who are fans of the
novel, who have been eagerly awaiting this flick since its
creation...well, you just have to wonder why no one really picked it up
for distribution.
What's even worse is that seeing this "Lolita," especially the first
time and if you're familiar with anything "Lolita," is admittingly very
anticlimactic.  This is a real pity because when you really sit down to
watch this film, ignoring all the crap that has preceeded it, it's
really quite a film, perhaps the best film by director Adrian Lyne
(although, really, look at its competition: "Flashdance," "Fatal
Attraction," and "Indecent Proposal"), at least besides "Jacob's
Ladder."  I've seen this "Lolita" twice: the first time, I wasn't so
blown away.  It seemed overly dramatic and surprisingly unaffecting.
The second time, not really thinking about how I've waited for what
seems like forever to see it and how I'm seeing it on a TV set on a
premium cable channel and not a giant movie theatre, it really affected
me emotionally.
The story itself is a surprisingly heartbreaking one, which is why it's
such a good novel, and why this is such a good film.  The story of a
pedophile obsessed with a young 14-year old girl named Dolores a.k.a.
Lolita is great because it's not trash for the perverted but because
it's about human obsession with things that are out of one's reach.  Its
protagonist, the comically-named Humbert Humbert, is not your average
pedophile, but a seriously wounded human being who embodies how we are
all destroyed by our sick obsessions and idosyncrasies.  The character
of Lolita is almost a symbol of the forbidden apple in Christian
mythology, something that will destroy us but that we can't live
without.
These ideas are all worked into this film nicely, but done in a way that
is not heavy-handed at all, but instead lyrical and emotionally
devastating.  The focus of this film, and the reason for making it, it
seems, was to really penetrate the emotional depths of the novel and
bring them to life on the screen in beautifully dramatic images, and
scenes which are blatantly over-stylized.  The tone of the book is a
comical one, but it's also a tragic one, and Humbert, telling the story
from his perspective, blows every single thing out of perspective.
Humbert exists in a fantsy world of his obsessions and desires, and this
reflects the way the entire film has been designed.  We get a sense that
perhaps it's by doing this that Humbert has really trapped himself into
a fate that will ultimately leave him haggard and destroyed.  He weeps
uncontrollably and never lets himself get over his original 14-year-old
love, and allows himself to embody her as Lolita.  He lets his feelings
for her navigate all his decisions, and by the end, he has nothing but
overly-dramatic feelings for her.
The story recognizes the extreme of this, almost out of a test, seeing
if the readers will really sympathize with someone who is socially
deemed a pervert, and one almost wonders while reading the book if the
author, Vladimir Nabokov, wrote the book as a means to bring into focus
his own sick obsessions, and perhaps bring them to peace.  The weirdest
thing about this film is that by the end, when Humbert has reached the
finale of his obsessional journey, we can easily sympathize and even
identify with him.  The opening and final images of the film are the
same, and who hasn't done a similar action, that is wandering about
without any sense of reality or anything else but a deep sadness in us?
This is the second time the novel has been adapted for the screen, the
first time being filmed in - shock - 1962, by Stanley Kubrick, who
couldn't possibly have brought the novel to the screen with as much
faithfulness as Lyne has been able to do, but did the next best thing:
he economized for everything and came up with a droll black comedy about
obsession in general.  In that film, he used the traps of society as
benefits.  The studio demanded the final scene, that of a heinous
murder, come first in the film so to portray Humbert first as a murderer
and second as a pedophile...and when you see it, it gives the film depth
of a man trapped by obsession.  The censors wouldn't allow anymore than
a couple glances and subtle dialogue to show the, um, relationship
between Humbert and Lolita, so Kubrick decided to play it as comedy, but
still allow the tragedy to seep through.
Looking at these two versions, especially after reading the novel (and
we all know that when we've read a novel and see a film adaptation, we
are bound to be angered by any size differences), it's really impossible
to compare them.  They both go for different things, and one has a lot
more room to be as sexually frank as the novel was.  And although it's
true that several scenes are similar, and are thus up for comparison,
overall it's unfair to say which one is better and which one is worse.
I have never been one for saying the level of greatness of a film
adaptation of a novel is deemed by how faithful it is, and I won't say
that here.
However, this film is pretty amazing, mostly because hey, I loved the
book, and this film nearly reminded me of it.  It doesn't have nearly as
much wit (a couple comical scenes, and even a lot of good chuckles, but
just not totally witty), but it does have the same emotional toll that
the novel had.  Some of that is in the casting of the two leads.  Jeremy
Irons, with his deep, soft British voice and gentle look, is an amazing
Humbert.  He's droll in a very unique way, and, well, no one can look
distraught the way he does.  He brings a wonderful sympathy to the role
that goes beyond pathos and really comes up as being easy to identify
with the audience.  And when he looks at Lolita with love, and she looks
at him with lust, you know that he's her prisoner for as long as he
lives.
And Dominique Swain, who plays the title character, is rather
incredible.  She pulls off the tough role even better than Sue Lyon did
in the original, wonderfully balancing the qualities of seduction,
bratiness, and self-centeredness that marks the character.  It's easy to
see why she surrenders to Humbert: she loves the attention, and knows
that she can have her way with him at any time.  When he denies her
something, she blackmails him effortlessly (a scene involving a rocking
chair and a little foot action is damn near classic), and when he stands
up to her, she weeps and runs away, leaving Humbert to follow her.
There are two other minor characters in the film, one who's a road block
in the beginning, and the other who's a reappearing threat to the
relationship.  The former is Charlotte, Lolita's mother, played by
Melanie Griffith.  In the book, Charlotte is a monster of a woman:
overbearing, constantly scolding her child, overly-religious, and
ultimately selfish.  And she's the one obstacle Humbert has to overcome
to obtain his goal, at least in the beginning.  As played by Shelly
Winters in the original, she represented all these qualities; as played
by Griffith here, she's about half of them.  It's annoying to watch a
film and play a game where you try to see who could have done the role
way better than the one on screen without mentioning the actor who
played them first.  And even though Griffith is not really bad, persay,
she's nothing more.
The other is Clare Quilty, the writer who is also trying to seduce
Lolita, and succeeds, but at a price.  Langella takes a totally
different direction than the one Peter Sellars took in the original.
Quilty was a comic character in the original: a threat in the form of
many forms, popping in states of rambling, German, proning, and
eventually drunk.  Langella takes the other route, allowing all of the
creepiness to be unearthed, and the result is a character who exists in
shadows and low shots, and who meets a wonderfully ironic ending, the
exact opposite of what we thought of him.
As you can see, most of these are not improvements or mistakes done on
the part of Lyne and his screenwriter, Stephen Schiff, but just parts of
a whole new look at the novel, at least cinema-wise.  This version is
beautiful, and perpetually saddening.  The camera movements are
stylized, and each shot is breathtakingly rich.  The acting is for the
most part wonderful, and when we watch it, we really get a sense that
for Humbert, who is telling the story, the only two people on earth most
of the time were Humbert and Lolita.  More importantly, it takes us
right up the brink of emotion, then jumps right over it.  By the end,
with Humbert sadly driving recklessly in his car, following what he says
is the only part of his life he doesn't regret, we feel that we all lose
to something we can never have.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Nightwatch (1998)
Director: Ole Bornedal
Writers: Ole Bornedal and Steven Soderbergh
Starring: Ewan McGregor, Nick Nolte, Josh Brolin, Patricia Arquette,
Alix Koromzay, Lauren Graham, Brad Douriff, John C. Reilly, Charles
Fleischer, Lonny Chapman
I recently read the book "I Fellini" where the great Italian director
was quoted as saying (and I'm paraphrasing) that once he finished a film
and it was in theaters that he always thought about stuff he should have
inserted before but never got a chance to, but how he'd never actually
go back to rework his films because once a film is finished the first
time, it's finished forever, and new projects should be tackled
instead.  Reason Two should be the Danish Georges Cluzot film, "The
Vanishing": after being highly acclaimed by critics worldwide as a
brilliant chiller of a film (I've never seen it), he was called by
Hollywood to remake it himself, and the result was not only a box office
dud, but a film that was virtually devoured by critics as a pretty
shitty little flick that totally ignored the power the original had.
Reason Three, then, should be "Nightwatch."  Also a Danish film,
"Nightwatch" has been recrafted by its director, Ole Bordenal, so that
it could be the most recent in the long line of Teen Horror Movies,
albeit a Teen Horror Movie starring young adults like hot Scot actor
Ewan McGregor, Patricia Arquette, and Josh Brolin (oh, and Nick Nolte
too).  If the previous reason should be any note to you, take into
consideration the fact that this film was original slated for release in
November of 1996, and lay in Movie Limbo until, oh, April of 1998, when
it was finally released to the titanic gross of about two million
dollars before shutting down and being shipped to video stores for
rental.  How I know this should be no surprise to anyone who knows me: I
was once a ginormous Ewan McGregor fan, as well as a "Scream" fan, and
the trailers for this film, at the time, were unbelievably cool.
Looking back at the same trailer, it still looks cool, because it's not
another subconcious "Scream" film, but rather an actual serious
thriller, with shots and scenes where you actually hold your breath in
fear, and are stuck in the middle of a mystery.  With lots of suspects.
And working the nightshift in a morgue of all places.  At least that's
what I gathered from the trailers.
Renting it not too long ago with a free coupon, after thinking "What the
hell?" to myself, I discovered the oft-fated truth that the actual movie
seldomly lives up to the trailer or the hype (or lack thereof, in this
case).  "Nightwatch" begins not half-bad, actually.  The credit sequence
is weird and complicated.  Lots of repeated shots of an interview on the
TV in connection with a murder and the investigating Inspector Cray
(Nolte), juxtaposed with scenes of a party between friends for Martin
Bells (McGregor), our humble protagonist, given by his girlfriend
(Arquette) and their two closest friends (Brolin and Lauren Graham).
It's all terribly corny, but it sets up a nice tone that should have
preceded, and it gets us thinking about who will be the notorious killer
amongst them.
We learn about Martin.  He's a law student, a bit dull, and has just
gotten a job working the night shift at the local morgue.  The retiring
nightshift watchman (Lonny Chapman) shows him the ropes of the job,
which includes turning a key box in every single room every hour to make
sure that he's doing his duties, and about whom to call in case of
emergencies, and to set up a little anecdote about an infamous murder
that happened years ago involving one of the nightwatchmen, a corpse,
and a bit of raving libido.  This is the best scene in the film, due
mostly in part to Chapman, whose worldweariness is immensely appealing
and totally fascinating.
Everything goes swell for Martin, then the local serial murdering pops
up again, and Martin becomes suspect number one in Cray's
investigating.  Soon the film is trying to make everyone a candidate for
suspectism, including Brolin's daredevil best friend (bringing about a
mindboggingly stupid subplot involving a prostitute played by Alix
Koromzay), the off-kilter Deputy Doc (Brad Douriff), even perhaps
Arquette.  Trouble is what it all comes down to is the viewer figuring
out who the killer is in the first ten minutes, then thinking it's
another character, and then coming back to their first intuition: an
annoying trend in mysteries these days, often used when the screenwriter
is suffering from laziness.  It doesn't really help that the style and
direction by Bordenal isn't exactly chilling.  There are several scenes
of Martin walking down long, brightly lit, yet eerie hallways to
discover what's on the other side, and these are geniuinely nail-biting,
but most of the time, there's no real tension, and most of the scary
shots/scenes were fragments in the trailer, a piece of film that did
work as being actually scary (at least in the hype-kind-of-way).
It also doesn't help that the characters are disturbingly boring and
one-dimensional, and the acting, for the most part, is piss-poor (you
heard me).  McGregor invests no personality whatsoever in Martin, and he
comes off as merely Ewan in auto-pilot and with an fake accent.  Brolin
is as annoying as he's ever been.  And Arquette is the worst: I'm not a
big fan of hers (I liked her a lot in "True Romance," though), and if
anyone ever wanted to challenge me on that notion, I can now cheerfully
point to her cliched and eyes-rolling performance in this film as proof
that, yes, she can really blow as an actress (Exhibit Two is her
embarrassingly overrated performance in "Lost Highway").  Only Nick
Nolte comes off as good.  Saddled with an otherwise thankless role, he
turns Inspector Cray into the one thing in this film that really works:
he's mysterious yet trusting, ominous yet approachable.  He's also a
marvel to watch, and if it ain't the best performance in a shitty movie
I've seen all year, then I've been forgetting something crucial here.
There are, as with most bad films, things I did like about this film.  I
liked the way that the killer is revealed: when it (I use "it" in lieu
of a gender, for obvious reasons) is revealed, it could be in the
location for other reasons.  A real nice touch.  I also liked the way
the film handled the key turning in the actual morgue part of the
morgue: it's chilling in a simplisitc, human way.  And for McGregor
fans, there's a nice little homage to "Shallow Grave."  But that's
really about it.  I personally like my horror films with creepiness, and
not exactly intelligence.  I can sometimes dismiss plot holes, lack of
characterization, and other such sins if there's great storytelling
there.  Case in point, Dario Argento's "Suspiria," which would have been
the world's stupidest film if it hadn't been so marvelously
constructed.  But when there's noting remotely creepy or engaging about
the way a film is construced, all I can then turn to is the story and
characters.  And when there's nothing there either, well then you'll
have to excuse me as a roll my eyes a bit.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
Director: Harold Ramis
Writers: Peter Tolan, Harold Ramis, and Ken Lonergan
Starring: Robert DeNiro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow, Joe Viterelli,
Richard C. Castallano, Chazz Palminteri, Kyle Sabihy, Bill Macy, Leo
Rossi, Max Casella, Molly Shannon, Tony Bennett
The early buzz on "Analyze This" has already deemed it the Best Film of
1999, and strangely enough, not more than two months into this year,
this is what we have to single out as the best film so far.  The first
couple months of the year are filled to excess with films left over from
last year that were originally supposed to get a nice, pre-January
release amongst the rest of the winners, and luckily enough we get to
see films that were released only partially before January to take
advantage of a potential Oscar nomination that are still being released
(I believe Boorman's much-touted "The General" is due in a couple
weeks).  Then there are the other kinds of films -- the ones that were
actually supposed to be released in '99 and weren't actual holdovers
because of a lack of studio support, and these films luckily enough show
that they actually are good films, although this kind of film is
extremely rare.  And so we have "Analyze This," one of the first 1999
release on purpose, and one which, while isn't going to be topping
either my best or worst lists at the end of this year, it is currently
topping my best-of-99 (for the record, this list consists of this and
"Payback"), although I doubt that it'll occupy that place for longer
than a couple weeks at best.
Oft hilarious, and boasting a silly premise that would cause Ivan
Reitman to blush, "Analyze This" is a suprisingly smart and original
comedy without ever actually being drop-dead great.  Like several films
of its kind, it's not funny in a totally consistent way and several
elements don't exactly work.  Unlike those kinds of films, it covers its
bases by being consistently clever and managing to stretch out an
otherwise lame premise into an hour and forty-five minutes of celluloid
without ever feeling tiresome or losing steam.  The premise, if you
haven't heard it yet, is the kind that sounds exactly like a studio
pitch: a mob boss goes to a jewish therapist.  It drops two actors known
for filling those stereotypes with life and, best of all, with box
office returns (though not all the time): Robert DeNiro, playing the
uptight mafiaso, and Billy Crystal, playing the nervous analyst.  You
can almost hear the oo's and ah's from studio heads when you hear this.
Next, they bring in a director known for lightweight comedies, Harold
Ramis (they could have easily gotten Frank Oz or, yeah, Ivan Reitman),
shoot it, do an ad campaign, and watch the money roll in.
Of course, "Analyze This" hasn't been released yet, and for all I know,
it could be another in a recent line of bombs for Crystal or another
mediocre quasi-hit for DeNiro, but nevertheless, this is a film designed
almost from a Hollywood mold.  For the most part it plays like that, but
that it's actually successful as a clever and witty piece of americana
comedy is what makes it better than, say, "Kindergarten Cop" or "Twins,"
just to name two films that once scored with audiences with ridiculous
premises and are now looked down upon with regret (well, at least by
me).  I may regret saying this, but I doubt I'll ever hate myself for
enjoying the hell out of this flick.  "Analyze This" scores by making us
actually seeing a reason why these two very different stereotypes would
come together: a mob boss undoutedly has a whole lot of stress built up
over the years, and "Analyze This" almost seems to be jumping on the
bandwagon of "Grosse Pointe Blank," and saying that if anything, the
latter half of the '90s is a time not for everyone to be a wild
neurotic, in search of an analyst to make him (or her) feel better about
themselves, including gangsters.
DeNiro's character, one Paul Vitti, has a whole lot of stress, and at
first seems too stubborn to take care of it logically (he has a doctor
rubbed over a bit when he tells him he had a panic attack and not a
heartattack), but when one of his henchmen (Joe Viterelli, the mob boss
from "Bullets Over Broadway") has a small car accident with a therapist
(Crystal) and is given his card to perhaps pay for any damages, Vitti
decides to go ahead with it.  The therapist, Ben, is himself a little
bored with his job, tired of hearing overly neurotic patients (one of
them being a wonderfully whiny Molly Shannon), but is still reluctant to
have a mob boss as one of his patients, indeed his primary patient, not
the least because Vitti's sudden strike of anxiety coincides with his
upcoming wedding to a Miami-based meteorologist (Lisa Kudrow).  And when
Vitti forces Ben to help him, interupting several key moments in his
life (his wedding.  twice.), he discovers that the FBI is on to him and
wondering who he is and what his connections are to Vitti.  Ben never
becomes exactly joyful that he's helping Vitti (except when he finally
learns some cold hard truths about his past that are oh so freudian),
but Vitti doesn't care because all he wants is a quick psychological fix
before his big bosses meeting in a couple weeks, where he has to be able
to pull himself together emotionally and show what a big, powerful,
tough man he is, not the weeping sap that he turns into every now and
then.
Among many things, "Analyze This" promises the hilarious, priceless
sight of DeNiro weeping uncontrollably several times (once during a
maudlin commercial) along with the toughness that DeNiro can bring to
any role, both which are used to comic effect.  And though it's mighty
humorous to see DeNiro showing good spirits and parodying his macho,
testosterone toughness in movies like "Raging Bull" and "Goodfellas,"
and though he's great, Crystal nearly upstages him in one of his five
best performances.  Nervous but rigid, controlled yet flustered, Crystal
is absolutely priceless, and by being so reserved, he's much easier to
intake than in other more over-the-top and slightly unbearable
performances, where he's constantly trying to win you over with an
overly-anxious energy paired with rip-offs of vaudevillian jokes
("Forget Paris," I'm looking your way...).  Together, they may not be
the next Abbot and Costello or even Matthau and Lemmon, but they're
opposite personalities and the way they respect eachother's respective
personality traits makes "Analyze This" into a rather smooth and
digestible comedy.
The screenplay's not half bad either: there are plenty of lovely
one-liners, that's sure, and the official first funny joke concerning
the Internet that I've heard, but there's also a surprising amount of
nice story development there too, and none of the subplots really seem
to be overbearing or not milked well enough (save for bits and pieces
with Kudrow, who's underutilized for as talented as I think she is...and
yes, I realize she's a "Friends" cast member co-starring in a movie, but
let's face it, she's the one with the good deal of movie smarts).
Subplots involving the FBI and a vindictive fellow mob boss (Chazz
Palminterri) are used nicely, and most terrific of all, the film never
ever resorts to sappy sentamentalism.  Everything's handled with the
correct tone of light-handedness (even the violence is non-shocking),
and Ramis and company make sure we can't take a second of this seriously
(when you see films like these, you really feel grateful when it doesn't
succumb to sappiness).
If there's anything I object to about it, it's that there are times when
it goes too over-the-top, most of all including bits of interuption he
has in his life, and most of all, an admittingly humorous scene towards
the end, but one that still felt too far-fetched, even for an otherwise
light comedy (cough that one up to lazy jokemaking, I guess).  But
otherwise, "Analyze This" is a surprisingly original comedy: one that
takes a totally off-the-wall premise, and not only makes it very funny
and very clever, but also keeps working on it, exposing a shocking
amount of intelligence and consistent wit, and never makes you feel like
a moron for laughing at it.  I know this will sound like a dramatic
overstatement, but I really haven't left a flat-out comedy feeling this
good since "There's Something About Mary" (though for the record, "Mary"
was funnier and even more intelligent - in fact, you could say "Mary"
was the really good version of "Analyze This," only more naughty
jokes).  So I guess, at least for now, "Analyze This" is the best film
of 1999.  Though that's probably gonna change, unless the apocalypse
really is coming up.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Title
Review for Little Voice (1998)
Director: Mark Herman
Writer: Mark Herman (based on the play "The Rise and Fall of Little
Voice" by Jim Cartwright)
Starring: Jane Horrocks, Blenda Blethyn, Michael Caine, Ewan McGregor,
Jim Broadbent, Annette Badland, Philip Jackson, Graham Turner, Alex
Norton
About an hour or so into 'Little Voice,' there's the big concert
sequence, which in the olden days of Astaire and Rogers was what came
about every 20 minutes.  In this, the lead character, who's been nearly
silent and reserved for the entire movie, opens her eyes up wide, and
does wonderful, show-stopping impersonations of all the great female
singers, from Billie Holiday to Shirley Bassey, and man oh man is it
worth the price of admission.  We see snippets of only a couple of her
numbers, but during those few minutes, it's one of the best films of the
year: energetic and sit-up-in-your-seat entertaining.  In fact, through
the whole thing, I had this big silly grin plastered on my face, and low
and behold, the actress playing her (Jane Horrocks) is not at all faking
it.  This movie, and the play before it, is based on her actual ability
to do this mimics, and they are about the best mimics I've heard in,
well, decades.  They sound exactly like the actual artists, and when she
does them, she has so much energy that I nearly applauded right along
with the audience when she was finished.  Hands down, it's one of the
best sequences of last year.
Sadly enough, it's one of the only things I can recommend wholeheartedly
about the rest of 'Little Voice,' which is a film that builds up
entirely for this sequence and then goes downhill immediately
afterwards, drowning in clichés and half-assed themes (the final moment,
in fact, is so let's-just-end-here that the credits rolling made me jump
in my seat).  It's as if someone found out Horrocks has this great
talent, decided to write a film dealing with her ability, and leapt to a
pen and notepad at the first idea that went through their head, which
is, basically, about an agoraphobic who learns to open up over the
course of the film.  It's your basic charming Brit comedy, not a lot
unlike films like 'The Full Monty,' that win audiences over with their
own unique brand of self-depricating ethnic wit, or at least it's
supposed to be.  In fact, looking at the rough outline, it has all the
right ingredients for a terrific Brit import: a great cast (Michael
Caine, Brenda Blethyn, Jim Broadbent, Ewan McGregor, and, of course,
Horrocks), some great humor, a little bit of pathos, and a selling point
that's just superb (in fact, I'd still like to see it again, just for
the big number sequence).
The story is simple: LV (really Laura, but it stands for Little Voice)
lives in a run-down part of London with her loudmouth, boozing, horny
mum (Blethyn, which is pretty much perfect casting, after the whole
'Sweetheart' and 'Darling' spiel of 'Secrets and Lies') and never leaves
her room as she perpetually listens to her dad's old records of Garland,
Monroe, and the whole lot, of which she can do uncanny impersonations.
One night, mum brings home run-down talent agent, Ray Say (Caine,
basically playing him like an older, more decrepit version of Alfie),
who hears her when the electricity goes out and she starts singing to
replace the absence of music.  He feels he's struck gold after all these
years and plans a big event to be held at his friend's (Broadbent) seedy
pub.  Trouble is LV's, as I said, agoraphobic, so she basically has to
be literally forced to do it.  Meanwhile, she meets a shy electrician
(Ewan McGregor) who takes a shine to her, and tries his darndest to open
her up.
It's all great on paper, but there's something lost in the process.
Nothing really comes together.  Even the humor is all starts-and-stops
(although I just loved Blethyn's otherwise unprintable description of
Caine's convertible), and the actual structure sadly builds everything
up to the big scene, making everything your basic filler.  Throughout,
there are many a funny thing to gawk at, but most of the time, I was
just waiting for the promised show, and while I wasn't exactly let down,
I do like my filler to be of the interesting kind, not the half-assed
kind.  What it basically comes down to is a lack of actual material for
the story, and most of what happens prior to the show is entirely
predictable and only minutely interesting (it even goofs up the metaphor
of the McGregor character: see, he takes care of pigeons, and in a way,
I guess, LV is a caged pigeon...right?).  But it's still at least
watchable because the entire time, you know you're gonna get a great
show because, after all, if this is to showcase Horrocks' talents at
mimicry, it has to allow her to sing a couple numbers.
Afterwards is the worst though: the entire rest of the film gets bogged
down in what it perceives as drama, and it takes a questionable and
entirely unnecessary turn for the mean.  Ray becomes a total jerkoff,
for plot purposes; the mum becomes a bit of one herself, but is
subsequently told off by Ray; and LV becomes worse than ever.  'Little
Voice,' as it turns out, believes in the basic principle that a more
tragic streak a better movie makes, but here, this all seems horribly
out of place and mishandled.  In fact, LV The Character almost seems
like a terribly selfish character by the film's end: her refusal to do
her shtick has, by the end, ruined a couple people, and left her mother
the target of harsh accusations and character assassinations, which she
has, yes, brought on herself.  And the film ends on such a distasteful
note that I nearly wanted a short epilogue, just to see what happened to
Ray, his friend, and her mum, all of whom lie in ruins by the finale.
If this is supposed to be some kind of stark, Balsac-ish portrait of
these people as greedy and deserving of destruction, it's in the wrong
movie.  'Little Voice' needed to be more uplifting and more pleasant,
and the dark streak across it seems to come from a deadly sense of
self-importance on the part of the filmmakers, not from any real
artistic intentions.  It reduces Horrocks' shtick to merely a Vegas or
talk show act, since it doesn't get a whole lot of notice in this film.
If, however, it had a better story, a better character (really, is an
agoraphobic with a secret talent just about the most cliched idea or
what?), and a lack of that mean streak that plagues the final act, they
really would have something.  As it is, though, it's a weak Brit comedy,
which to me is almost refreshing as I have been chastised by several of
my friends for what seems like a predilection towards anything British,
whether it be Monty Python or William Shakespeare (or Kenneth Branagh
doing William Shakespeare).
But then again, there's Horrocks.  Known for her great performance in
Mike Leigh's wonderful 'Life is Sweet' (playing a similar character) and
her supporting work on 'Absolutely Fabulous,' she makes a terrific
leading woman despite the handicaps her character has infringed upon
her.  She's fragile but she can also come across with such strength,
especially during the big show number and a couple scenes towards the
end, and she's also instantly likable.  And her talent is still better
than a mere Vegas or talk show act; she could play Broadway and do
extremely well.  In fact, here's an idea for a show, or even a movie
later on: Jane Horrocks doing these impersonations.  No LV.  No story of
an agoraphobic in London, trying to deal with an overbearing mother.  No
run-down talent agent who turns asswholish.  No plot-requiring love
interest.  Just Jane.  In a dress. Singing like Bassey, Holiday, Monroe,
Garland, and whomever else she wants to impersonate.  She does it so
well that this film hardly deserves her.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/
